Table of Contents
UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
_____________________________________________________________ 
FORM 10-K
xANNUAL  REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(D) OF  THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended January 31, 2019
or
¨TRANSITION REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(D) OF  THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the transition period from              to             
Commission File Number: 0-14338
_____________________________________________________________  
AUT ODESK, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delaware  94-2819853
(State or other jurisdiction
of incorporation or organization)  (I.R.S. employer
Identification No.)
111 McInnis Parkway,
San Rafael, California  94903
(Address of principal executive offices)  (Zip Code)
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code: (415) 507-5000
 _____________________________________________________________ 
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class  Name of each exchange
on which registered
Common Stock, $0.01 Par Value
 The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC
(Nasdaq Global Select Market)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
_____________________________________________________________ 
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.    Yes  x    No  ¨
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
(“Exchange Act”).    Yes    ¨    No  x
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act during the preceding 12
months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90
days.    Yes  x    No    ¨ 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of
Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit and post such
files).    Yes  x  No    ¨ 
Indicate by check mark if disclosure of delinquent filers pursuant to Item 405 of Regulation S-K (§229.405 of this chapter) is not contained herein, and will not
be contained, to the best of registrant’s knowledge, in definitive proxy or information statements incorporated by reference in Part III of this Form 10-K or any
amendment to this Form 10-K.      ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company or an
emerging growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company” and “emerging growth company” in
Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filer  x  Accelerated filer  o Non-accelerated filer o  Smaller reporting company o Emerging growth company o
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or
revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ¨ 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined by Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act).    Yes    ¨     No  x
As of July 31, 2018, the last business day of the registrant’s most recently completed second fiscal quarter, there were approximately 218.9 million shares of
the registrant’s common stock outstanding that were held by non-affiliates, and the aggregate market value of such shares held by non-affiliates of the registrant
(based on the closing sale price of such shares on the Nasdaq Global Select Market on July 31, 2018) was approximately $28.1 billion. Shares of the registrant’s
common stock held by each executive officer and director have been excluded in that such persons may be deemed to be affiliates. This determination of affiliate
status is not necessarily a conclusive determination for other purposes.
As of March 15, 2019, the registrant had outstanding 219,535,216 shares of common stock.
2019 Form 10-K 1
Table of Contents
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Portions of the Proxy Statement for registrant’s Annual Meeting of Stockholders (the “Proxy Statement”), are incorporated by reference in Part III of this Form
10-K to the extent stated herein. The Proxy Statement will be filed within 120 days of the registrant’s fiscal year ended January 31, 2019.
2019 Form 10-K 2
Table of Contents
AUTODESK, INC. FORM 10-K
TABLE OF CONTENTS
 
  Page
PART I
Item 1. Business 5
Item 1A. Risk Factors 14
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments 28
Item 2. Properties 28
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 29
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 29
PART II
Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of
Equity Securities 30
Item 6. Selected Financial Data 32
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 33
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk 60
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 61
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements With Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 109
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 109
Item 9B. Other Information 109
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance 110
Item 11. Executive Compensation 111
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder
Matters 111
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 111
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services 111
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules 112
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary 112
 Signatures 113
2019 Form 10-K 3
Table of Contents
FORWARD-LOOKING INFORMATION
The discussion in this Annual Report on Form 10-K contains trend analyses and other forward-looking statements within the
meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933 and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. Forward-looking
statements are any statements that look to future events and consist of, among other things, our business strategies, future financial
results ( by product type and geography) and subscriptions, the effectiveness of our efforts to successfully manage transitions to
new markets, expectations for and our ability to increase annualized recurring revenue, cash flow, our subscription base, and other
financial and operational metrics, the impact of past and planned acquisitions and investment activities, expected market trends,
including the growth of cloud and mobile computing, the effect of unemployment, the availability of credit, the effects of global
economic conditions, the effects of revenue recognition, the effects of newly recently issued accounting standards, expected trends
in certain financial metrics, including expenses, expectations regarding our cash needs, the effects of fluctuations in exchange rates
and our hedging activities on our financial results, our ability to successfully expand adoption of our products, our ability to gain
market acceptance of new businesses and sales initiatives, and the impact of economic volatility and geopolitical activities in
certain countries, particularly emerging economy countries, the timing and amount of purchases under our stock buy-back plan,
and the effects of potential non-cash charges on our financial results and the resulting effect on our financial results. In addition,
forward-looking statements also consist of statements involving expectations regarding product capability and acceptance,
statements regarding our liquidity and short-term and long-term cash requirements, as well as statements involving trend analyses
and statements including such words as “may,” “believe,” “could,” “anticipate,” “would,” “might,” “plan,” “expect,” and
similar expressions or the negative of these terms or other comparable terminology. These forward-looking statements speak only
as of the date of this Annual Report on Form 10-K and are subject to business and economic risks. As such, our actual results could
differ materially from those set forth in the forward-looking statements as a result of a number of factors, including those set forth
below in Item 1A, “Risk Factors,” and in our other reports filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. We assume no
obligation to update the forward-looking statements to reflect events that occur or circumstances that exist after the date on which
they were made, except as required by law.
2019 Form 10-K 4
Table of Contents
PART I
 
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
Note: A glossary of terms used in this Form 10-K appears at the end of this Item 1.
GENERAL
We are a global leader in 3D design, engineering and entertainment software and services, offering customers productive
business solutions through powerful technology products and services. We serve customers in the architecture, engineering and
construction; product design and manufacturing; and digital media and entertainment industries. Our customers are able to design,
fabricate, manufacture and build anything by visualizing, simulating and analyzing real-world performance early in the design
process. These capabilities allow our customers to foster innovation, optimize their designs, streamline their manufacturing and
construction processes, save time and money, improve quality, communicate plans, and collaborate with others. Our professional
software products are sold globally, both directly to customers and through a network of resellers and distributors.
Segments
We report segment information based on the “management” approach. The management approach designates the internal
reporting used by management for making decisions, allocating resources and assessing performance as the source of our reportable
segments. The Company's chief operating decision maker ("CODM") allocates resources and assesses the operating performance of
the Company as a whole. As such, Autodesk has one segment manager (the CODM), and one operating segment.
A summary of our revenue by geographic area and product family is found in Note 2, “Revenue Recognition,” in the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements.
Corporate Information
We were incorporated in California in April 1982 and were reincorporated in Delaware in May 1994. Our principal executive
office is located at 111 McInnis Parkway, San Rafael, California 94903, and the telephone number at that address is (415) 507-
5000. Our internet address is www.autodesk.com. The information posted on our website is not incorporated into this Annual
Report on Form 10-K. Our Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q, Current Reports on Form 8-K and
amendments to reports filed or furnished pursuant to Sections 13(a) and 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended,
are available free of charge on the Investor Relations portion of our website at www.autodesk.com as soon as reasonably
practicable after we electronically file such material with, or furnish it to, the SEC. The public may also read and copy any material
we file with the SEC at the SEC's Public Reference Room at 100 F Street N.E. Washington, D.C. 20549. The public may obtain
information on the operation of the Public Reference Room by calling the SEC at 1 (800) SEC-0330.
PRODUCTS
Our architecture, engineering and construction products improve the way building, infrastructure, and industrial projects are
designed, built, and operated. Our product development and manufacturing software provides manufacturers in automotive,
transportation, industrial machinery, consumer products and building product industries with comprehensive digital design,
engineering, manufacturing and production solutions. These technologies bring together data from all phases of the product
development and production life cycle, creating a digital pipeline that supports greater productivity and accuracy through process
automation. Our digital media and entertainment products provide tools for digital sculpting, modeling, animation, effects,
rendering, and compositing for design visualization, visual effects and games production. Our portfolio of products and services
enables our customers to foster innovation, optimize and improve their designs, save time and money, improve quality,
communicate plans, and collaborate with others.
2019 Form 10-K 5
Table of Contents
Autodesk’s product offerings, sold through a subscription, include:
•AutoCAD
AutoCAD software is a customizable and extensible CAD application for professional design, drafting, detailing, and
visualization. AutoCAD software provides digital tools that can be used independently and in conjunction with other specific
applications in fields ranging from construction and civil engineering to manufacturing and plant design.
•AutoCAD Civil 3D
AutoCAD Civil 3D solution provides a surveying, design, analysis, and documentation solution for civil engineering,
including land development, transportation, and environmental projects. Using a model-centric approach that automatically updates
documentation as design changes are made, AutoCAD Civil 3D enables civil engineers, designers, drafters, and surveyors to
significantly boost productivity and deliver higher-quality designs and construction documentation faster. With AutoCAD Civil 3D,
the entire project team works from the same consistent, up-to-date model so they stay coordinated throughout all project phases.
•AutoCAD LT
AutoCAD LT software is purpose built for professional drafting and detailing. AutoCAD LT includes document sharing
capability without the need for software customization or certain advanced functionality found in AutoCAD. Users can share all
design data with team members who use AutoCAD or other Autodesk products built on AutoCAD. AutoCAD LT software is our
second largest revenue-generating product.
•BIM 360
BIM 360 construction management cloud-based software enables almost anytime, anywhere access to project data throughout
the building construction lifecycle. BIM 360 empowers those in the field to better anticipate and act, and those in the back office to
optimize and manage all aspects of construction performance.
•CAM Solutions
Our computer-aided manufacturing ("CAM") software offers industry-leading solutions for Computer Numeric Control
("CNC") machining, inspection, and modeling for manufacturing. A comprehensive line-up of expert products, including
PowerMill, FeatureCAM, PowerInspect, PowerShare, and others, help our customers manufacture complex, innovative products
and components with maximum quality, control, and production efficiency.
•Fusion 360
Fusion 360 is the first 3D CAD, CAM, and Computer-aided Engineering ("CAE") tool of its kind. It connects the entire
product development process on a single cloud-based platform.
•Industry Collections
Autodesk's Industry Collections provide our customers with increased access to a broader selection of Autodesk solutions,
greater value, more flexibility, and a simpler way to subscribe and manage Autodesk subscriptions. The collections are tailored to
provide the essential software needed by professionals within each industry: Architecture, Engineering and Construction ("AEC"),
Product Design & Manufacturing, and Media & Entertainment ("M&E").
The AEC Collection, including AutoCAD, AutoCAD Civil3D, and Revit, aims to help our customers design, engineer, and
construct higher quality, more predictable building and civil infrastructure projects, commonly used by AEC industry experts.
The Product Design & Manufacturing Collection offers connected, professional-grade tools that help our customers make
great products today and compete in the changing manufacturing landscape of the future. The collection offers access to a wide
range of our products, including AutoCAD and Inventor.
2019 Form 10-K 6
Table of Contents
The M&E Collection provides end-to-end creative tools for entertainment creation. This collection enables animators,
modelers and visual effect artists to access the tools they need, including Maya and 3ds Max, to create compelling effects, 3D
characters and digital worlds.
•Inventor
Inventor enables manufacturers to go beyond 3D design to digital prototyping by giving engineers a comprehensive and
flexible set of tools for 3D mechanical design, simulation, analysis, tooling, visualization, and documentation. Engineers can
integrate AutoCAD drawings and model-based design data into a single digital model, creating a virtual representation of a final
product that enables them to validate the form, fit, and function of the product before it is ever built.
•Maya
Maya software provides 3D modeling, animation, effects, rendering and compositing solutions that enable film and video
artists, game developers, and design visualization professionals to digitally create engaging, lifelike images, realistic animations
and simulations, extraordinary visual effects, and full length animated feature films.
•PlanGrid
PlanGrid cloud-based field collaboration software provides general contractors, subcontractors, owners and architects access
to construction information in real-time. With PlanGrid technology, any construction team member can manage and update
blueprints, specs, photos, requests for information (RFIs), field reports, punchlists and other critical jobsite data. The data collected
within PlanGrid software acts as a digital trail during the building process, allowing for easy turnover to the owner for operations
and maintenance after construction is complete. PlanGrid mobile-first technology is accessible on modern desktop, laptop or
mobile devices, including native iOS, Android and Windows.
•Revit
Revit software is built for Building Information Modeling ("BIM") to help professionals design, build, and maintain higher-
quality, more energy-efficient buildings. Using the information-rich models created with Revit, architects, engineers, and
construction firms can collaborate to make better-informed decisions earlier in the design process to deliver projects with greater
efficiency. Revit includes features for architectural, mechanical, electrical and plumbing design as well as structural engineering
and construction, providing a comprehensive solution for the entire building project team.
•Shotgun
Shotgun is cloud-based software for review and production tracking in the M&E industry. Creative companies use the
Shotgun platform to provide essential business tools for managers and visual collaboration tools for artists and supervisors, who
often work globally with distributed teams.
•3ds Max
3ds Max software provides 3D modeling, animation, and rendering solutions that enable game developers, design
visualization professionals and visual effects artists to digitally create realistic images, animations, and complex scenes and to
digitally communicate abstract or complex mechanical, architectural, engineering, and construction concepts.
PRODUCT DEVELOPMENT AND INTRODUCTION
The technology industry is characterized by rapid technological change in computer hardware, operating systems, and
software. In addition, our customers’ requirements and preferences rapidly evolve, as do their expectations of the performance of
our software and services. To keep pace with these changes, we maintain a vigorous program of new product development to
address demands in the marketplace for our products.
The software industry has undergone a transition from developing and selling perpetual licenses and on-premises products to
cloud, mobile and social applications. To address this shift, Autodesk made a strategic decision to shift its business model from
selling perpetual licenses to selling subscriptions. We discontinued the sale of new commercial licenses of most individual software
products in 2016. Additionally, in June 2017, we commenced a program to incentivize maintenance plan customers to move to
subscription plan offerings, maintenance-to-subscription ("M2S"), while at the same time increasing maintenance plan pricing over
time for customers that remain on maintenance plans. Since launching the program, over 794,000 maintenance
2019 Form 10-K 7
Table of Contents
plan customers have converted to subscription plan offerings. Autodesk seeks to convert the remaining 796,100 maintenance plan
customers to subscription through this program. Subscription plan offerings are designed to give our customers increased flexibility
with how they use our products and service offerings and to attract a broader range of customers such as project-based users and
small businesses. Subscriptions represent a combined hybrid offering of desktop software and cloud functionality which provides a
device-independent, collaborative design workflow for designers and their stakeholders.
We dedicate considerable technical and financial resources to research and development to further enhance our existing
products and to create new solutions and technologies to expand our market opportunity. For example, in fiscal 2019, we continued
and expanded our investments in construction. We continued to make investments in the traditional data creation tools to support
the design and pre-construction phases, while expanding our investment in the areas of site execution with process and project
management cloud-based tools. Recognizing the value of data continuity across the construction lifecycle of design, building and
operations, we made investments in the pre-construction and site execution phases of the project through our cloud-based tools. To
connect the phases of construction upstream with design, we invested in and announced our cloud-based project delivery platform
that allows individuals, teams and projects to be connected across all phases in a common data platform. We anticipate ongoing
investments in construction that support pre-construction, site execution as well as the handover phase of the project and will
continue to invest in connecting workflows and data across the ecosystem of the project.
Research and development expenditures were $725.0 million or 28% of fiscal 2019 net revenue, $755.5 million or 37% of
fiscal 2018 net revenue and $766.1 million or 38% of fiscal 2017 net revenue. Our software is primarily developed internally;
however, we also use independent firms and contractors to perform some of our product development activities. Additionally, we
acquire products or technology developed by others by purchasing or licensing products and technology from third parties. We
continually review these investments in an effort to ensure that we are generating sufficient revenue or gaining a competitive
advantage to justify their costs.
 
The majority of our research and product development is performed in the United States, China, Singapore, Canada, and the
United Kingdom. However, we employ experienced software developers in many of our other locations. Translation and
localization of our products are performed in a number of local markets, principally Singapore and Ireland. We generally localize
and translate our products into German, French, Italian, Spanish, Russian, Japanese, Korean, and simplified and traditional Chinese.
We plan to continue managing significant product development operations internationally over the next several years. We
believe that our ability to conduct research and development at various locations throughout the world allows us to optimize
product development, lower costs, and integrate local market knowledge into our development activities. We continually assess the
significant costs and challenges, including intellectual property protection, against the benefits of our international development
activities.
For further discussion regarding risks from our product development and introduction efforts, see Item 1A, “Risk Factors.”
MARKETING AND SALES
We sell our products and services globally, primarily through indirect channels consisting of distributors and resellers. To a
lesser extent we also transact directly with our enterprise and named account customers and with customers through our online
Autodesk branded store. Our indirect channel model includes both a two-tiered distribution structure, where distributors sell to
resellers, and a one-tiered structure, where Autodesk sells directly to resellers. We have a network of approximately 1,300 resellers
and distributors worldwide. For fiscal 2019, approximately 71% of our revenue was derived from indirect channel sales through
distributors and resellers.
    
We anticipate that our channel mix will continue to change, particularly as we scale our online Autodesk branded store
business and our largest accounts shift towards direct-only business models. Importantly, we expect that the majority of our revenue
will continue to be derived from indirect channel sales in the near future. We employ a variety of incentive programs and
promotions to align our reseller channel with our business strategies. Our ability to effectively distribute our products depends in
part upon the financial and business condition of our distributor and reseller networks. The loss of, or a significant reduction in,
business with any one of our major distributors or large resellers could harm our business; see Item 1A, “Risk Factors,” for further
discussion.
Sales through our largest distributor, Tech Data Corporation and its global affiliates, accounted for 35%, 31%, and 30% of our
net revenue for fiscal years ended January 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively. We believe our business is not substantially
dependent on Tech Data. Our customers through Tech Data are the resellers and end users who purchase our
2019 Form 10-K 8
Table of Contents
products. Should any of the agreements between us and Tech Data be terminated for any reason, we believe the resellers and end
users who currently purchase our products through Tech Data would be able to continue to do so under substantially the same terms
from one of our many other distributors without substantial disruption to our revenue. No other distributor, reseller, or direct
customer accounted for 10% or more of our revenue.
Our customer-related operations are divided into three geographic regions: the Americas; Europe, Middle East and Africa
(“EMEA”); and Asia Pacific (“APAC”). Each geographic region is supported by global marketing and sales organizations. These
organizations develop and manage overall marketing and sales programs and work closely with a network of domestic and
international sales offices. Fiscal 2019 net revenue in the Americas, EMEA, and APAC was $1,049.9 million (41%), $1,034.3
million (40%), and $485.6 million (19%), respectively. We believe that international sales will continue to comprise the majority of
our total net revenue. Adverse economic conditions and currency exchange rates in the countries that contribute a significant
portion of our net revenue, including emerging economies, may have an adverse effect on our business in those countries and our
overall financial performance. A summary of our financial information by geographic location is found in Note 2, “Revenue
Recognition,” in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements. Our international operations and sales subject us to a variety of
risks; see Item 1A, “Risk Factors,” for further discussion.
We also work directly with reseller and distributor sales organizations, computer manufacturers, other software developers,
and peripherals manufacturers in cooperative advertising, promotions, and trade-show presentations. We employ mass-marketing
techniques such as webcasts, seminars, telemarketing, direct mailings, sponsorships, advertising in business and trade journals, and
social media. We have a worldwide user group organization and we have created online user communities dedicated to the
exchange of information related to the use of our products and services.
We generate revenue primarily through various offerings that provide recurring revenue. Under our subscription plan,
customers can use our software anytime, anywhere, and get access to the latest updates to previous versions through term-based
product subscriptions, cloud service offerings, and enterprise business agreements. With the discontinuation of the sale of perpetual
licenses, we have transitioned away from selling a mix of perpetual licenses and maintenance plans in favor of a consolidated
subscription model. However, our customers who have previously purchased a perpetual use license for the most recent version of
the underlying product are able to renew a previously purchased maintenance plan that provides them with unspecified upgrades
when and if available, and receive online support during the term of their maintenance contract.
CUSTOMER AND RESELLER SUPPORT
We provide technical support and training to customers through a multi-tiered support model, augmented by direct programs
designed to address certain specific customer needs. Most of our customers receive support and training from the resellers and
distributors from which they purchased subscriptions or licenses for our products or services, with Autodesk in turn providing
second tier support to the resellers and distributors. Other customers are supported directly via self-service using the Autodesk
Knowledge Network which guides customers to answers in our online support assets, support forums, webinars or to support
representatives using a number of different modalities such as social media, phone, email and webchat. We also support our
resellers and distributors through technical product training, sales training classes, webinars and other knowledge sharing programs.
EDUCATION, SUSTAINABILITY, AND PHILANTHROPIC PROGRAMS
Education
Autodesk is committed to helping fuel a lifelong passion for design and making among students of all ages, both within and
outside the classroom. We offer free educational licenses of Autodesk's professional software to students, educators, and accredited
educational institutions worldwide. We inspire and support beginners with Tinkercad, a simple online 3D design and 3D printing
tool. Through Autodesk Design Academy, we provide secondary and postsecondary schools hundreds of standards-aligned class
projects to support design-based disciplines in Science, Technology, Engineering, Digital Arts, and Math (STEAM) using
Autodesk's professional-grade design, engineering and entertainment software. Autodesk Design Academy curricula is also
syndicated on iTunes U and Udemy, where millions of students go to learn online. Classes and projects are available on our
Instructables website for anyone looking to expand their "making" skills. Our intention is to make Autodesk software ubiquitous
and the design and making software of choice for those poised to become the next generation of professional users.
2019 Form 10-K 9
Table of Contents
Sustainability Programs
To help our customers imagine, design, and make a better world, our sustainability initiatives focus our efforts on the areas
where we can have the greatest positive impact: enabling sustainable practices through our products, delivering free sustainable-
design learning and training resources, providing software grants to qualifying nonprofits and entrepreneurs, and leading by
example with our sustainable business practices. Through our products and services, we are supporting our customers to better
understand and improve the environmental performance of everything they make.
Climate Change
In addressing the global challenges posed by climate change, we make it possible for our customers to innovate and respond
to associated changes in regulation, building code, physical climate parameters and other climate-related developments.  This effort
can directly and indirectly create more demand for existing and new Autodesk products and services in the short and long-term.
Furthermore, our leadership is committed to taking climate action and that commitment goes hand-in-hand with our values and
reputation in the marketplace.
Climate Change Management Actions
To drive continued progress and meet growing demand, we continue to expand the solutions, education, and support we offer,
helping customers secure a competitive advantage for a low-carbon future by designing high-performance buildings, resilient cities
and infrastructure, and more efficient transportation and products. To continue to grow this market, we provide software and
support to early stage entrepreneurs and start-up companies who are designing clean technologies. We plan to expand these
offerings in the future based upon demand and opportunity in response to challenges posed by climate change.
Internally, we are investing in best practices to mitigate our greenhouse gas emissions and climate change risk through
investments in renewable energy, energy efficiency, disaster management and recovery strategies, and materials innovation. We are
on track to meet our science-based greenhouse gas reduction target of 43% absolute emissions by 2020.
Climate Change Governance
With oversight from our CEO, the Sustainability & Foundation Team has direct responsibility for setting and implementing
our corporate sustainability strategy, including our climate change strategy.
Emissions Performance & Other Key Performance Indicators
By end of fiscal 2018, Autodesk had reduced its net greenhouse gas emissions for its operational boundary by 38% from our
fiscal year 2009 baseline to 187,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent. This reduction was accomplished through increased
investment in renewable energy and energy efficiency in our global real estate portfolio, and continued transition from physical
software delivery to cloud and electronic software delivery. More information about our sustainability commitment can be found in
our annual sustainability reports, which we have published on our website since 2008. Our fiscal 2019 sustainability report will be
published in the second quarter of fiscal 2020.
Philanthropy
The Autodesk Foundation (the "Foundation"), a privately funded 501(c)(3) charity organization established and solely funded
by us, leads our philanthropic efforts. The purpose of the Foundation is twofold: to support employees to create a better world at
work, at home, and in the community by matching employees' volunteer time and/or donations to nonprofit organizations; and to
support organizations and individuals using design to drive positive social and environmental impact. In the latter case, we use
grant funding, software donations, and training to accomplish this goal, selecting the most impactful and innovative organizations
around the world, thus, leading to a better future for our planet. On our behalf, the Foundation also administers a discounted
software donation program to nonprofit organizations, social and environmental entrepreneurs, and others who are developing
design solutions that will shape a more sustainable future.
DEVELOPER PROGRAMS
Our business and our customers benefit from our relationships with an extensive developer network. These developers create
and sell their own interoperable products that further enhance the range of integrated solutions available to our customers. One of
our key strategies is to maintain an open-architecture design of our software products to facilitate third-party development of
complementary products and industry-specific software solutions. This approach enables customers and third-
2019 Form 10-K 10
Table of Contents
parties to customize solutions for a wide variety of highly specific uses. We offer several programs that provide strategic investment
funding, technological platforms, user communities, technical support, forums, and events to developers who develop add-on
applications for our products. For example, we have created our web services platform, Autodesk Forge. The Forge Platform
includes a number of web services that enable software developers to rapidly develop the next generation of applications, and
experiences that will power the future of making things. Forge facilitates the development of a single connected ecosystem for
integrating Autodesk applications with other enterprise, web and mobile solutions.
COMPETITION
The markets for our products are highly competitive, are subject to rapid change, and can have complex interdependencies
between many of the larger businesses. We strive to increase our competitive separation by investing in research and development,
allowing us to bring new products to market and create exciting new versions of existing products that offer compelling efficiencies
for our customers. We also compete through investments in marketing and sales to more effectively reach new customers and better
serve existing customers.
Our competitors include large, global, publicly traded companies; small, geographically focused firms; startup firms; and
solutions produced in-house by their users. Our primary global competitors include Adobe Systems Incorporated, ANSYS, Inc.,
Apple Inc., AVEVA Group plc, Avid Technology, Inc., Bentley Systems, Inc., Dassault Systèmes S.A. and its subsidiary Dassault
Systèmes SolidWorks Corp., Intergraph Corporation, a wholly owned subsidiary of Hexagon AB, MSC Software Corporation,
Nemetschek AG, Oracle Corporation, Procore Technologies, Inc., PTC Inc., 3D Systems Corporation, Siemens PLM, SONY
Corporation, Technicolor S.A., and Trimble Navigation Limited, among others.
The software industry has limited barriers to entry, and the availability of computing power with continually expanding
performance at progressively lower prices contributes to the ease of market entry. The industry is presently undergoing a platform
shift from the personal computer to cloud and mobile computing. This shift further lowers barriers to entry and poses a disruptive
challenge to established software companies. The design software market is characterized by vigorous competition in each of the
vertical markets in which we compete, both from existing competitors and by entry of new competitors with innovative
technologies. Competition is increasingly enhanced by consolidation of companies with complementary products and technologies
and the possibility that competitors in one vertical segment may enter other vertical segments that we serve. In addition, some of
our competitors in certain markets have greater financial, technical, sales and marketing, and other resources than we do. Because
of these and other factors, competitive conditions in these industries are likely to continue to intensify in the future. Increased
competition could result in price reductions, reduced net revenue and profit margins, and loss of market share, any of which could
harm our business. See Item 1A, “Risk Factors,” for further discussion of risks regarding competition.
We believe that our future results depend largely upon our ability to better serve customers by offering new products,
including cloud and mobile computing products, whether by internal development or acquisition, and to continue to provide
existing product offerings that compete favorably with respect to ease of use, reliability, performance, range of useful features,
continuing product enhancements, reputation, price, and training.
INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY AND LICENSES
We maintain an active program to legally protect our investment in technology through intellectual property rights. We
protect our intellectual property through a combination of patent, copyright, trademark and trade secret protections, confidentiality
procedures, and contractual provisions. The nature and extent of legal protection associated with each such intellectual property
right depends on, among other things, the type of intellectual property right and the given jurisdiction in which such right arises.
We believe that our intellectual property rights are valuable and important to our business.
Nonetheless, our intellectual property rights may not be successfully asserted in the future or may be invalidated,
circumvented or challenged. In addition, the laws and enforcement of the laws of various foreign countries where our products are
distributed do not protect our intellectual property rights to the same extent as U.S. laws. Enforcement of intellectual property rights
against alleged infringers can sometimes lead to costly litigation and counterclaims. Our inability to protect our proprietary
information could harm our business.
From time to time, we receive claims alleging infringement of a third party’s intellectual property rights, including patents.
Disputes involving our intellectual property rights or those of another party have in the past and may in the future lead to, among
other things, costly litigation or product shipment delays, which could harm our business.
2019 Form 10-K 11
Table of Contents
We retain ownership of software we develop. Our combined hybrid offerings include both desktop software and cloud
functionality. Desktop software is licensed to users pursuant to ‘click through’ or signed license agreements containing restrictions
on duplication, disclosure, and transfer. Cloud software and associated services are provided to users pursuant to on-line or signed
terms of service agreements containing restrictions on access and use.
We believe that because of the limitations of laws protecting our intellectual property and the rapid, ongoing technological
changes in both the computer hardware and software industries, we must rely principally upon software engineering and marketing
skills to continually maintain and enhance our competitive market position.
While we have recovered some revenue resulting from the unauthorized use of our software solutions, we are unable to
measure the full extent to which piracy of our software products exists. We believe, however, that software piracy is and can be
expected to be a persistent problem that negatively impacts our revenue and financial results. We believe that our transition from
perpetual use software licenses to a subscription-based business model combined with the change from desktop to cloud-based
computing will shift the incentives and means by which software is pirated.
In addition, through various licensing arrangements, we receive certain rights to intellectual property of others. We expect to
maintain current licensing arrangements and to secure licensing arrangements in the future, as needed and to the extent available on
reasonable terms and conditions, to support continued development and sales of our products and services. Some of these licensing
arrangements require or may require royalty payments and other licensing fees. The amount of these payments and fees may
depend on various factors, including but not limited to: the structure of royalty payments, offsetting considerations, if any, and the
degree of use of the licensed technology.
See Item 1A, “Risk Factors,” for further discussion of risks related to protecting our intellectual property.
PRODUCTION AND SUPPLIERS
The production of our software products and services involves duplication or hosting of software media. The way that we
deliver software has evolved during our business model transition. For certain cloud-based products, we use a combination of co-
located hosting facilities and increasingly Amazon Web Services and to a lesser degree other infrastructure-as-a-service providers.
We offer customers an electronic software download option for both initial product fulfillment and subsequent product updates.
Customers who choose electronic fulfillment receive the latest version of the software from our vendor’s secure servers. Customers
may also obtain our software through media such as DVDs and USB flash drives available from multiple sources. The purchase of
media and the transfer of the software programs onto media for distribution to customers are performed by us and by licensed
subcontractors. Packaging materials are produced to our specifications by outside sources. Production is performed in leased
facilities operated by independent third-party contractors. To date, we have not experienced any material difficulties or delays in the
production of our software and documentation.
EMPLOYEES
As of January 31, 2019, we employed approximately 9,600 people. None of our employees in the United States are
represented by a labor union. In certain foreign countries, our employees are represented by work councils. We have never
experienced any work stoppages and believe our employee relations are good. Reliance upon employees in other countries entails
various risks and changes in these foreign countries, such as government instability or regulation unfavorable to foreign-owned
businesses, which could negatively impact our business in the future.
2019 Form 10-K 12
Table of Contents
ACQUISITIONS
Over the past three years, we acquired new technology or supplemented our existing technology by purchasing businesses or
technology related assets focused in specific markets or industries. For the fiscal years ended January 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, we
acquired companies all of which were accounted for as business combinations. The following were significant acquisitions for
fiscal years 2019, 2018, and 2017:
Date of closing   Company   Details
January 2019 BuildingConnected, Inc.
("BuildingConnected")The acquisition of BuildingConnected will enable Autodesk to add bid-management
capabilities to its construction portfolio.
December 2018 PlanGrid, Inc.
("PlanGrid")The acquisition of PlanGrid will enable Autodesk to of fer a more comprehensive, cloud-
based construction platform.
July 2018
 Assemble Systems, Inc.
("Assemble Systems")The acquisition of Assemble Systems will enable Autodesk's customers to influence, query
and connect BIM data to key workflows across bid management, estimating, scheduling,
site management and finance.
GLOSSARY OF TERMS
Annualized Recurring Revenue (ARR)—Represents the annualized value of our average monthly recurring revenue for the
preceding three months. "Maintenance plan ARR” captures ARR relating to traditional maintenance attached to perpetual licenses.
"Subscription plan ARR" captures ARR relating to subscription offerings. Refer to the definition of recurring revenue below for
more details on what is included within ARR. Recurring revenue acquired with the acquisition of a business is captured when total
subscriptions are captured in our systems and may cause variability in the comparison of this calculation.
ARR is currently one of our key performance metrics to assess the health and trajectory of our business. ARR should be
viewed independently of revenue and deferred revenue as ARR is a performance metric and is not intended to be combined with
any of these items.
Annualized Revenue Per Subscription (ARPS)—Is calculated by dividing our annualized recurring revenue by the total
number of subscriptions.
Billings—Represents total revenue plus net change in deferred revenue from the beginning to the end of the period.
Cloud Service Offerings—Represents individual term-based offerings deployed through web browser technologies or in a
hybrid software and cloud configuration. Cloud service offerings that are bundled with other product offerings are not captured as a
separate cloud service offering.
Constant Currency (CC) Growth Rates—We attempt to represent the changes in the underlying business operations by
eliminating fluctuations caused by changes in foreign currency exchange rates as well as eliminating hedge gains or losses recorded
within the current and comparative periods. We calculate constant currency growth rates by (i) applying the applicable prior period
exchange rates to current period results and (ii) excluding any gains or losses from foreign currency hedge contracts that are
reported in the current and comparative periods.
Core Business—Represents the combination of maintenance, product, and EBA.
Enterprise Business Agreements (EBAs)—Represents programs providing enterprise customers with token-based access or a
fixed maximum number of seats to a broad pool of Autodesk products over a defined contract term.
Free Cash Flow—Represents cash flow from operating activities minus capital expenditures.
Industry Collections—Autodesk Industry Collections are a combination of products and services that target a specific user
objective and support a set of workflows for that objective. Our Industry Collections consist of: Autodesk Architecture, Engineering
and Construction Collection, Autodesk Product Design & Manufacturing Collection, and Autodesk Media and Entertainment
Collection. We introduced Industry Collections effective August 1, 2016 to replace our suites.
Other Revenue—Consists of revenue from consulting, training and other services, and is recognized over time as the services
are performed. Other revenue also includes software license revenue from the sale of products which do not incorporate substantial
cloud services and is recognized up front.
2019 Form 10-K 13
Table of Contents
Subscription Plan—Comprises our term-based product subscriptions, cloud service offerings, and EBAs. Subscriptions
represent a combined hybrid offering of desktop software and cloud functionality which provides a device-independent,
collaborative design workflow for designers and their stakeholders. With subscription, customers can use our software anytime,
anywhere, and get access to the latest updates to previous versions.
Maintenance Plan—Our maintenance plans provide our customers with a cost effective and predictable budgetary option to
obtain the productivity benefits of our new releases and enhancements when and if released during the term of their contracts.
Under our maintenance plans, customers are eligible to receive unspecified upgrades when and if available, and technical support.
We recognize maintenance revenue over the term of the agreements, generally one year.
Product Subscription—Provides customers the most flexible, cost-effective way to access and manage 3D design,
engineering, and entertainment software tools. Our product subscriptions currently represent a hybrid of desktop and SaaS
functionality, which provides a device-independent, collaborative design workflow for designers and their stakeholders.
Recurring Revenue—Consists of the revenue for the period from our traditional maintenance plans and revenue from our
subscription plan offerings. It excludes subscription revenue related to consumer product offerings, select Creative Finishing
product offerings, education offerings, and third party products. Recurring revenue acquired with the acquisition of a business is
captured when total subscriptions are captured in our systems and may cause variability in the comparison of this calculation.
Subscription Revenue—Includes subscription fees from product subscriptions, cloud service offerings, and EBAs.
Total Deferred Revenue—Is calculated by adding together total short term, long term, and unbilled deferred
revenue.
Total Subscriptions—Consists of subscriptions from our maintenance plans and subscription plan offerings that are active and
paid as of the fiscal year end date. For certain cloud service offerings and EBAs, subscriptions represent the monthly average
activity reported within the last three months of the fiscal quarter end date. Total subscriptions do not include education offerings,
consumer product offerings, select Creative Finishing product offerings, Autodesk Buzzsaw, Autodesk Constructware, and third
party products. Subscriptions acquired with the acquisition of a business are captured once the data conforms to our subscription
count methodology and when added, may cause variability in the comparison of this calculation.
Unbilled Deferred Revenue—Unbilled deferred revenue represents contractually stated or committed orders under early
renewal and multi-year billing plans for subscription, services and maintenance for which the associated deferred revenue has not
been recognized. Under FASB Accounting Standards Codification ("ASC") Topic 606, unbilled deferred revenue is not included as
a receivable or deferred revenue on our Consolidated Balance Sheet.
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
 
We operate in a rapidly changing environment that involves significant risks, a number of which are beyond our control. In
addition to the other information contained in this Form 10-K, the following discussion highlights some of these risks and the
possible impact of these factors on our business, financial condition, and future results of operations. If any of the following risks
actually occur, our business, financial condition, or results of operations may be adversely impacted, causing the trading price of
our common stock to decline. In addition, these risks and uncertainties may impact the “forward-looking” statements described
elsewhere in this Form 10-K and in the documents incorporated herein by reference. They could affect our actual results of
operations, causing them to differ materially from those expressed in “forward-looking” statements.
Global economic and political conditions may further impact our industries, business and financial results.
Our overall performance depends largely upon domestic and worldwide economic and political conditions. The United States
and other international economies have experienced cyclical downturns from time to time in which economic activity was impacted
by falling demand for a variety of goods and services, restricted credit, poor liquidity, decreased government spending, reduced
corporate profitability, volatility in credit, equity and foreign exchange markets, bankruptcies and overall uncertainty with respect
to the economy. These economic conditions can occur abruptly. If economic growth in countries where we do business slows or if
such countries experience further economic recessions, customers may delay or reduce technology purchases. Our customers
include government entities, including the U.S. federal government, and if spending cuts impede the ability of governments to
purchase our products and services, our revenue could decline. In addition, a number of our customers rely, directly and indirectly,
on government spending.
2019 Form 10-K 14
Table of Contents
Geopolitical trends toward nationalism and protectionism and the weakening or dissolution of international trade pacts may
increase the cost of, or otherwise interfere with, conducting business. These trends have increased levels of political and economic
unpredictability globally, and may increase the volatility of global financial markets; the impact of such developments on the global
economy remains uncertain. Political instability or adverse political developments in any of the countries in which we do business
could harm our business, results of operations and financial condition.
A financial sector credit crisis could impair credit availability and the financial stability of our customers, including our
distribution partners and channels. A disruption in the financial markets may also have an effect on our derivative counter-parties
and could also impair our banking partners, on which we rely for operating cash management. Any of these events could harm our
business, results of operations and financial condition.
Our strategy to develop and introduce new products and services exposes us to risks such as limited customer acceptance, costs
related to product defects, and large expenditures, each of which may not result in additional net revenue or could result in
decreased net revenue.
Rapid technological changes, as well as changes in customer requirements and preferences, characterize the software industry.
Just as the transition from mainframes to personal computers transformed the industry 30 years ago, the software industry has
undergone a transition from developing and selling perpetual licenses and on-premises products to cloud, mobile and social
applications. Customers are also reconsidering the manner in which they purchase software products, which requires us to
constantly evaluate our business model and strategy. In response, we are focused on providing solutions to enable our customers to
be more agile and collaborative on their projects. We devote significant resources to the development of new technologies. In
addition, we frequently introduce new business models or methods that require a considerable investment of technical and financial
resources such as our introduction of flexible subscription and service offerings. It is uncertain whether these strategies will prove
successful or whether we will be able to develop the necessary infrastructure and business models more quickly than our
competitors. We are making such investments through further development and enhancement of our existing products and services,
as well as through acquisitions. Such investments may not result in sufficient revenue generation to justify their costs and could
result in decreased net revenue or profitability. If we are not able to meet customer requirements, either with respect to our software
or the manner in which we provide such products, or if we are not able to adapt our business model to meet our customers'
requirements, our business, financial condition or results of operations may be adversely impacted.
In particular, a critical component of our growth strategy is to have customers of our AutoCAD and AutoCAD LT products
expand their portfolios to include our other offerings and cloud-based functionality. We want customers using individual Autodesk
products to expand their portfolio with our other offerings and cloud-based functionality, and we are taking steps to accelerate this
migration. At times, sales of our AutoCAD and AutoCAD LT or individual Autodesk flagship products have decreased without a
corresponding increase in Industry Collections or cloud-based functionality revenue or without purchases of customer seats to our
Industry Collections. Should this continue, our results of operations will be adversely affected.
Our executive management team must act quickly, continuously, and with vision, given the rapidly changing customer
expectations and technology advancements inherent in the software industry, the extensive and complex efforts required to create
useful and widely accepted products and the rapid evolution of cloud computing, mobile devices, new computing platforms, and
other technologies, such as consumer products. Although we have articulated a strategy that we believe will fulfill these challenges,
if we fail to execute properly on that strategy or adapt that strategy as market conditions evolve, we may fail to meet our customers'
expectations, fail to compete with our competitors' products and technology, and lose the confidence of our channel partners and
employees. This in turn could adversely affect our business and financial performance.
Our business could suffer as a result of risks, costs, charges and integration risks associated with strategic acquisitions and
investments such as the recent acquisitions of Assemble Systems, Inc., PlanGrid, Inc. and BuildingConnected, Inc.
We regularly acquire or invest in businesses, software solutions and technologies that are complementary to our business
through acquisitions, strategic alliances or equity or debt investments. For example, we recently acquired Assemble Systems,
PlanGrid and BuildingConnected. The risks associated with such acquisitions include, among others, the difficulty of assimilating
solutions, operations and personnel, inheriting liabilities such as intellectual property infringement claims, the failure to realize
anticipated revenue and cost projections, the requirement to test and assimilate the internal control processes of the acquired
business in accordance with the requirements of Section 404 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, and the diversion of management's
time and attention.
2019 Form 10-K 15
Table of Contents
In addition, such acquisitions and investments involve other risks such as:
•the inability to retain customers, key employees, vendors, distributors, business partners, and other entities associated with
the acquired business;
•the potential that due diligence of the acquired business or solution does not identify significant problems;
•exposure to litigation or other claims in connection with, or inheritance of claims or litigation risk as a result of, an
acquisition, including but not limited to, claims from terminated employees, customers, or other third parties;
•the potential for incompatible business cultures;
•significantly higher than anticipated transaction or integration-related costs;
•the potential additional exposure to fluctuations in currency exchange rates; and
•the potential impact on relationships with existing customers, vendors, and distributors as business partners as a result of
acquiring another business.
We may not be successful in overcoming such risks, and such acquisitions and investments may negatively impact our
business. In addition, such acquisitions and investments have in the past and may in the future contribute to potential fluctuations in
our quarterly financial results. These fluctuations could arise from transaction-related costs and charges associated with eliminating
redundant expenses or write-offs of impaired assets recorded in connection with acquisitions and investments. These costs or
charges could negatively impact our financial results for a given period, cause quarter to quarter variability in our financial results
or negatively impact our financial results for several future periods.
We are dependent on international revenue and operations, exposing us to significant regulatory, global economic, intellectual
property, collections, currency exchange rate, taxation, political instability and other risks, which could adversely impact our
financial results.
We are dependent on our international operations for a significant portion of our revenue. International net revenue
represented 66% and 64% of our net revenue in fiscal 2019 and 2018, respectively. Our international revenue, including that from
emerging economies, is subject to general economic and political conditions in foreign markets, including conditions in foreign
markets resulting from economic and political conditions in the U.S. Our revenue is also impacted by the relative geographical and
country mix of our revenue over time. At times, these factors adversely impact our international revenue, and consequently our
business as a whole. Our dependency on international revenue makes us much more exposed to global economic and political
trends, which can negatively impact our financial results, even if our results in the U.S. are strong for a particular period.
We anticipate that our international operations will continue to account for a significant portion of our net revenue, and, as we
expand our international development, sales and marketing expertise, will provide significant support to our overall efforts in
countries outside of the U.S.
Risks inherent in our international operations include:
•economic volatility;
•tariffs, quotas, and other trade barriers and restrictions;
•fluctuating currency exchange rates, including devaluations, currency controls and inflation, and risks related to any
hedging activities we undertake;
•unexpected changes in regulatory requirements and practices;
•delays resulting from difficulty in obtaining export licenses for certain technology;
•different purchase patterns as compared to the developed world;
2019 Form 10-K 16
Table of Contents
•operating in locations with a higher incidence of corruption and fraudulent business practices, particularly in emerging
economies;
•increasing enforcement by the U.S. under the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, and adoption of stricter anti-corruption laws
in certain countries, including the United Kingdom;
•difficulties in staffing and managing foreign sales and development operations;
•local competition;
•longer collection cycles for accounts receivable;
•U.S. and foreign tax law changes impacting how multinational companies are taxed;
•tax arrangements with foreign governments, including our ability to meet and renew the terms of those tax arrangements;
•laws regarding the management of and access to data and public networks;
•possible future limitations upon foreign owned businesses;
•increased financial accounting and reporting burdens and complexities;
•inadequate local infrastructure;
•greater difficulty in protecting intellectual property;
•software piracy; and
•other factors beyond our control, including popular uprisings, terrorism, war, natural disasters, and diseases.
Some of our business partners also have international operations and are subject to the risks described above.
The "Brexit" vote has exacerbated and may further exacerbate many of the risks and uncertainties described above. The
withdrawal of the United Kingdom from the European Union could, among other potential outcomes, adversely affect the tax, tax
treaty, currency, operational, legal and regulatory regimes to which our businesses in the region are subject. The withdrawal could
also, among other potential outcomes, disrupt the free movement of goods, services and people between the United Kingdom and
the European Union and significantly disrupt trade between the United Kingdom and the European Union and other parties. There
remains significant risk that the United Kingdom will exit from the European Union without agreement between the European
Union and United Kingdom on terms addressing customs and trade matters. Further, uncertainty around these and related issues
could lead to adverse effects on the economy of the United Kingdom, European Union and the other economies in which we
operate.
In addition, the current U.S. administration has instituted or proposed changes to foreign trade policy including the
negotiation or termination of trade agreements, the imposition of tariffs on products imported from certain countries, economic
sanctions on individuals, corporations or countries and other government regulations affecting trade between the United States and
other countries in which we do business. New or increased tariffs and other changes in U.S. trade policy could trigger retaliatory
actions by affected countries, and certain foreign governments, including the Chinese government, have instituted or are
considering imposing trade sanctions on certain U.S. manufactured goods. The escalation of protectionist or retaliatory trade
measures in either the United States or any other countries in which we do business, such as a change in tariff structures, export
compliance or other trade policies, may increase the cost of, or otherwise interfere with, conducting our business.
Even if we are able to successfully manage the risks of international operations, our business may be adversely affected if our
business partners are not able to successfully manage these risks.
2019 Form 10-K 17
Table of Contents
Security incidents may compromise the integrity of our or our customers’ offerings, services, data or intellectual property, harm our
reputation, damage our competitiveness, create additional liability and adversely impact our financial results.
As we digitize Autodesk and use cloud and web-based technologies to leverage customer data to deliver the total customer
experience, we are exposed to increased security risks and the potential for unauthorized access to, or improper use of, our and our
customers' information. Like other software offerings and systems, ours are vulnerable to security incidents. We devote resources to
maintain the security and integrity of our systems, offerings, services and applications (online, mobile and desktop). We accomplish
this by enhancing security features, conducting penetration tests, code hardening, releasing security vulnerability updates and
accelerating our incident response time. Despite these efforts, we may not prevent security incidents.
Hackers regularly have targeted our systems, offerings, services and applications, and we expect them to do so in the future.
Security incidents could disrupt the proper functioning of our systems, solutions or services; cause errors in the output of our
customers' work; allow unauthorized access to sensitive data or intellectual property, including proprietary or confidential
information of ours or our customers; or cause other destructive outcomes.
The risk of a security incident, particularly through cyber attack or cyber intrusion, including by computer hackers, foreign
governments and cyber terrorists, has increased as the number, intensity and sophistication of attempted attacks and intrusions from
around the world have increased. These threats include but are not limited to identity theft, unauthorized access, DNS attacks,
wireless network attacks, viruses and worms, advanced persistent threat (APT), application centric attacks, peer-to-peer attacks,
phishing, malicious file uploads, backdoor trojans and distributed denial of service (DDoS) attacks. In addition, third parties may
attempt to fraudulently induce our employees, vendors, partners or users to disclose information to gain access to our data or our
users’ data and there is the risk of employee, contractor, or vendor error or malfeasance. Despite efforts to create security barriers to
such threats, it is virtually impossible for us to entirely eliminate this risk.
If any of the foregoing security incidents were to occur, our reputation may suffer, our competitive position may be
diminished, customers may stop paying for our solutions and services, we could face regulator inquiry, lawsuits and potential
liability, and our financial performance could be negatively impacted.
Increasing regulatory focus on privacy issues and expanding laws may impact our business or expose us to increased liability.
Our strategy to digitize Autodesk involves increasing our use of cloud and web-based technologies and applications to
leverage customer data to improve our offerings for the benefit of our customers. To accomplish this strategy, we must collect
customer data, which may include personal data. Federal, state and foreign government privacy and data security laws apply to the
treatment of personal data. Governments, regulators, the plaintiffs’ bar, privacy advocates and customers have increased their focus
on how companies collect, process, use, store, share and transmit personal data.
The General Data Protection Regulation ("GDPR") is applicable in all EU member states The GDPR introduced new data
protection requirements in the EU and substantial fines for non-compliance. In addition, in June 2018, California enacted the
California Consumer Privacy Act (the "CCPA"), which takes effect in January 2020.  The CCPA will, among other things, give
California residents expanded rights to access and delete their personal information, opt out of certain personal information sharing,
and receive detailed information about how their personal information is used.  The CCPA was amended in September 2018, and it
is unclear whether further modifications will be made to this legislation or how it will be interpreted.  We cannot yet predict the
impact of the CCPA on our business or operations, but it may require us to modify our data processing practices and policies and to
incur substantial costs and expenses in an effort to comply.
The GDPR, CCPA and other state and global laws and regulations increased our responsibility and potential liability in
relation to personal data, and we have and will continue to put in place additional processes and programs to demonstrate
compliance. Any failure to comply with the GDPR or other data privacy laws could lead to government enforcement actions and
significant penalties. Any perceived privacy right violation could result in reputational harm, third-party claims, lawsuits or
investigations.
Additionally, we store customer information and content and if our customers fail to comply with contractual obligations or
applicable laws, it could result in litigation or reputational harm to us. The GDPR, CCPA other laws and self-regulatory codes may
affect our ability to reach current and prospective customers, to understand how our offerings and services are being used, to
respond to customer requests allowed under the laws, and to implement our new business models effectively. These new laws and
regulations would similarly affect our competitors as well as our customers. These requirements could impact demand for our
offerings and services and result in more onerous contract obligations.
2019 Form 10-K 18
Table of Contents
We rely on third-parties to provide us with a number of operational and technical services; third-party security incidents could
expose us to liability, harm our reputation, damage our competitiveness and adversely impact our financial performance.
We rely on third parties, such as Amazon Web Services, to provide us with operational and technical services. These third
parties may have access to our systems, provide hosting services, or otherwise process data about us or our customers, employees,
or partners. Any third-party security incident could compromise the integrity of, or availability or result in the theft of, data. In
addition, our operations, or the operations of our customers or partners, could be negatively affected in the event of a security
breach, and could be subject to the loss or theft of confidential or proprietary information, including source code. Unauthorized
access to data and other confidential or proprietary information may be obtained through break-ins, network breaches by
unauthorized parties, employee theft or misuse, or other misconduct. If any of the foregoing were to occur, our reputation may
suffer, our competitive position may be diminished, customers may buy fewer of our offerings and services, we could face lawsuits
and potential liability, and our financial performance could be negatively impacted.
Delays in service from third-party service providers could expose us to liability, harm our reputation, damage our competitiveness
and adversely impact our financial performance.
From time to time, we may rely on a single or limited number of suppliers, or upon suppliers in a single country, for the
provision of various services and materials that we use in the operation of our business and production of our solutions. The
inability of such third parties to satisfy our requirements could disrupt our business operations or make it more difficult for us to
implement our business strategy. If any of these situations were to occur, our reputation could be harmed, we could be subject to
third party liability, including under data protection and privacy laws in certain jurisdictions, and our financial performance could
be negatively impacted.
We are investing in resources to update and improve our information technology systems to digitize Autodesk and support our
customers. Should our investments not succeed, or if delays or other issues with new or existing information technology systems
disrupt our operations, our business could be harmed.
We rely on our network and data center infrastructure, technology systems and our websites for our development, marketing,
operational, support, sales, accounting and financial reporting activities. We continually invest resources to update and improve
these systems in order to meet the evolving requirements of our business and customers. In particular, our transition to cloud-based
products and a subscription-only business model involves considerable investment in the development of technologies, as well as
back-office systems for technical, financial, compliance and sales resources.
Such improvements are often complex, costly and time consuming. In addition, such improvements can be challenging to
integrate with our existing technology systems, or may uncover problems with our existing technology systems. Unsuccessful
implementation of hardware or software updates and improvements could result in disruption in our business operations, loss of
customers, loss of revenue, errors in our accounting and financial reporting or damage to our reputation, all of which could harm
our business.
We may not be able to predict subscription renewal rates and their impact on our future revenue and operating results.
Our customers are not obligated to renew their subscriptions for our offerings, and they may elect not to renew. We cannot
assure renewal rates, or the mix of subscriptions renewals. Customer renewal rates may decline or fluctuate due to a number of
factors, including offering pricing, competitive offerings, customer satisfaction, and reductions in customer spending levels or
customer activity due to economic downturns or financial markets uncertainty. If our customers do not renew their subscriptions or
if they renew on less favorable terms, our revenues may decline.
Our software is highly complex and may contain undetected errors, defects or vulnerabilities, each of which could harm our
business and financial performance.
The software solutions that we offer are complex and, despite extensive testing and quality control, may contain errors,
defects or vulnerabilities. Some errors, defects and vulnerabilities in our software solutions may only be discovered after they have
been released. Any errors, defects or vulnerabilities could result in the need for corrective releases to our software solutions,
damage to our reputation, loss of revenue, an increase in subscription cancellations or lack of market acceptance of our offerings,
any of which would likely harm our business and financial performance.
2019 Form 10-K 19
Table of Contents
Existing and increased competition and rapidly evolving technological changes may reduce our revenue and profits.
The software industry has limited barriers to entry, and the availability of computing devices with continually expanding
performance at progressively lower prices contributes to the ease of market entry. The software industry has undergone a transition
from developing and selling perpetual licenses and on-premises products to cloud, mobile and social applications. This shift further
lowers barriers to entry and poses a disruptive challenge to established software companies. The markets in which we compete are
characterized by vigorous competition, both by entry of competitors with innovative technologies and by consolidation of
companies with complementary offerings and technologies. In addition, some of our competitors in certain markets have greater
financial, technical, sales and marketing, and other resources. Furthermore, a reduction in the number and availability of compatible
third-party applications, or our inability to rapidly adapt to technological and customer preference changes, including those related
to cloud computing, mobile devices, and new computing platforms, may adversely affect the sale of our solutions. Because of these
and other factors, competitive conditions in the industry are likely to intensify in the future. Increased competition could result in
price reductions, reduced net revenue and profit margins and loss of market share, any of which would likely harm our business.
We are subject to governmental export and import controls that could impair our ability to compete in international markets or
subject us to liability if we violate the controls.
 
Our offerings are subject to U.S. export controls and economic sanctions laws and regulations that prohibit the delivery of
certain solutions and services without the required export authorizations or export to locations, governments, and persons targeted
by U.S. sanctions. While we have processes in place to prevent our offerings from being exported in violation of these laws,
including obtaining authorizations as appropriate and screening against U.S. government and international lists of restricted and
prohibited persons, we cannot guarantee that these processes will prevent all violations of export control and sanctions laws.
 
We also note that if our channel partners fail to obtain appropriate import, export or re-export licenses or permits, we may
also be adversely affected, through reputational harm as well as other negative consequences including government investigations
and penalties. We presently incorporate export control and sanctions compliance requirements in our channel partner agreements.
Complying with export control and sanctions regulations for a particular sale may be time-consuming and may result in the delay or
loss of sales opportunities. Violations of U.S. sanctions or export control laws can result in fines or penalties.
We are exposed to fluctuations in currency exchange rates that could negatively impact our financial results and cash flows.
Because we conduct a substantial portion of our business outside the U.S., we face exposure to adverse movements in foreign
currency exchange rates. These exposures may change over time as business practices evolve and economic conditions change. Our
exposure to adverse movements in foreign currency exchange rates could have a material adverse impact on our financial results
and cash flows.
We use derivative instruments to manage a portion of our cash flow exposure to fluctuations in foreign currency exchange
rates. As part of our risk management strategy, we use foreign currency contracts to manage a portion of our exposures of
underlying assets, liabilities, and other obligations, which exist as part of our ongoing business operations. These foreign currency
instruments have maturities that extend for one to twelve months in the future, and provide us with some protection against
currency exposures. However, our attempts to hedge against these risks may not be completely successful, resulting in an adverse
impact on our financial results.
The fluctuations of currencies in which we conduct business can both increase and decrease our overall revenue and expenses
for any given fiscal period. Although our foreign currency cash flow hedge program extends beyond the current quarter in order to
reduce our exposure to foreign currency volatility, we do not attempt to completely mitigate this risk, and in any case, will incur
transaction fees in adopting such hedging programs. Such volatility, even when it increases our revenues or decreases our expenses,
impacts our ability to accurately predict our future results and earnings.
In addition, countries in which we operate may be classified as highly inflationary economies, requiring special
accounting and financial reporting treatment for such operations, or such countries’ currencies may be devalued, or both, which
may adversely impact our business operations and financial results.
2019 Form 10-K 20
Table of Contents
If we do not maintain good relationships with the members of our distribution channel, our ability to generate revenue will be
adversely affected. If our distribution channel suffers financial losses, becomes financially unstable or insolvent, or is not provided
the right mix of incentives to sell our subscriptions, our ability to generate revenue will be adversely affected.
We sell our software products both directly to end-users and through a network of distributors and resellers. For fiscal 2019
and fiscal 2018, approximately 71% and 70%, respectively, of our revenue was derived from indirect channel sales through
distributors and resellers and we expect that the majority of our revenue will continue to be derived from indirect channel sales in
the near future. Our ability to effectively distribute our solutions depends in part upon the financial and business condition of our
distributor and reseller network. Computer software distributors and resellers typically are not highly capitalized, have previously
experienced difficulties during times of economic contraction and experienced difficulties during the past several years. We have
processes to ensure that we assess the creditworthiness of distributors and resellers prior to our sales to them. In the past we have
taken steps to support them, and may take additional steps in the future, such as extending credit terms and providing temporary
discounts. These steps, if taken, could harm our financial results. If our distributors and resellers were to become insolvent, they
would not be able to maintain their business and sales, or provide customer support services, which would negatively impact our
business and revenue.
We rely significantly upon major distributors and resellers in both the U.S. and international regions, including the distributor
Tech Data. Tech Data accounted for 35% and 31% of our total net revenue for fiscal 2019 and 2018, respectively. Although we
believe that we are not substantially dependent on Tech Data, if Tech Data were to experience a significant disruption with its
business or if our relationship with Tech Data were to significantly deteriorate, it is possible that our ability to sell to end users
would be, at least temporarily, negatively impacted. This could in turn negatively impact our financial results.
Over time, we have modified and will continue to modify aspects of our relationship with our distributors and resellers, such
as their incentive programs, pricing to them and our distribution model to motivate and reward them for aligning their businesses
with our strategy and business objectives. Changes in these relationships and underlying programs could negatively impact their
business and harm our business. Further, our distributors and resellers may lose confidence in our business, move to competitive
products, or may not have the skills or ability to support customers. The loss of or a significant reduction in business with those
distributors or resellers could harm our business. In particular, if one or more of such distributors or resellers were unable to meet
their obligations with respect to accounts payable to us, we could be forced to write off such
accounts and may be required to delay the recognition of revenue on future sales to these customers. These events could have
a material adverse effect on our financial results.
Our financial results fluctuate within each quarter and from quarter to quarter making our future revenue and financial results
difficult to predict.
Our quarterly financial results have fluctuated in the past and will continue to do so in the future. These fluctuations could
cause our stock price to change significantly or experience declines. We also provide investors with quarterly and annual financial
forward-looking guidance that could prove to be inaccurate as a result of these fluctuations. In addition to the other factors
described in this Part I, Item 1A, some of the factors that could cause our financial results to fluctuate include:
•general market, economic, business, and political conditions in particular geographies, including Europe, APAC, and
emerging economies;
•failure to produce sufficient revenue, ARR, billings, subscription, profitability and cash flow growth;
•failure to accurately predict the impact of acquired businesses or to identify and realize the anticipated benefits of
acquisitions, and successfully integrate such acquired businesses and technologies;
•failure to manage spend;
•changes in subscription mix, pricing pressure or changes in subscription pricing;
•weak or negative growth in one or more of the industries we serve, including AEC, manufacturing, and digital media and
entertainment markets;
•the success of new business or sales initiatives;
2019 Form 10-K 21
Table of Contents
•security breaches, related reputational harm, and potential financial penalties to customers and government entities;
•restructuring or other accounting charges and unexpected costs or other operating expenses;
•timing of additional investments in our technologies or deployment of our services;
•changes in revenue recognition or other accounting guidelines employed by us and/or established by the Financial
Accounting Standards Board, Securities Exchange Commission or other rule-making bodies;
•fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates and the effectiveness of our hedging activity;
•dependence on and the timing of large transactions;
•changes in billings linearity;
•adjustments arising from ongoing or future tax examinations;
•the ability of governments around the world to adopt fiscal policies, meet their financial and debt obligations, and to
finance infrastructure projects;
•lower renewals of our maintenance program;
•failure to expand our AutoCAD and AutoCAD LT customer base to related design products and services;
•our ability to rapidly adapt to technological and customer preference changes, including those related to cloud computing,
mobile devices and new computing platforms;
•the timing of the introduction of new products by us or our competitors;
•the financial and business condition of our reseller and distribution channels;
•perceived or actual technical or other problems with a product or combination of subscriptions;
•unexpected or negative outcomes of matters and expenses relating to litigation or regulatory inquiries;
•increases in cloud functionality-related expenses;
•timing of releases and retirements of offerings;
•changes in tax laws or regulations, tax arrangements with foreign governments or accounting rules, such as increased use
of fair value measures;
•changes in sales compensation practices;
•failure to effectively implement and maintain our copyright legalization programs, especially in developing countries;
•renegotiation or termination of royalty or intellectual property arrangements;
•interruptions or terminations in the business of our consultants or third-party developers;
•the timing and degree of expected investments in growth and efficiency opportunities;
•failure to achieve continued success in technology advancements;
•catastrophic events or natural disasters;
•regulatory compliance costs;
2019 Form 10-K 22
Table of Contents
•potential goodwill impairment charges related to prior acquisitions; and
•failure to appropriately estimate the scope of services under consulting arrangements.
We have also experienced fluctuations in financial results in interim periods in certain geographic regions due to seasonality
or regional economic or political conditions. In particular, our financial results in Europe during our third quarter are usually
affected by a slower summer period, and our APAC operations typically experience seasonal slowing in our third and fourth
quarters.
Our operating expenses are based in part on our expectations for future revenue and are relatively fixed in the short term.
Accordingly, any revenue shortfall below expectations has had, and in the future could have, an immediate and significant adverse
effect on our profitability. Greater than anticipated expenses or a failure to maintain rigorous cost controls would also negatively
affect profitability.
Because we derive a substantial portion of our net revenue from a small number of solutions, including our AutoCAD-based
software products and collections, if these offerings are not successful, our revenue will be adversely affected.
We derive a substantial portion of our net revenue from sales of subscriptions of a limited number of our offerings, including
AutoCAD software, solutions based on AutoCAD, which include our collections that serve specific markets and products that are
interoperable with AutoCAD. Any factor adversely affecting sales of these subscriptions, including the product release cycle,
market acceptance, product competition, performance and reliability, reputation, price competition, economic and market
conditions and the availability of third-party applications, would likely harm our financial results. During fiscal 2019 and fiscal
2018, combined revenue from our AutoCAD and AutoCAD LT products, not including collections having AutoCAD or AutoCAD
LT as a component, represented 28% and 27% of our total net revenue, respectively.
Our debt service obligations may adversely affect our financial condition and cash flows from operations.
We have $2.1 billion of debt, consisting of notes due at various times from June 2020 to June 2027 and a delayed draw term
loan facility in the aggregate principal amount of $500.0 million due in December 2020, each as described in Part 2, Item 8. We
also entered into a credit agreement that provides for an unsecured revolving loan facility in the aggregate principal amount of
$650.0 million, with an option to be increased up to $1.0 billion, as described in Part 2, Item 8. Maintenance of our indebtedness,
contractual restrictions, and additional issuances of indebtedness could:
•cause us to dedicate a substantial portion of our cash flows from operations towards debt service obligations and principal
repayments;
•increase our vulnerability to adverse changes in general economic, industry and competitive conditions;
•limit our flexibility in planning for, or reacting to, changes in our business and our industry;
•impair our ability to obtain future financing for working capital, capital expenditures, acquisitions, general corporate or
other purposes; and
•due to limitations within the debt instruments, restrict our ability to grant liens on property, enter into certain mergers,
dispose of all or substantially all of the assets of Autodesk and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, materially change our
business and incur subsidiary indebtedness, subject to customary exceptions.
We are required to comply with the covenants set forth in our debt instruments, such as an interest coverage ratio in effect
January 31, 2019 and a leverage ratio in effect July 31, 2019. If we breach any of the covenants and do not obtain a waiver from the
note holders or lenders, then, subject to applicable cure periods, we would not be able to incur additional indebtedness under the
credit agreement described in Part 2, Item 8 and any outstanding indebtedness may be declared immediately due and payable. In
addition, changes by any rating agency to our credit rating may negatively impact the value and liquidity of our securities. Under
certain circumstances, if our credit ratings are downgraded or other negative action is taken, the interest rate payable by us under
our credit agreement could increase. Downgrades in our credit ratings could also restrict our ability to obtain additional financing in
the future and could affect the terms of any such financing.
2019 Form 10-K 23
Table of Contents
If we are not able to adequately protect our proprietary rights, our business could be harmed.
We rely on a combination of patent, copyright and trademark laws, trade secret protections, confidentiality procedures and
contractual provisions to protect our proprietary rights. Despite such efforts to protect our proprietary rights, unauthorized parties
from time to time have copied aspects of our software or have obtained and used information that we regard as proprietary. Policing
unauthorized use of our software is time-consuming and costly. We are unable to measure the extent to which piracy of our
software exists and we expect that software piracy will remain a persistent problem, particularly in emerging economies.
Furthermore, our means of protecting our proprietary rights may not be adequate.
Additionally, we actively protect the secrecy of our confidential information and trade secrets, including our source code. If
unauthorized disclosure of our source code occurs, we could potentially lose future trade secret protection for that source code. The
loss of future trade secret protection could make it easier for third-parties to compete with our offerings by copying functionality,
which could adversely affect our financial performance and our reputation. We also seek to protect our confidential information and
trade secrets through the use of non-disclosure agreements with our customers, contractors, vendors and partners. However, it is
possible that our confidential information and trade secrets may be disclosed or published without our authorization. If this were to
occur, it may be difficult and/or costly for us to enforce our rights, and our financial performance and reputation could be
negatively impacted.
We may face intellectual property infringement claims that could be costly to defend and result in the loss of significant rights.
As more software patents are granted worldwide, the number of offerings and competitors in our industries grows and the
functionality of products in different industries overlaps, we expect that software developers will be increasingly subject to
infringement claims. Infringement or misappropriation claims have in the past been, and may in the future be, asserted against us,
and any such assertions could harm our business. Additionally, certain patent holders without products have become more
aggressive in threatening and pursuing litigation in attempts to obtain fees for licensing the right to use patents. Any such claims or
threats, whether with or without merit, have been and could in the future be time-consuming to defend, result in costly litigation
and diversion of resources, cause product delays or require us to enter into royalty or licensing agreements. In addition, such
royalty or license agreements, if required, may not be available on acceptable terms, if at all, which would likely harm our business.
From time to time we realign or introduce new business and sales initiatives; if we fail to successfully execute and manage these
initiatives, our results of operations could be negatively impacted.
As part of our effort to accommodate our customers' needs and demands and the rapid evolution of technology, we from time
to time evolve our business and sales initiatives such as realigning our development and marketing organizations, offering software
as a service, and realigning our internal resources in an effort to improve efficiency. We may take such actions without clear
indications that they will prove successful, and at times, we have been met with short-term challenges in the execution of such
initiatives. Market acceptance of any new business or sales initiative is dependent on our ability to match our customers' needs at
the right time and price. Often we have limited prior experience and operating history in these new areas of emphasis. If any of our
assumptions about expenses, revenue or revenue recognition principles from these initiatives proves incorrect, or our attempts to
improve efficiency are not successful, our actual results may vary materially from those anticipated, and our financial results will
be negatively impacted.
Net revenue, ARR, billings, earnings, cash flow or subscriptions shortfalls or the volatility of the market generally may cause the
market price of our stock to decline.
The market price for our common stock has experienced significant fluctuations and may continue to fluctuate significantly.
The market price for our common stock may be affected by a number of factors, including the other factors described in this Part I,
Item 1A and the following:
•shortfalls in our expected financial results, including net revenue, ARR, billings, earnings and cash flow or key
performance metrics, such as subscriptions;
•quarterly variations in our or our competitors' results of operations;
•general socio-economic, political or market conditions;
•changes in estimates of future results or recommendations or confusion on the part of analysts and investors about the
2019 Form 10-K 24
Table of Contents
short-term and long-term impact to our business;
•uncertainty about certain governments' abilities to repay debt or effect fiscal policy;
•the announcement of new offerings or enhancements by us or our competitors;
•unusual events such as significant acquisitions, divestitures, regulatory actions, and litigation;
•changes in laws, rules, or regulations applicable to our business;
•outstanding debt service obligations; and
•other factors, including factors unrelated to our operating performance, such as instability affecting the economy or the
operating performance of our competitors.
Significant changes in the price of our common stock could expose us to costly and time-consuming litigation. Historically,
after periods of volatility in the market price of a company's securities, a company becomes more susceptible to securities class
action litigation. This type of litigation is often expensive and diverts management's attention and resources.
Our business could be adversely affected if we are unable to attract and retain key personnel.
Our success and ability to invest and grow depend largely on our ability to attract and retain highly skilled technical,
professional, managerial, sales, and marketing personnel. Historically, competition for these key personnel has been intense. The
loss of services of any of our key personnel (including key personnel joining our company through acquisitions), the inability to
retain and attract qualified personnel in the future, or delays in hiring required personnel, particularly engineering and sales
personnel, could make it difficult to meet key objectives, such as timely and effective product introductions and financial goals.
Our investment portfolio consists of a variety of investment vehicles in a number of countries that are subject to interest rate trends,
market volatility, and other economic factors. If general economic conditions decline, this could cause the credit ratings of our
investments to deteriorate, illiquidity in the financial marketplace, and we may experience a decline in interest income and an
inability to sell our investments, leading to impairment in the value of our investments.
It is our policy to invest our cash, cash equivalents and marketable securities in highly liquid instruments with, and in the
custody of, financial institutions with high credit ratings and to limit the amounts invested with any one institution, type of security
and issuer. However, we are subject to general economic conditions, interest rate trends and volatility in the financial marketplace
that can affect the income that we receive from our investments, the net realizable value of our investments (including our cash,
cash equivalents and marketable securities) and our ability to sell them. Any one of these factors could reduce our investment
income, or result in material charges, which in turn could impact our overall net income (loss) and earnings (loss) per share.
From time to time we make direct investments in privately held companies. Privately held company investments are
considered inherently risky. The technologies and products these companies have under development are typically in the early
stages and may never materialize, which could result in a loss of all or a substantial part of our initial investment in these
companies. The evaluation of privately held companies is based on information that we request from these companies, which is not
subject to the same disclosure regulations as U.S. publicly traded companies, and as such, the basis for these evaluations is subject
to the timing and accuracy of the data received from these companies.
A loss on any of our investments may cause us to record an other-than-temporary impairment charge. The effect of this
charge could impact our overall net income (loss) and earnings (loss) per share. In any of these scenarios, our liquidity may be
negatively impacted, which in turn may prohibit us from making investments in our business, taking advantage of opportunities and
potentially meeting our financial obligations as they come due.
2019 Form 10-K 25
Table of Contents
We are subject to legal proceedings and regulatory inquiries, and we may be named in additional legal proceedings or become
involved in regulatory inquiries in the future, all of which are costly, distracting to our core business and could result in an
unfavorable outcome, or a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, results of operations, cash flows or the
trading prices for our securities.
We are involved in legal proceedings and receive inquiries from regulatory agencies. As the global economy has changed and
our business has evolved, we have seen an increase in litigation activity and regulatory inquiries. Like many other high technology
companies, the number and frequency of inquiries from U.S. and foreign regulatory agencies we have received regarding our
business and our business practices, and the business practices of others in our industry, have increased in recent years. In the event
that we are involved in significant disputes or are the subject of a formal action by a regulatory agency, we could be exposed to
costly and time consuming legal proceedings that could result in any number of outcomes. Any claims or regulatory actions
initiated by or against us, whether successful or not, could result in expensive costs of defense, costly damage awards, injunctive
relief, increased costs of business, fines or orders to change certain business practices, significant dedication of management time,
diversion of significant operational resources, or otherwise harm our business. In any of these cases, our financial results, results of
operations, cash flows or the trading prices for our securities could be negatively impacted.
We are subject to risks related to taxation in multiple jurisdictions.
We are a U.S.-based multinational company subject to tax in multiple U.S. and foreign tax jurisdictions. Our effective tax rate
is primarily based on our expected geographic mix of earnings, statutory rates, intercompany arrangements, including the manner in
which we develop, value and license our intellectual property, and enacted tax rules. Significant judgment is required in
determining our effective tax rate and in evaluating our tax positions on a worldwide basis. While we believe our tax positions,
including intercompany transfer pricing policies, are consistent with the tax laws in the jurisdictions in which we conduct our
business, it is possible that these positions may be overturned by jurisdictional tax authorities and may have a significant impact on
our effective tax rate.
Tax laws are dynamic and subject to change as new laws are passed and new interpretations of the law are issued or applied.
For example, the U.S. government enacted significant tax law changes in December 2017, the Tax Act, which impacted our tax
obligations and effective tax rate beginning in our fiscal 2018 tax year. Increasingly, governmental tax authorities are scrutinizing
corporate tax strategies. Many countries in the European Union, as well as other countries and organizations such as the
Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development, are actively considering changes to existing tax laws that, if enacted,
could increase our tax obligations in many countries where we do business. If U.S. or other foreign tax authorities change
applicable tax laws or successfully challenge the manner in which our profits are currently recognized, our overall taxes could
increase, and our business, financial condition or results of operations may be adversely impacted.
    
Uncertainties in the interpretation and application of the Tax Act could materially affect our tax obligations and effective tax rate.
The Tax Act was enacted on December 22, 2017, and provides broad and significant changes to the U.S. tax code and how the
U.S. imposes income tax on multinational corporations. Due to the complexity and varying interpretations of the Tax Act, the U.S.
Department of Treasury and other standard-setting bodies have been issuing and will be issuing regulations and interpretative
guidance that could significantly impact how we will apply the law and the ultimate impact to our results of operations from the
Tax Act.
The Tax Act requires complex computations to be performed that were not previously provided for in the U.S. tax law. These
computations require significant judgments to be made regarding the interpretation of the provisions within the Tax Act and
treasury regulations issued thereunder, along with preparation and analysis of information not previously required. As additional
regulatory guidance is issued, we may make amendments to prior year tax returns.
Changes in existing financial accounting standards or practices, or taxation rules or practices may adversely affect our results of
operations.
Changes in existing accounting or taxation rules or practices, new accounting pronouncements or taxation rules, or varying
interpretations of current accounting pronouncements or taxation practice could have a significant adverse effect on our results of
operations or the manner in which we conduct our business. Further, such changes could potentially affect our reporting of
transactions completed before such changes are effective.
2019 Form 10-K 26
Table of Contents
We are required to evaluate our internal control over financial reporting under Section 404 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and
any adverse results from such evaluation could result in a loss of investor confidence in our financial reports and have an adverse
effect on our stock price.
Pursuant to Section 404 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, we are required to furnish a report by our management on our
internal control over financial reporting. The report contains, among other matters, an assessment of the effectiveness of our
internal control over financial reporting as of the end of our fiscal year, including a statement as to whether or not our internal
control over financial reporting is effective. This assessment must include disclosure of any material weaknesses in our internal
control over financial reporting identified by management.
If our management or independent registered public accounting firm identifies one or more material weaknesses in our
internal control over financial reporting, we would be unable to assert that such internal control over financial reporting is effective.
If we are unable to assert that our internal control over financial reporting is effective (or if our independent registered public
accounting firm is unable to express an opinion that our internal controls are effective), we could lose investor confidence in the
accuracy and completeness of our financial reports, which could have an adverse effect on our business and stock price.
In preparing our financial statements we make certain assumptions, judgments and estimates that affect amounts reported in our
consolidated financial statements, which, if not accurate, may significantly impact our financial results.
We make assumptions, judgments and estimates for a number of items, including revenue recognition for our hybrid desktop
software and cloud service subscriptions, the fair value of financial instruments, goodwill, long-lived assets and other intangible
assets, the realizability of deferred tax assets and the fair value of stock awards. We also make assumptions, judgments and
estimates in determining the accruals for employee related liabilities including commissions, bonuses, and sabbaticals; and in
determining the accruals for uncertain tax positions, partner incentive programs, product returns reserves, allowances for doubtful
accounts, asset retirement obligations and legal contingencies. These assumptions, judgments and estimates are drawn from
historical experience and various other factors that we believe are reasonable under the circumstances as of the date of the
consolidated financial statements. Actual results could differ materially from our estimates, and such differences could significantly
impact our financial results.
We rely on third party technologies and if we are unable to use or integrate these technologies, our solutions and service
development may be delayed and our financial results negatively impacted.
We rely on certain software that we license from third parties, including software that is integrated with internally developed
software and used in our offerings to perform key functions. These third-party software licenses may not continue to be available
on commercially reasonable terms, and the software may not be appropriately supported, maintained or enhanced by the licensors.
The loss of licenses to, or inability to support, maintain and enhance any such software could result in increased costs or delays
until equivalent software can be developed, identified, licensed and integrated, which would likely harm our business.
Disruptions with licensing relationships and third party developers could adversely impact our business.
We license certain key technologies from third parties. Licenses may be restricted in the term or the use of such technology in
ways that negatively affect our business. Similarly, we may not be able to obtain or renew license agreements for key technology on
favorable terms, if at all, and any failure to do so could harm our business.
Our business strategy has historically depended in part on our relationships with third-party developers who provide products
that expand the functionality of our design software. Some developers may elect to support other products or may experience
disruption in product development and delivery cycles or financial pressure during periods of economic downturn. In particular
markets, such disruptions have in the past, and would likely in the future, negatively impact these third-party developers and end
users, which could harm our business.
Additionally, technology created by outsourced product development, whether outsourced to third parties or developed
externally and transferred to us through business or technology acquisitions, has certain additional risks such as effective
integration into existing products, adequate transfer of technology know-how and ownership and protection of transferred
intellectual property.
2019 Form 10-K 27
Table of Contents
As a result of our strategy of partnering with other companies for product development, our product delivery schedules could be
adversely affected if we experience difficulties with our product development partners.
We partner with certain independent firms and contractors to perform some of our product development activities. We believe
our partnering strategy allows us to, among other things, achieve efficiencies in developing new products and maintaining and
enhancing existing product offerings. Our partnering strategy creates a dependency on such independent developers. Independent
developers, including those who currently develop solutions for us in the U.S. and throughout the world, may not be able or willing
to provide development support to us in the future. In addition, use of development resources through consulting relationships,
particularly in non-U.S. jurisdictions with developing legal systems, may be adversely impacted by, and expose us to risks relating
to, evolving employment, export and intellectual property laws. These risks could, among other things, expose our intellectual
property to misappropriation and result in disruptions to product delivery schedules.
Our business may be significantly disrupted upon the occurrence of a catastrophic event.
Our business is highly automated and relies extensively on the availability of our network and data center infrastructure, our
internal technology systems and our websites. We also rely on hosted computer services from third parties for services that we
provide to our customers and computer operations for our internal use. The failure of our systems or hosted computer services due
to a catastrophic event, such as an earthquake, fire, flood, tsunami, weather event, telecommunications failure, power failure, cyber
attack, terrorism, or war, could adversely impact our business, financial results and financial condition. We have developed disaster
recovery plans and maintain backup systems in order to reduce the potential impact of a catastrophic event, however there can be
no assurance that these plans and systems would enable us to return to normal business operations. In addition, any such event
could negatively impact a country or region in which we sell our products. This could in turn decrease that country's or region's
demand for our products, thereby negatively impacting our financial results.
If we were required to record an impairment charge related to the value of our long-lived assets, or an additional valuation
allowance against our deferred tax assets, our results of operations would be adversely affected.
Our long-lived assets are tested for impairment if indicators of impairment exist. If impairment testing shows that the carrying
value of our long-lived assets exceeds their estimated fair values, we would be required to record a non-cash impairment charge,
which would decrease the carrying value of our long-lived assets, as the case may be, and our results of operations would be
adversely affected. Our deferred tax assets include net operating loss, amortizable tax assets and tax credit carryforwards that can
be used to offset taxable income and reduce income taxes payable in future periods. Each quarter, we assess the need for a valuation
allowance, considering both positive and negative evidence to determine whether all or a portion of the deferred tax assets are more
likely than not to be realized. In fiscal 2016,and in fiscal 2018, we determined that it was more likely than not that Autodesk would
not realize our U.S. and Singapore deferred tax assets, respectively, and established a valuation allowance against the deferred tax
assets. We continued to have a full valuation allowance against our U.S. and Singapore deferred tax assets in fiscal 2019. Changes
in the amount of the valuation allowance could result in a material non-cash expense or benefit in the period in which the valuation
allowance is adjusted and our results of operations could be materially affected. We will continue to perform these tests and any
future adjustments may have a material effect on our financial condition and results of operations.
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
None.
ITEM 2. PROPERTIES
We lease approximately 2,200,000 square feet of office space in 107 locations in the United States and internationally
through our foreign subsidiaries. Our executive offices are located in leased office space in San Francisco, California, and our
corporate headquarters are located in leased office space in San Rafael, California. Our San Rafael facilities consist of
approximately 162,000 square feet under leases that have an expiration date of December 2019. Our San Francisco facilities consist
of approximately 287,000 square feet under leases that have expiration dates ranging from April 2019 to December 2023. We and
our foreign subsidiaries lease additional space in various locations throughout the world for local sales, product development, and
technical support personnel.
All facilities are in good condition. Our facilities are operating at capacities averaging 86% occupancy worldwide as of
January 31, 2019. We believe that our existing facilities and offices are adequate to meet our requirements for the foreseeable
2019 Form 10-K 28
Table of Contents
future. See Note 9, “Commitments and Contingencies,” in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements for more information
about our lease commitments.
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
We are involved in a variety of claims, suits, investigations, and proceedings in the normal course of business activities
including claims of alleged infringement of intellectual property rights, commercial, employment, piracy prosecution, business
practices, and other matters. In our opinion, resolution of pending matters is not expected to have a material adverse impact on our
consolidated results of operations, cash flows, or financial position. Given the unpredictable nature of legal proceedings, there is a
reasonable possibility that an unfavorable resolution of one or more such proceedings could in the future materially affect our
results of operations, cash flows, or financial position in a particular period, however, based on the information known by us as of
the date of this filing and the rules and regulations applicable to the preparation of our financial statements, any such amount is
either immaterial or it is not possible to provide an estimated amount of any such potential loss.
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
Not applicable.
2019 Form 10-K 29
Table of Contents
PART II
 
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND
ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
MARKET INFORMATION FOR COMMON STOCK
Our common stock is traded on the Nasdaq Global Select Market under the symbol ADSK.
DIVIDEND POLICY
We anticipate that, for the foreseeable future, we will not pay any cash or stock dividends.
STOCKHOLDERS
As of January 31, 2019, the number of common stockholders of record was 376. Because many of our shares of common
stock are held by brokers or other institutions on behalf of stockholders, we are unable to estimate the total number of stockholders
represented by the record holders.
ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
Autodesk's stock repurchase program provides Autodesk with the ability to offset the dilution from the issuance of stock
under our employee stock plans and reduce shares outstanding over time, and has the effect of returning excess cash generated from
our business to stockholders. Under the share repurchase program, Autodesk may repurchase shares from time to time in open
market transactions, privately-negotiated transactions, accelerated share repurchase programs, tender offers, or by other means. The
share repurchase program does not have an expiration date and the pace and timing of repurchases will depend on factors such as
cash generation from operations, available surplus, the volume of employee stock plan activity, remaining shares available in the
authorized pool, cash requirements for acquisitions, economic and market conditions, stock price and legal and regulatory
requirements.
The following table provides information about the repurchase of common stock in open-market transactions during the
quarter ended January 31, 2019:
(Shares in millions)Total Number of
Shares Purchased Average Price Paid
per ShareTotal Number of Shares Purchased
as Part of Publicly Announced
Plans or Programs(1)  Maximum Number of Shares that
May Yet Be Purchased Under the
Plans or Programs(2)
November 1- November 30 0.2 $ 133.83 0.2 17.4
December 1 - December 31 — — — 17.4
January 1 - January 31 — — — 17.4
Total 0.2 $ 133.83 0.2 
____________________ 
(1) Represents shares purchased in open-market transactions under the stock repurchase program approved by the Board of Directors.
(2) These amounts correspond to the plan publicly announced and approved by the Board of Directors in September 2016 that authorizes the
repurchase of 30.0 million  shares. The plan does not have a fixed expiration date.
SALES OF UNREGISTERED SECURITIES
There were no sales of unregistered securities during the three months ended January 31, 2019.
2019 Form 10-K 30
Table of Contents
COMPANY STOCK PERFORMANCE
The following graph shows a five-year comparison of cumulative total return (equal to dividends plus stock appreciation) for
our Common Stock, the Standard & Poor’s 500 Stock Index, and the Dow Jones U.S. Software Index. The following graph and
related information will not be deemed to be “soliciting material” or to be “filed” with the SEC, nor will such information be
incorporated by reference into any filing pursuant to the Securities Act of 1933 or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, except to
the extent that we specifically incorporate it by reference into such filing.
Comparison of Five Year Cumulative Total Stockholder Return (1)
___________________ 
(1) Assumes $100 invested on January 31, 2014, in Autodesk’ s stock, the Standard & Poor ’s 500 Stock Index, and the Dow Jones U.S.
Software Index, with reinvestment of all dividends. Total stockholder returns for prior periods are not an indication of future investment
returns.
2019 Form 10-K 31
Table of Contents
ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
The following selected consolidated financial data is not necessarily indicative of results of future operations, and should be
read in conjunction with Item 7, “Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations,” and
the consolidated financial statements and related notes thereto included in Item 8 of this Form 10-K to fully understand factors that
may affect the comparability of the information presented below. The financial data for the fiscal years ended January 31, 2019 and
2018 are derived from, and are qualified by reference to, the audited consolidated financial statements that are included in this
Form 10-K. The Consolidated Statements of Operations and the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows data for the fiscal year
ended January 31, 2017 are derived from, and are qualified by reference to, the audited consolidated financial statements that are
included in this Form 10-K. The Consolidated Balance Sheet data for the fiscal year ended January 31, 2017 and the remaining
financial data for the fiscal years ended January 31, 2016 and 2015 are derived from audited, consolidated financial statements
which are not included in this Form 10-K.
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2019 (1)  2018  2017  2016  2015
 (In millions, except per share data)
For the fiscal year:        
Net revenue $ 2,569.8  $ 2,056.6  $ 2,031.0  $ 2,504.1  $ 2,512.2
(Loss) income from operations (25.0 ) (509.1 ) (499.6 ) 1.3 120.7
Net (loss) income (80.8 ) (566.9 ) (582.1 ) (330.5 ) 81.8
        Cash flow from operations $ 377.1  $ 0.9 $ 169.7  $ 414.0  $ 708.6
Common stock data:        
Basic net (loss) income per share $ (0.37 ) $ (2.58 ) $ (2.61 ) $ (1.46 ) $ 0.36
Diluted net (loss) income per share $ (0.37 ) $ (2.58 ) $ (2.61 ) $ (1.46 ) $ 0.35
At year end:        
Total assets $ 4,729.2  $ 4,113.6  $ 4,798.1  $ 5,515.3  $ 4,909.7
Long-term liabilities 2,638.9  2,246.4  1,879.1  2,304.7  1,290.4
Stockholders’  (deficit) equity $ (210.9 ) $ (256.0 ) $ 733.6  $ 1,619.6  $ 2,219.2
____________________
(1) Reflects the impact of the adoption of new accounting standards in fiscal year 2019  related to revenue recognition. See Part II , Item 8 , Note
1, Business and Summary of Significant Accounting Policies , Accounting Standards Adopted , of our consolidated financial statements for
additional information.
2019 Form 10-K 32
Table of Contents
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS
The discussion in our MD&A and elsewhere in this Form 10-K contains trend analyses and other forward-looking statements
within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933 and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. Forward-
looking statements are any statements that look to future events and consist of, among other things, our business strategies,
including those discussed in “Strategy” and “Overview of Fiscal 2019” below, future net revenue, operating expenses, recurring
revenue, annualized recurring revenue, cash flow, other future financial results (by product type and geography), subscriptions and
annualized revenue per subscription, the effectiveness of our efforts to successfully manage transitions to new markets, our ability
to increase our subscription base, expected market trends, the impact of planned and past acquisitions and investment activities,
the effects of global economic conditions, the effects of revenue recognition, the effects of recently issued accounting standards,
expectations regarding our cash needs, the effects of fluctuations in exchange rates and our hedging activities on our financial
results, our ability to successfully expand adoption of our products, our ability to gain market acceptance of new business and sales
initiatives, the impact of economic volatility and geopolitical activities in certain countries, particularly emerging economy
countries, the timing and amount of purchases under our stock buy-back plan, and the effects of potential non-cash charges on our
financial results and the resulting effect on our financial results. In addition, forward-looking statements also consist of statements
involving expectations regarding product capability and acceptance, statements regarding our liquidity and short-term and long-
term cash requirements, as well as statements involving trend analyses and statements including such words as “may,” “believe,”
“could,” “anticipate,” “would,” “might,” “plan,” “expect,” and similar expressions or the negative of these terms or other
comparable terminology. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this Annual Report on Form 10-K and are
subject to business and economic risks. As such, our actual results could differ materially from those set forth in the forward-
looking statements as a result of a number of factors, including those set forth above in Part I, Item 1A, “Risk Factors,” and in our
other reports filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. We assume no obligation to update the forward-looking
statements to reflect events that occur or circumstances that exist after the date on which they were made, except as required by
law.
STRATEGY
Autodesk makes software for people who make things. If you have ever driven a high-performance car, admired a towering
skyscraper, used a smartphone, or watched a great film, chances are you have experienced what millions of Autodesk customers are
doing with our software. Autodesk gives you the power to make anything.
Autodesk was founded during the platform transition from mainframe computers and engineering workstations to personal
computers. We developed and sustained a compelling value proposition based upon desktop software for the personal computer.
Just as the transition from mainframes to personal computers transformed the industry over 30 years ago, the software industry has
undergone a transition from developing and selling perpetual licenses and on-premises products to cloud, mobile and social
applications.
To address this shift, Autodesk made a strategic decision to shift its business model from selling perpetual licenses and
maintenance plans to selling subscriptions.
Today, we offer subscriptions for individual products and Industry Collections, flexible enterprise business agreements
("EBAs"), and cloud service offerings (collectively referred to as "subscription plan"). Subscription plans are designed to give our
customers more flexibility with how they use our offerings and to attract a broader range of customers, such as project-based users
and small businesses.
Our product subscriptions currently represent a hybrid of desktop software and cloud functionality, which provides a device-
independent, collaborative design workflow for designers and their stakeholders. Our cloud offerings, for example, BIM 360,
Shotgun, Fusion, and AutoCAD 360 Pro, provide tools, including mobile and social capabilities, to streamline design,
collaboration, building and manufacturing and data management processes. We believe that customer adoption of these new
offerings will continue to grow as customers across a range of industries begin to take advantage of the scalable computing power
and flexibility provided through these new services.
Industry Collections provide our customers with increased access to a broader selection of Autodesk solutions and services
that exceeds those previously available in suites — simplifying the customers' ability to get access to a complete set of tools for
their industry.
We discontinued the sale of new commercial licenses of most individual software products in 2016. Additionally, in June
2017, we commenced a program to incentivize maintenance plan customers to move to subscription plan offerings,
2019 Form 10-K 33
Table of Contents
maintenance-to-subscription ("M2S"), while at the same time increasing maintenance plan pricing over time for customers that
remain on maintenance plans. Since launching the program, over 794,000 maintenance plan customers have converted to
subscription plan offerings. Autodesk seeks to convert the remaining 796,100 maintenance plan customers to subscription through
this program.
To support our strategic priority of re-imagining construction, in fiscal 2019, we strengthened the foundation of our
construction solutions with both organic and inorganic investments. In addition to investing in our BIM 360 portfolio, we
purchased Assemble Systems for quantity take off functionality, PlanGrid for document-centric workflows and field execution, and
BuildingConnected for bidding and estimation processes. The broadened product portfolio will help us expand our presence with
sub-contractors, trades people, and building owners.
As part of our manufacturing strategy we continue to attract global manufacturing leaders with our generative design and our
Fusion technology enhancements.
We sell our products and services globally, through a combination of indirect and direct channels. Our indirect channels
include value added resellers, direct market resellers, distributors, computer manufacturers, and other software developers. Our
direct channels include internal sales resources dedicated to selling in our largest accounts, our highly specialized solutions, and
business transacted through our online Autodesk branded store. See Note 2, "Revenue Recognition" in the Notes to the
Consolidated Financial Statements for further detail on the results of our indirect and direct channel sales for the fiscal years ended
January 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017.
We anticipate that our channel mix will continue to change as we scale our online Autodesk branded store business and our
largest accounts shift towards direct-only business models. However, we expect our indirect channel will continue to transact and
support the majority of our customers and revenue. We employ a variety of incentive programs and promotions to align our direct
and indirect channels with our business strategies. In addition, we have a worldwide user group organization and we have created
online user communities dedicated to the exchange of information related to the use of our products.
One of our key strategies is to maintain an open-architecture design of our software products to facilitate third-party
development of complementary products and industry-specific software solutions. This approach enables customers and third
parties to customize solutions for a wide variety of highly specific uses. We offer several programs that provide strategic investment
funding, technological platforms, user communities, technical support, forums, and events to developers who develop add-on
applications for our products. For example, we have established the Autodesk Forge program to support innovators that build
solutions to facilitate the development of a single connected ecosystem for the future of how things are designed, made, and used as
well as support ideas that push the boundaries of 3D printing.
In addition to the competitive advantages afforded by our technology, our large global network of distributors, resellers, third-
party developers, customers, educational institutions, educators, and students is a key competitive advantage which has been
cultivated over an extensive period of time. This network of partners and relationships provides us with a broad and deep reach into
volume markets around the world. Our distributor and reseller network is extensive and provides our customers with the resources
to purchase, deploy, learn, and support our solutions quickly and easily. We have a significant number of registered third-party
developers who create products that work well with our solutions and extend them for a variety of specialized applications.
Autodesk is committed to helping fuel a lifelong passion for making with students of all ages. We offer free educational
licenses of Autodesk software worldwide to students, educators, and accredited educational institutions. We inspire and support
beginners with Tinkercad, a simple online 3D design and 3D printing tool. Through Autodesk Design Academy, we provide
secondary and postsecondary school markets hundreds of standards-aligned class projects to support design-based disciplines in
Science, Technology, Engineering, Digital Arts, and Math (STEAM) while using Autodesk's professional-grade 3D design,
engineering and entertainment software used in industry. We also have made Autodesk Design Academy curricula available on
Udemy and Coursera. Our intention is to make Autodesk software ubiquitous and the design and making software of choice for
those poised to become the next generation of professional users.
Our strategy includes improving our product functionality and expanding our product offerings through internal development
as well as through the acquisition of products, technology, and businesses. For example, we recently acquired Assemble Systems, a
leading provider of key workflow software solutions, PlanGrid, Inc., a leading provider of construction productivity software, and
BuildingConnected, a leading pre-construction platform. We believe that the acquisitions of Assemble Systems, PlanGrid and
BuildingConnected will enable us to offer a more comprehensive, cloud-based construction platform. Acquisitions often increase
the speed at which we can deliver product functionality to our customers; however, they entail cost and integration challenges and
may, in certain instances, negatively impact our operating margins. We continually
2019 Form 10-K 34
Table of Contents
review these trade-offs in making decisions regarding acquisitions. We currently anticipate that we will continue to acquire
products, technology, and businesses as compelling opportunities become available.
In our current business model, annualized recurring revenue ("ARR"), growth of billings, and total deferred revenue better
reflect business momentum. To analyze progress, we have disaggregated our growth between the original maintenance model
("maintenance plan") and the subscription plan model. Maintenance plan subscriptions peaked in the fourth quarter of our fiscal
2016 as we discontinued selling new maintenance plan subscriptions in fiscal 2017, and we expect them to keep declining over
time as maintenance plan customers continue to convert to our subscription plans.
Our strategy depends upon a number of assumptions, including: making our technology available to mainstream markets;
leveraging our large global network of distributors, resellers, third-party developers, customers, educational institutions, and
students; improving the performance and functionality of our products; and adequately protecting our intellectual property. If the
outcome of any of these assumptions differs from our expectations, we may not be able to implement our strategy, which could
potentially adversely affect our business. For further discussion regarding these and related risks, see Part I, Item 1A, “Risk
Factors.”
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMATES
Our Consolidated Financial Statements are prepared in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles. In
preparing our Consolidated Financial Statements, we make assumptions, judgments, and estimates that can have a significant
impact on amounts reported in our Consolidated Financial Statements. We base our assumptions, judgments, and estimates on
historical experience and various other factors that we believe to be reasonable under the circumstances. Actual results could differ
materially from these estimates under different assumptions or conditions. We regularly reevaluate our assumptions, judgments, and
estimates. Our significant accounting policies are described in Part II, Item 8, Note 1, “Business and Summary of Significant
Accounting Policies,” in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements. We believe that of all our significant accounting policies,
the following policies involve a higher degree of judgment and complexity. Accordingly, these are the policies we believe are the
most critical to aid in fully understanding and evaluating our financial condition and results of operations.
Revenue Recognition.    Autodesk’s revenue is divided into three categories: subscription revenue, maintenance revenue, and
other revenue. Revenue is recognized when control for these offerings is transferred to our customers, in an amount that reflects the
consideration we expect to be entitled to in exchange for products and services.
Our contracts with customers may include promises to provide multiple subscriptions and services to a customer. Determining
whether the offerings and services are considered distinct performance obligations that should be accounted for separately or as one
combined performance obligation may require significant judgment. Judgment is required to determine the level of integration and
interdependency between individual components of software and cloud functionality. This determination influences whether the
software is considered distinct and accounted for separately as a license performance obligation, or not distinct and accounted for
together with the cloud functionality as a single subscription performance obligation recognized over time.
For product subscriptions, Industry Collections, and enterprise business agreement ("EBA") subscriptions in which the
desktop software and related cloud functionality are highly interrelated, the combined performance obligation is recognized ratably
over the contract term as the obligation is satisfied. For contracts involving distinct software licenses, the license performance
obligation is satisfied at a point in time when control is transferred to the customer. For standalone maintenance subscriptions,
cloud subscriptions, and technical support services, the performance obligation is satisfied ratably over the contract term as those
services are delivered. For consulting services, the performance obligation is satisfied over a period of time as those services are
delivered.
When an arrangement includes multiple performance obligations which are concurrently delivered and have the same pattern
of transfer to the customer (the services transfer to the customer over the contract period), we account for those performance
obligations as a single performance obligation.
For contracts with more than one performance obligation, the transaction price is allocated among the performance
obligations in an amount that depicts the relative standalone selling price ("SSP") of each obligation. Judgment is required to
determine the SSP for each distinct performance obligation. We use a range of amounts to estimate SSP when we sell each of the
products and services separately and need to determine whether there is a discount that should be allocated based on the relative
SSP of the various products and services. 
2019 Form 10-K 35
Table of Contents
In instances where SSP is not directly observable, such as when we do not sell the product or service separately, we determine
the SSP using information that includes market conditions and other observable inputs. We typically have more than one SSP for
individual products and services due to the stratification of those products and services by customer and circumstance. In these
instances, we use relevant information such as the sales channel and geographic region to determine the SSP.
Our indirect channel model includes both a two-tiered distribution structure, where Autodesk sells to distributors that
subsequently sell to resellers, and a one-tiered structure where Autodesk sells directly to resellers. For these arrangements, transfer
of control begins at the time access to our subscriptions is made available electronically to our end customer, provided all other
criteria for revenue recognition are met. Judgment is required to determine whether our distributors and resellers have the ability to
honor their commitment to pay, regardless of whether they collect payment from their customers. If we were to change this
assessment, it could cause a material increase or decrease in the amount of revenue that we report in a particular period.
As part of the indirect channel model, we have a partner incentive program that uses quarterly attainment of monetary
rewards to motivate distributors and resellers to achieve mutually agreed upon business goals in a specified time period. Incentives
related to our subscription program are recorded as a reduction to deferred revenue in the period the subscription transaction is
billed, and are subsequently recognized as a reduction to subscription revenue over the contract period. A small portion of partner
incentives reduce other revenue in the current period. These incentive balances do not require significant assumptions or
judgments. Depending on how the payments are made, the reserves associated with the partner incentive program are recorded on
the balance sheet as either contra accounts receivable or accounts payable.
The new revenue recognition standard had a material impact in our consolidated financial statements. Refer to Part II, Item 8,
Note 1, Business and Summary of Significant Accounting Policies, Accounting Standards Adopted, of our consolidated financial
statements and to discussions below under the heading “Overview” for additional information.
Marketable Securities and Privately Held Company Investments.     As described in Part II, Item 8, Note 3, “Financial
Instruments,” in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements, our investments in marketable securities are measured at the end
of each reporting period and reported at fair value. Fair value is defined as the price that would be received from the sale of an asset
or paid to transfer a liability in the principal or most advantageous market for the asset or liability in an orderly transaction between
market participants on the measurement date. In determining the fair value of our investments, we are sometimes required to use
various alternative valuation techniques. Inputs to valuation techniques are either observable or unobservable. Observable inputs
reflect market data obtained from independent sources, while unobservable inputs reflect our market assumptions. These two types
of inputs have created the following fair value hierarchy:
•Level 1 - Quoted prices for identical instruments in active markets;
•Level 2 - Quoted prices for similar instruments in active markets, quoted prices for identical or similar instruments in
markets that are not active, and model-derived valuations in which all significant inputs and significant value drivers are
observable in active markets; and
•Level 3 - Valuations derived from valuation techniques in which one or more significant inputs or significant value drivers
are unobservable.
This hierarchy requires us to minimize the use of unobservable inputs and to use observable market data, if available, when
determining fair value. This is generally true for our cash and cash equivalents and the majority of our marketable securities, which
we consider to be Level 1 assets and Level 2 assets.
Privately held debt and equity securities (Level 3) are valued using significant unobservable inputs or data in an inactive
market and the valuation requires our judgment due to the absence of market prices and inherent lack of liquidity. These
assumptions are inherently subjective and involve significant management judgment. Whenever possible, we use observable market
data and rely on unobservable inputs only when observable market data is not available, when determining fair value.
The carrying value is not adjusted for our privately held equity securities if there are no observable price changes in a same or
similar security from the same issuer or if there are no identified events or changes in circumstances that may indicate impairment,
as discussed below. In determining the estimated fair value of its strategic investments in privately held companies, we utilize the
most recent data available to us. In addition, the determination of whether an orderly transaction is for a same or similar investment
requires significant management judgment including: the rights and obligations of the investments, the
2019 Form 10-K 36
Table of Contents
extent to which those differences would affect the fair values of those investments, and the impact of any differences based on the
stage of operational development of the investee.
All of Autodesk’s marketable securities and privately held company investments are subject to a periodic impairment review.
For any marketable debt securities, declines in fair value judged to be other-than-temporary on securities available for sale are
included as a reduction to investment income. To determine whether a decline in value is other-than-temporary, we evaluate, among
other factors: the duration and extent to which the fair value has been less than the carrying value and its intent and ability to retain
the investment for a period of time sufficient to allow for any anticipated recovery in fair value. For the purposes of computing
realized and unrealized gains and losses, the cost of securities sold is based on the specific-identification method. Interest on
securities classified as available for sale is also included as a component of investment income.
For Autodesk's quarterly impairment assessment of privately held debt and equity securities strategic investment portfolio, the
analysis encompasses an assessment of the severity and duration of the impairment and qualitative and quantitative analysis of
other key factors including: the investee’s financial metrics, the investee’s products and technologies meeting or exceeding
predefined milestones, market acceptance of the product or technology, other competitive products or technology in the market,
general market conditions, management and governance structure of the investee, the investee’s liquidity, debt ratios and the rate at
which the investee is using its cash. If the investment is considered to be impaired, the Company will record the investment at fair
value by recognizing an impairment through the consolidated statement of operations and establishing a new carrying value for the
investment.
Business Combinations.    The assets acquired and liabilities assumed in a business combination are recorded based on their
estimated fair values at the acquisition date. Any residual purchase price is recorded as goodwill. Accounting for business
combinations requires us to make significant estimates and assumptions, especially at the acquisition date with respect to intangible
assets and deferred revenue obligations.
Although we believe the assumptions and estimates we have made are reasonable, they are based in part on historical
experience and information obtained from the management of the acquired companies and are inherently uncertain. Examples of
critical estimates used in valuing certain of the intangible assets we have acquired or may acquire in the future include but are not
limited to:
•future expected cash flows from sales, maintenance agreements, and acquired developed technologies;
•the acquired company's trade name, trademark and existing customer relationship, as well as assumptions about the period
of time the acquired trade name and trademark will continue to be used in our product portfolio;
•expected costs to develop the in-process research and development into commercially viable products and estimated cash
flows from the projects when completed; and
•discount rates used to determine the present value of estimated future cash flows.
These estimates are inherently uncertain and unpredictable. Unanticipated events and circumstances may occur which may
affect the accuracy or validity of such assumptions, estimates or actual results.
Realizability of Long-Lived Assets.     We assess the realizability of our long-lived assets and related intangible assets, other
than goodwill, quarterly, or sooner should events or changes in circumstances indicate the carrying values of such assets may not be
recoverable. We consider the following factors important in determining when to perform an impairment review: significant under-
performance of a business or product line relative to budget; shifts in business strategies which affect the continued uses of the
assets; significant negative industry or economic trends; and the results of past impairment reviews. When such events or changes
in circumstances occur, we assess recoverability of these assets. 
We assess recoverability of these assets by comparing the carrying amounts to the future undiscounted cash flows the assets
are expected to generate. If impairment indicators were present based on our undiscounted cash flow models, which include
assumptions regarding projected cash flows, we would perform a discounted cash flow analysis to assess impairments on long-lived
assets. Variances in these assumptions could have a significant impact on our conclusion as to whether an asset is impaired or the
amount of any impairment charge. Impairment charges, if any, result in situations where any fair values of these assets are less than
their carrying values.
2019 Form 10-K 37
Table of Contents
In addition to our recoverability assessments, we routinely review the remaining estimated useful lives of our long-lived
assets. Any reduction in the useful life assumption will result in increased depreciation and amortization expense in the quarter
when such determinations are made, as well as in subsequent quarters.
We will continue to evaluate the values of our long-lived assets in accordance with applicable accounting rules. As changes in
business conditions and our assumptions occur, we may be required to record impairment charges.
Income Taxes.     We account for income taxes under the asset and liability approach. Under this method, deferred tax assets,
including those related to tax loss carryforwards and credits, and deferred tax liabilities are determined based on the differences
between the financial statement and tax bases of assets and liabilities using enacted tax rates in effect for the year in which the
differences are expected to reverse. We recognize the tax benefit for an uncertain tax position when it meets a more likely than not
threshold. We recognize potential accrued interest and penalties related to unrecognized tax benefits as income tax expense. 
A valuation allowance is recorded to reduce deferred tax assets when management cannot conclude that it is more likely than
not that the net deferred tax asset will be recovered. The valuation allowance is determined by assessing both positive and negative
evidence to determine whether it is more likely than not that deferred tax assets are recoverable; such assessment is required on a
jurisdiction-by-jurisdiction basis. Significant judgment is required in determining whether the valuation allowance should be
recorded against deferred tax assets. In assessing the need for valuation allowance, we consider all available evidence including
past operating results and estimates of future taxable income. As a result of cumulative losses arising from our transition to a
subscription model, we considered cumulative losses as a significant source of negative evidence and recorded a valuation
allowance against our deferred tax attributes in Singapore, Canada and the U.S. jurisdictions.
As we continually strive to optimize our overall business model, tax planning strategies may become feasible and prudent
whereby management may determine that it is more likely than not that the federal and state deferred tax assets will be realized;
therefore, we will continue to evaluate the evidence around our ability to utilize our net deferred tax assets each quarter, both in the
U.S. and in foreign jurisdictions, based on all available evidence, both positive and negative.
Stock-Based Compensation.     We measure stock-based compensation cost at the grant date fair value of the award, and
recognize expense ratably over the requisite service period, which is generally the vesting period. We estimate the fair value of
certain stock-based payment awards (including grants of employee stock purchases related to the employee stock purchase plan)
using either the Black-Scholes-Merton option-pricing model or a binomial-lattice model (e.g., Monte Carlo simulation model). To
determine the grant-date fair value of our stock-based payment awards, we use a Black-Scholes model or the quoted stock price on
the date of grant, unless the awards are subject to market conditions, in which case we use the Monte Carlo simulation model. The
Monte Carlo simulation model utilizes multiple input variables to estimate the probability that market conditions will be achieved.
These variables include our expected stock price volatility over the expected term of the award, actual and projected employee
stock option exercise behaviors, the risk-free interest rate for the expected term of the award, and expected dividends. The variables
used in these models are reviewed on a quarterly basis and adjusted, as needed. Share-based compensation cost for restricted stock
is measured on the closing fair market value of our common stock on the date of grant. The value of the portion of the award that is
ultimately expected to vest is recognized as expense in our Consolidated Statements of Operations.
Legal Contingencies.     As described in Part I, Item 3, “Legal Proceedings” and Part II, Item 8, Note 9, “Commitments and
Contingencies,” in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements, we are periodically involved in various legal claims and
proceedings. We routinely review the status of each significant matter and assess our potential financial exposure. If the potential
loss from any matter is considered probable and the amount can be reasonably estimated, we record a liability for the estimated
loss. Because of inherent uncertainties related to these legal matters, we base our loss accruals on the best information available at
the time. As additional information becomes available, we reassess our potential liability and may revise our estimates. Such
revisions could have a material impact on future quarterly or annual results of operations.
Restructuring and other exit costs, net. Our restructuring plans include one–time termination benefits as well as certain
contractual termination benefits. We record costs associated with exit activities related to restructuring plans in accordance with the
ASC Topic 420, Exit or Disposal Obligations. Liabilities for costs associated with an exit or disposal activity are recognized in the
period in which the liability is incurred. The timing of associated cash payments is dependent upon the type of exit cost and may
extend over a 12-month period or longer. We record restructuring liabilities in “Other accrued liabilities,” or "Other liabilities" in
the consolidated balance sheet.
Restructuring and other exit costs, net includes employee termination costs, facility closure, accelerated depreciation of
certain assets and relocation costs, and contract termination costs. One–time termination benefits are recognized as a liability at
2019 Form 10-K 38
Table of Contents
estimated fair value when the approved plan of termination has been communicated to employees, unless employees must provide
future service that is longer than the statutory requirement, in which case the benefits are recognized ratably over the future service
period. For the facility-related restructuring, we recognize upon exiting all or a portion of a leased facility and meeting cease-use
and other requirements. The amount of restructuring is based on the fair value of the lease obligation for the abandoned space,
which includes a sublease assumption that could be reasonably obtained. We also recognize accelerated depreciation related to
assets at the time we commit to a plan to abandon.
Restructuring and other exit costs, net requires significant estimates and assumptions, including sub-lease income and
expenses for severance and other employee separation costs. Our estimates involve a number of risks and uncertainties, some of
which are beyond our control, including future real estate market conditions and our ability to successfully enter into subleases or
termination agreements with terms as favorable as those assumed when arriving at our estimates. We monitor these estimates and
assumptions on at least a quarterly basis for changes in circumstances and any corresponding adjustments to the accrual are
recorded in our statement of operations in the period when such changes are known.    
RECENTLY ISSUED ACCOUNTING STANDARDS
See Part II, Item 8, Note 1, “Business and Summary of Significant Accounting Policies,” in the Notes to Consolidated
Financial Statements for a full description of recent accounting pronouncements, including the expected dates of adoption and
estimated effects on results of operations and financial condition.
OVERVIEW OF FISCAL 2019
•Total net revenue was $2.57 billion during fiscal 2019, an increase of 25% compared to the prior fiscal year.
•Total ARR was $2.75 billion, an increase of 34% compared to the prior fiscal year.
•Subscription plan ARR was $2.20 billion, an increase of 87% compared to the prior fiscal year.
•Total subscriptions increased 0.6 million from the prior fiscal year to 4.3 million.    
•Deferred revenue was $2.09 billion, an increase of 7% compared to the prior fiscal year. Total deferred revenue (deferred
revenue plus unbilled deferred revenue) was $2.68 billion, an increase of approximately 18 percent compared to prior
fiscal year.
•We adopted ASC Topic 606 and ASC Topic 340-40 during the first quarter of fiscal 2019. See discussion below for
additional information regarding certain metrics that were affected by the new standards under the heading “Impact of
New Revenue Accounting Standard."
Revenue Analysis
During fiscal 2019, net revenue increased 25%, as compared to the prior fiscal year, primarily due to a 102% increase in
subscription revenue. The increase in subscription revenue was partially offset by a 36% decrease in maintenance revenue.
Further discussion of the drivers of these results are discussed below under the heading “Results of Operations.”
We rely significantly upon major distributors and resellers in both the U.S. and international regions, including Tech Data
Corporation and its global affiliates (collectively, “Tech Data”). Total sales to Tech Data accounted for 35%, 31%, and 30% of
Autodesk's total net revenue during fiscal 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively. Our customers through Tech Data are the resellers
and end users who purchase our software subscription services. Should any of our agreements with Tech Data be terminated for any
reason, we believe the resellers and end users who currently purchase our products through Tech Data would be able to continue to
do so under substantially the same terms from one of our many other distributors without substantial disruption to our revenue.
Consequently, we believe our business is not substantially dependent on Tech Data.
Recurring Revenue and Subscriptions
In order to help better understand our financial performance we use several metrics including recurring revenue, ARR, total
subscriptions, and annualized revenue per subscription ("ARPS"). ARR, ARPS, total subscriptions, and recurring revenue are
performance metrics and should be viewed independently of revenue and deferred revenue as ARR, ARPS, total
2019 Form 10-K 39
Table of Contents
subscriptions, and recurring revenue are not intended to be combined with those items. Our determination and presentation may
differ from that of other companies. Please refer to the Glossary of Terms for the definitions of these metrics.
The following table outlines our recurring revenue metric for the fiscal years ended January 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017:
 Fiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2019 Change compared to
prior fiscal year endFiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2018Change compared to
prior fiscal year end  Fiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2017   $ %    $  %     
Recurring Revenue  (in millions)  (1) $2,437.2  $554.9 29% $1,882.3 $342.0  22% $1,540.3
As a percentage of net revenue 95%  92%   76%
 ________________
(1) The acquisition of a business may cause variability in the comparison of recurring revenue in this table above and recurring revenue derived
from the revenue reported in the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
The following table outlines our ARR, subscriptions, and ARPS metrics as of fiscal years ended January 31, 2019 and
2018. For purposes of clarification, the ARR and ARPS balances in the following table as of January 31, 2019 are calculated under
ASC Topic 606. For comparison of ARR and ARPS as of January 31, 2019 under the old revenue standard, ASC Topic 605, refer to
the table under the title "Impact of New Revenue Accounting Standard" further below.
   Change compared to
prior fiscal year  
 January 31,
2019  $ %     January 31,
2018
ARR (in millions)     
Subscription plan ARR $ 2,200.1  $1,025.1 87 % $ 1,175.0
Maintenance plan ARR 549.3  (329.8 ) (38)% 879.1
Total ARR (1) $ 2,749.4  $695.3 34 % $ 2,054.1
     
Number of subscriptions (in thousands) (2)     
Subscription plan 3,533.9  1,267.1 56 % 2,266.8
Maintenance plan 796.1  (652.8 ) (45)% 1,448.9
Total subscriptions 4,330.0  614.3 17 % 3,715.7
     
ARPS (ARR divided by number of subscriptions) (2)     
Subscription plan ARPS $ 623  $ 105 20 % $ 518
Maintenance plan ARPS $ 690  $ 83 14 % $ 607
Total ARPS (3) $ 635  $ 82 15 % $ 553
 ________________
(1) The acquisition of a business may cause variability in the comparison of ARR reported in this table above and ARR derived from the
revenue reported in the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
(2) In the first quarter of fiscal 2020, we will discontinue presenting subscriptions and ARPS on a quarterly basis.
(3) There are small variances between ARR and total subscriptions due in part to the inherent limitation with collecting all subscriptions
information. For example, Buzzsaw and Constructware are included with ARR but not in total subscriptions due to these inherent
limitations. We do not view these variances as meaningful to amounts or quarterly comparisons presented here for ARPS.
Total ARR increased 34% as of January 31, 2019 as compared to the end of fiscal 2018, primarily due to a 87% increase in
subscription plan ARR driven by product subscriptions, including the M2S program. The increase was partially offset by a 38%
decrease in maintenance plan ARR driven by the migration from maintenance plan subscriptions to subscription plan subscriptions.
Under ASC 605, total ARR increased 32% as compared to the end of the prior fiscal year primarily due to an 84% increase in
subscription plan ARR, partially offset by a 36% decrease in maintenance plan ARR.
Subscription plan subscriptions increased 56% or approximately 1.3 million as compared to the end of fiscal 2018, driven by
growth in all subscription plan types, led by new product subscriptions. Subscription plan subscriptions benefited from
2019 Form 10-K 40
Table of Contents
approximately 452,000 maintenance subscribers that were converted to product subscription under the maintenance-to-subscription
program during the fiscal year ended January 31, 2019.
Maintenance plan subscriptions decreased 45% or approximately 652,800 as compared to the end of fiscal 2018, primarily as
a result of the strong performance of the M2S program in which approximately 452,000 maintenance plan subscriptions converted
to product subscription during the fiscal year ended January 31, 2019. The net decrease is expected and we expect to see ongoing
declines in maintenance plan subscriptions going forward as part of the business model transition. The rate of decline will vary
based on the number of subscriptions subject to renewal, the renewal rate, and our ability to incentivize customers to switch over to
EBAs or product subscriptions.
As of January 31, 2019, when adjusted for the impact of the M2S program, subscription plan ARPS and maintenance plan
ARPS would have been $631 and $641, respectively.
ARPS as of January 31, 2019, was $635 under ASC 606, a 15% increase compared to the prior fiscal year primarily due to an
increase in subscription plan ARPS. The increase in subscription plan ARPS was driven by growth in all subscription plan types,
led by product subscription ARPS. Under ASC 605, ARPS was $628 as of January 31, 2019.
Our ARPS is currently, and will continue to be, affected by various factors including the M2S program, geography and
product mix, promotions, acquisitions, sales linearity within a quarter, pricing changes, and foreign currency.
2019 Form 10-K 41
Table of Contents
Impact of New Revenue Accounting Standard
Effective in the first quarter of fiscal 2019, we adopted Accounting Standard Update No. 2014-09, which codified new
revenue recognition guidance under ASC Topic 606. Previously, we followed revenue accounting guidance under ASC Topic 605.
Under the modified retrospective adoption, Autodesk calculated the impact of the adoption during fiscal 2019, as the first year of
adoption. The table below shows what some of our key metrics would have been under ASC Topic 605 (see Part II, Item 8, Note 1,
“Business and Summary of Significant Accounting Policies” for more details on our adoption and impacts).
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
2019  Fiscal Year Ended
January 31, 2018
(in millions except ARPS) ASC 606 ASC 605 ASC 605
Key Income Statement Metrics   
Subscription revenue $ 1,802.3 $ 1,785.7  $ 894.3
Maintenance revenue 635.1 640.8  989.6
Other revenue 132.4 121.1  172.7
Total net revenue 2,569.8 2,547.6  2,056.6
Gross profit 2,283.9 2,260.7  1,753.2
Total spend (1) 2,594.8 2,577.9  2,565.7
Net loss $ (80.8 )$ (90.9 ) $ (566.9 )
Basic and diluted net loss per share $ (0.37 )$ (0.42 ) $ (2.58 )
ARR   
Subscription plan ARR $ 2,200.1 $ 2,160.1  $ 1,175.0
Maintenance plan ARR 549.3 558.5  879.1
Total ARR $ 2,749.4 $ 2,718.6  $ 2,054.1
ARPS (2)   
Subscription plan ARPS $ 623 $ 611 $ 518
Maintenance plan ARPS 690 702  607
Total ARPS $ 635 $ 628  $ 553
Net Revenue by Pr oduct Family (3)   
Architecture, Engineering and Construction ("AEC") $ 1,021.6 $ 1,014.5  $ 787.5
AutoCAD and AutoCAD L T ("ACAD") 731.8 730.5  561.4
Manufacturing ("MFG") 616.2 607.2  528.8
Media and Entertainment ("M&E") 182.0 176.7  152.1
Other 18.2 18.7  26.8
Total Net Revenue $ 2,569.8 $ 2,547.6  $ 2,056.6
Net Revenue by Geography   
Americas $ 1,049.9 $ 1,034.6  $ 871.1
Europe, Middle East and Africa ("EMEA") 1,034.3 1,028.8  815.4
Asia Pacific ("AP AC") 485.6 484.2  370.1
Total net revenue $ 2,569.8 $ 2,547.6  $ 2,056.6
____________________
(1) Our total spend is defined as cost of revenue plus operating expenses.
(2) In the first quarter of fiscal 2020, we will discontinue presenting subscriptions and ARPS on a quarterly basis.
(3) Due to changes in the go-to-market of ferings of our AutoCAD product subscription, prior period balances have been adjusted to conform to
current period presentation.
The adoption of ASC Topic 606 required a change to our reporting of deferred revenue. See discussions below under the
heading "Total deferred revenue."
2019 Form 10-K 42
Table of Contents
Foreign Currency Analysis
We generate a significant amount of our revenue in the United States, Germany, Japan, the United Kingdom and Canada.
The following table shows the impact of foreign exchange rate changes on our net revenue and total spend:
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31, 2019
 Percent
change compared to
prior fiscal year (as
reported)  Constant currency
percent
change compared to
prior fiscal year (1) Positive/negative/neutral
impact from foreign
exchange rate changes
Revenue 25% 24% Positive
Total spend 1% 1% Neutral
 ________________
(1) Please refer to the Glossary of Terms for the definitions of our constant currency growth rates.
Changes in the value of the U.S. dollar may have a significant effect on net revenue, total spend, and income (loss) from
operations in future periods. We use foreign currency contracts to reduce the exchange rate effect on a portion of the net revenue of
certain anticipated transactions but do not attempt to completely mitigate the impact of fluctuations of such foreign currency against
the U.S. dollar.
Total Deferred Revenue
The adoption of ASC Topic 606 required a change to the definition of unbilled deferred revenue and new qualitative and
quantitative disclosures around our performance obligations. Unbilled deferred revenue represents contractually stated or
committed orders under early renewal and multi-year billing plans primarily for subscription, services and maintenance for which
the associated deferred revenue has not been recognized. Under ASC Topic 606, unbilled deferred revenue is not included as a
receivable or deferred revenue on our Consolidated Balance Sheet. See Part II, Item 8, Note 2, “Revenue Recognition” for more
details on Autodesk's performance obligations.
 January 31, 2019  January 31,
2018
(in millions) ASC 606 ASC 605 ASC 605
Deferred revenue $2,091.4 $2,269.2  $ 1,955.1
Unbilled deferred revenue 591.0 491.6  326.4
Total deferred revenue $2,682.4 $2,760.8  $ 2,281.5
 
We expect that the amount of billed and unbilled deferred revenue will change from quarter to quarter for several reasons,
including the specific timing, duration and size of customer subscription and support agreements, varying billing cycles of such
agreements, the specific timing of customer renewals, and foreign currency fluctuations.
Balance Sheet and Cash Flow Items
At January 31, 2019, we had $953.6 million in cash and marketable securities. Our cash flow from operations increased to
$377.1 million for the fiscal year ended January 31, 2019 from $0.9 million for the fiscal year ended January 31, 2018. We
repurchased 2.2 million shares of our common stock for $292.5 million during fiscal 2019. Comparatively, we repurchased 6.9
million shares of our common stock for $690.1 million during fiscal 2018. Further discussion regarding the balance sheet and cash
flow activities are discussed below under the heading “Liquidity and Capital Resources.”
2019 Form 10-K 43
Table of Contents
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
The revenue and spend balances included in the tables below during the fiscal year ended January 31, 2019, are calculated
under ASC Topic 606. For comparison of subscription revenue, maintenance revenue, other revenue and total spend during the
fiscal year ended January 31, 2019, under ASC Topic 605, refer to the table within Item 7, "Overview" under the title "Impact of
New Revenue Accounting Standard."
Net Revenue by Income Statement Presentation
Subscription revenue consists of our term-based product subscriptions, cloud service offerings, and flexible enterprise
business arrangements. Revenue from these arrangements is recognized ratably over the contract term commencing with the date
our service is made available to customers and when all other revenue recognition criteria have been satisfied.
Maintenance revenue consists of renewal fees for existing maintenance plan agreements that were initially purchased with a
perpetual software license. Under our maintenance plan, customers are eligible to receive unspecified upgrades, when and if
available, and technical support. We recognize maintenance revenue ratably over the term of the agreements, which is generally one
year.
Other revenue consists of revenue from consulting, training and other services, and is recognized over time as the services are
performed. Other revenue also includes software license revenue from the sale of products which do not incorporate substantial
cloud services and is recognized up front.
2019 Form 10-K 44
Table of Contents
 Fiscal year
ended
January
31, 2019Change compared to
prior fiscal year  Fiscal
year
ended
January
31, 2018 
Management comments (in millions) $     %        
Net revenue:   
Subscription $1,802.3 $908.0 102 %
 $894.3
 Up due to growth across all
subscription types, led by product
subscription renewal revenue, which
benefited from the success of the M2S
program. Also contributing to the
growth was an increase in revenue
from new product subscriptions and
EBA  offerings.
Maintenance (1) 635.1 (354.5 ) (36)%
 989.6
 Down primarily due to the migration
of maintenance plan subscriptions to
subscription plan subscriptions with
the M2S program.
    Total subscription and maintenance revenue 2,437.4 553.5 29 % 1,883.9  
Other (2) 132.4 (40.3 ) (23)%
 172.7
 
 $2,569.8 $513.2 25 % $2,056.6  
   
____________________
(1) We expect maintenance revenue will continue to decline; however , the rate of decline will vary based on the number of renewals, the
renewal rate, and our ability to incentivize maintenance plan customers to switch over to subscription plan of ferings.
(2) Previously labeled as "License and other" in prior periods.
 Fiscal year
ended
January
31, 2018Change compared to
prior fiscal year  Fiscal
Year
Ended
January
31, 2017 
Management Comments (in millions) $ %        
Net revenue:   
Subscription $894.3 $451.2 102 %
 $443.1
 Up due to growth across all
subscription types, led by product
subscriptions and EBA  offerings,
primarily as a result of the business
model transition.
Maintenance (1) 989.6 (113.5) (10)%
 1,103.1
 Down due to the discontinued sale of
new maintenance agreements and the
migration of customers moving from
maintenance to subscription.
    Total subscription and maintenance revenue 1,883.9 337.7 22 % 1,546.2  
Other (2) 172.7 (312.1 ) (64)% 484.8  
 $2,056.6 $ 25.6 1 % $2,031.0  
   
____________________
(1) We expect maintenance revenue will continue to decline; however , the rate of decline will vary based on the number of renewals, the
renewal rate, and our ability to incentivize maintenance plan customers to switch over to subscription plan of ferings.
(2) Previously labeled as "License and other" in prior periods.
2019 Form 10-K 45
Table of Contents
Net Revenue by Product Family
Our product offerings are focused in four primary product families: AEC, ACAD, MFG, and M&E.
 Fiscal
year
ended
January
31, 2019 Change compared to
prior fiscal yearFiscal
year
ended
January
31, 2018 Management Comments 
(in millions) $      %      
Net revenue by product family (1):       
AEC $1,021.6
 234.1
 30 % $787.5 Up due to an increase in AEC collections as
well as an increase in revenue from EBAs and
our individual product of fering, Revit.
ACAD 731.8
 170.4
 30 % 561.4 Up due to increases in revenue from both
AutoCAD and AutoCAD L T.
MFG 616.2
 87.4
 17 % 528.8 Up due to an increase in MFG collections as
well as an increase in revenue from EBAs.
M&E 182.0
 29.9
 20 % 152.1 Up due to an increase in revenue from our
individual product of ferings 3DS Max and
Maya.
Other 18.2  (8.6) (32)% 26.8  
 $2,569.8  $513.2  25 % $2,056.6  
 
Fiscal year
ended
January
31, 2018Change compared to
prior fiscal yearFiscal Year
Ended
January
31, 2017 Management Comments 
(in millions) $ %      
Net revenue by product family (1):      
AEC $787.5 $(22.9 ) (3)% $810.4 Down due to a net decrease in AEC collections
and legacy suites due to the discontinuation of
perpetual licenses. The decrease was partially
offset by an increase in revenue from individual
AEC product of ferings and EBAs.
ACAD 561.4 88.7 19 % 472.7 Up due to increases in both AutoCAD L T and
AutoCAD.
MFG 528.8 (46.4 ) (8)% 575.2 Down due to a net decrease in MFG collections
and legacy suites due to the discontinuation of
perpetual licenses, partially of fset by an increase
in revenue from MFG EBAs.
M&E 152.1 13.3 10 % 138.8 Up due to an increase in Animation, partially
offset by a decrease in Creative Finishing.
Other 26.8 (7.1) (21)% 33.9  
 $2,056.6 $25.6 1 % $2,031.0  
____________________
(1) Due to changes in the go-to-market of ferings of our AutoCAD product subscription, prior period balances have been adjusted to conform to
current period presentation.
2019 Form 10-K 46
Table of Contents
Net Revenue by Geographic Area
 
Fiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2019Change compared to
prior fiscal year
 Constant
currency
change
compared to
prior fiscal
yearFiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2018
 Change compared to
prior fiscal year
 Constant
currency
change
compared to
prior fiscal
year
 Fiscal Year
Ended
January 31,
2017 
(in millions)  $      %      %  $       %      %
  
Net revenue:          
Americas          
U.S. $ 874.6 $134.2 18% * $ 740.4  $(1.7) — % * $ 742.1
Other Americas 175.3 44.6 34% * 130.7  0.9 1 % * 129.8
Total Americas 1,049.9 178.8 21% 20% 871.1  (0.8) — % —% 871.9
EMEA 1,034.3 218.9 27% 24% 815.4  15.0  2 % 4% 800.4
APAC 485.6 115.5 31% 31% 370.1  11.4 3 % 2% 358.7
Total net revenue (1) $2,569.8 $513.2 25% 24% $2,056.6  $25.6  1 % 2% $2,031.0
          
Emer ging economies $ 307.4 $80.9 36% 34% $ 226.5  $(1.0) — % —% $ 227.5
____________________
(1) Totals may not sum due to rounding.
* Constant currency data not provided at this level.
We believe that international revenue will continue to comprise a majority of our net revenue. Unfavorable economic
conditions in the countries that contribute a significant portion of our net revenue, including in emerging economies such as Brazil,
Russia, India, and China, may have an adverse effect on our business in those countries and our overall financial performance.
Changes in the value of the U.S. dollar relative to other currencies have significantly affected, and could continue to significantly
affect, our financial results for a given period even though we hedge a portion of our current and projected revenue. Increases to the
levels of political and economic unpredictability in the global market may impact our future financial results.
2019 Form 10-K 47
Table of Contents
Net Revenue by Sales Channel
 Year endedChange compared to
prior fiscal year Year ended 
Management comments (in millions)January 31,
2019 $     %    January 31,
2018  
Net revenue by sales channel:      
Indirect $1,830.8 $387.0
 27% $1,443.8
 Up due to an increase in subscription
revenue.
Direct 739.0 126.2
 21% 612.8
 Up due to an increase in revenue from
EBAs and our online Autodesk branded
store.
Total net revenue $2,569.8 $513.2  25% $2,056.6   
     
 Year endedChange compared to
prior fiscal year  Year ended
Management comments (in millions)January 31,
2018 $    %     January 31,
2017
Net revenue by sales channel:    
Indirect $1,443.8 $ (25.1 ) (2)%
 $1,468.9 Down due to a decrease in sales with
resellers.
Direct 612.8 50.7 9 %
 562.1 Up due to an increase in revenue from
EBAs and our online Autodesk branded
store.
Total net revenue $2,056.6 $ 25.6 1 % $2,031.0
   
Cost of Revenue and Operating Expenses
Cost of subscription and maintenance revenue includes the labor costs of providing product support to our subscription and
maintenance customers, including allocated IT and facilities costs, professional services fees related to operating our network and
cloud infrastructure, royalties, depreciation expense and operating lease payments associated with computer equipment, data center
costs, salaries, related expenses of network operations, and stock-based compensation expense.
Cost of other revenue includes labor costs associated with product setup, costs of consulting and training services contracts,
and collaborative project management services contracts. Cost of other revenue also includes stock-based compensation expense,
direct material and overhead charges, allocated IT and facilities costs, professional services fees and royalties. Direct material and
overhead charges include the cost associated with electronic and physical fulfillment.
Cost of revenue, at least over the near term, is affected by the volume and mix of product sales, fluctuations in consulting
costs, amortization of developed technology, new customer support offerings, royalty rates for licensed technology embedded in
our products and employee stock-based compensation expense.
Marketing and sales expenses include salaries, bonuses, benefits and stock-based compensation expense for our marketing
and sales employees, the expense of travel, entertainment and training for such personnel, sales and dealer commissions, and the
costs of programs aimed at increasing revenue, such as advertising, trade shows and expositions, and various sales and promotional
programs. Marketing and sales expenses also include payment processing fees, the cost of supplies and equipment, gains and losses
on our operating expense cash flow hedges, allocated IT and facilities costs, and labor costs associated with sales and order
management.
Research and development expenses, which are expensed as incurred, consist primarily of salaries, bonuses, benefits and
stock-based compensation expense for research and development employees, the expense of travel, entertainment and training for
such personnel, professional services such as fees paid to software development firms and independent contractors, gains and losses
on our operating expense cash flow hedges, and allocated IT and facilities costs.
2019 Form 10-K 48
Table of Contents
General and administrative expenses include salaries, bonuses, acquisition-related transition costs, benefits and stock-based
compensation expense for our CEO, finance, human resources and legal employees, as well as professional fees for legal and
accounting services, certain foreign business taxes, gains and losses on our operating expense cash flow hedges, expense of travel,
entertainment and training, net IT and facilities costs, and the cost of supplies and equipment.
 Fiscal year
ended
January 31,
2019Change compared to
prior fiscal year
 Fiscal year
ended
January 31,
2018 Management comments 
(in millions) $     %      
Cost of revenue:      
Subscription and
maintenance$ 216.0 $ 1.6 1 %
 $ 214.4 Up primarily due to an increase in cloud hosting costs
partially of fset by a decrease in royalty and depreciation
expense.
Other (1) 54.4 (18.2 ) (25)%
 72.6 Down primarily due to lower employee-related costs
from reduced headcount associated with the Fiscal 2018
Plan restructuring and lower professional fees.
 Amortization of
developed technology15.5 (0.9) (5)%
 16.4 Down as previously acquired developed technologies
continue to become fully amortized.
           Total cost of revenue $ 285.9 $ (17.5 ) (6)% $ 303.4  
      
Marketing and sales $1,183.9 $ 96.6 9 %
 $1,087.3 Up due to increased employee-related costs driven by
higher headcount, as well as higher cloud hosting costs
and professional fees.
Research and
development725.0 (30.5 ) (4)%
 755.5 Down due to a decrease in employee-related costs from
lower headcount associated with the Fiscal 2018 plan
restructuring partially of fset by higher professional
fees.
General and
administrative340.1 34.9 11 %
 305.2 Up primarily due to higher professional fees, employee-
related costs and facilities costs, partially of fset by
lower employee benefits costs.
Amortization of
purchased intangibles18.0 (2.2) (11)%
 20.2 Down as previously acquired intangible assets continue
to become fully amortized.
Restructuring and other
exit costs, net41.9 (52.2 ) (55)%
 94.1 Down as we substantially completed the reduction in
force and facilities consolidation of the Fiscal 2018
Plan.
 $2,308.9 $ 46.6 2 % $2,262.3  
      
2019 Form 10-K 49
Table of Contents
 Fiscal year
ended
January 31,
2018Change compared to
prior fiscal year
 Fiscal year
ended
January 31,
2017 Management comments 
(in millions) $      %      
Cost of revenue:      
Subscription and
maintenance
$ 214.4 $ 22.7 12 % $ 191.7Up due to an increase in employee-related costs driven
by increased headcount associated with maintenance
and subscription services in support of the business
model transition.
Other (1)
72.6 (37.6 ) (34)% 110.2Down due to lower employee-related costs from
reduced headcount associated with license and other
revenue products and services as a result of our move to
a subscription based business model.
 Amortization of
developed technology
16.4 (23.6 ) (59)% 40.0Down as previously acquired developed technologies
continue to become fully amortized while fewer assets
are acquired compared to the prior year .
           Total cost of revenue $ 303.4 $ (38.5 ) (11)% $ 341.9  
      
Marketing and sales
$1,087.3 $ 64.8 6 % $1,022.5Up due to increase in employee-related costs from
higher headcount, increased commissions, and
increased stock-based compensation expense from a
higher fair value of awards granted.
Research and
development 755.5 (10.6 ) (1)% 766.1Down due to a decrease in employee-related costs from
lower headcount.
General and
administrative
305.2 17.4 6 % 287.8Up driven by costs associated with the CEO transition
and an increase in stock-based compensation expense
from a higher fair value of awards granted, partially
offset by a decrease in employee-related costs from
lower headcount.
Amortization of
purchased intangibles
20.2 (11.6) (36)% 31.8Down as previously acquired intangible assets continue
to become fully amortized and fewer assets are
acquired compared to the prior year .
Restructuring and other
exit costs, net
94.1 13.6 17 % 80.5Driven by the Fiscal 2018 Plan to re-balance resources
to better align with the Company's strategic priorities
and position itself to meet long-term goals. Costs
associated with the Fiscal 2018 Plan are principally
from employee termination benefits, lease termination
costs and other exit costs.
 $2,262.3 $ 73.6 3 % $2,188.7  
      
____________________
(1) Previously labeled as "License and other" in prior periods.
The following table highlights our expectation for the absolute dollar change and percent of revenue change for fiscal 2020 as
compared to fiscal 2019:
 Absolute dollar impact Percent of net revenue impact
Cost of revenue Increase Slight decrease
Marketing and sales Increase Decrease
Research and development Increase Decrease
General and administrative Increase Decrease
Amortization of purchased intangibles Increase Slight increase
2019 Form 10-K 50
Table of Contents
Interest and Other Expense, Net
The following table sets forth the components of interest and other expense, net:
 Fiscal year ended January 31,
 2019 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Interest and investment expense, net $ (52.1 )$ (34.5 ) $ (29.7 )
Gain (loss) on foreign currency 5.1 (3.3) (3.3)
Gain (loss) on strategic investments 12.5 (16.4 ) 0.3
Other income 16.8 6.0 8.5
Interest and other expense, net $ (17.7 )$ (48.2 ) $ (24.2 )
Interest and other expense, net, positively changed by $30.5 million during fiscal 2019, as compared to fiscal 2018, primarily
driven by curtailment gains on our pension plans, mark-to-market gains on certain of our privately-held strategic investments,
realized gains on sales of strategic investments, offset by an increase in interest expense resulting from our term loan entered into
on December 17, 2018 in aggregate principal amount of $500 million and mark-to-market losses on marketable securities.
Interest and other expense, net, increased $24.0 million during fiscal 2018, as compared to fiscal 2017, primarily related to
increases in impairment losses on certain of our privately-held strategic investments and interest expense resulting from our June
2017 issuance of $500.0 million aggregate principal amount of 3.5% notes due June 15, 2027.
Interest expense and investment income fluctuates based on average cash, marketable securities and debt balances, average
maturities and interest rates.
Gains and losses on foreign currency are primarily due to the impact of re-measuring foreign currency transactions and net
monetary assets into the functional currency of the corresponding entity. The amount of the gain or loss on foreign currency is
driven by the volume of foreign currency transactions and the foreign currency exchange rates for the year.
Provision for Income Taxes
We account for income taxes and the related accounts under the liability method. Deferred tax liabilities and assets are
determined based on the difference between the financial statement and tax bases of assets and liabilities, using enacted rates
expected to be in effect during the year in which the basis differences reverse.
Income tax expense was $38.1 million and $9.6 million for fiscal 2019 and 2018, respectively, relative to pre-tax losses of
$42.7 million and $557.3 million, respectively, for the same periods.  Tax expense for fiscal 2019 consists primarily of foreign tax
expense including withholding tax and tax amortization on indefinite-lived intangibles offset by a benefit for the release of
uncertain tax positions upon finalization of IRS examination during the current fiscal year. In addition, we had a tax benefit from
the release of valuation allowance from acquired deferred tax liabilities during the current fiscal year. Tax expense for fiscal 2018
consisted primarily of foreign tax expense including withholding tax and tax amortization on indefinite-lived intangibles offset by
the revaluation of our deferred tax liability due to the corporate rate reduction under the Tax Act. We recorded a tax benefit of the
Tax Act in our financial statements as of January 31, 2018 of approximately $32.3 million mainly driven by the corporate rate
remeasurement of the indefinite-lived intangible deferred tax liability.
The Tax Act was signed into law on December 22, 2017 and provided broad and significant changes to the U.S. corporate
income tax regime. In light of our fiscal year-end, the Tax Act reduced the statutory federal corporate rate from 35% to 33.81% for
fiscal 2018 and to 21% for fiscal 2019 and forward. The Tax Act also, among many other provisions, imposed a one-time
mandatory tax on accumulated earnings of foreign subsidiaries (commonly referred to as the "transition tax"), subjected the deemed
intangible income of our foreign subsidiaries to current U.S. taxation (commonly referred to as "GILTI"), provided for a full
dividends received deduction upon repatriation of untaxed earnings of our foreign subsidiaries, imposed a minimum taxation
(without most tax credits) on modified taxable income, which is generally taxable income without deductions for payments to
related foreign companies (commonly referred to as “BEAT”), modified the accelerated depreciation deduction rules, and made
updates to the deductibility of certain expenses. We have completed our determination of the accounting implications of the Tax Act
on our tax accruals.
2019 Form 10-K 51
Table of Contents
As of January 31, 2018, we estimated taxable income associated with offshore earnings of $831.5 million, and as of January
31, 2019, we adjusted the taxable income to $819.6 million to reflect the impact of Treasury Regulations issued in the fourth
quarter of fiscal 2019. Transition tax related to adjustments in offshore earnings resulted in no impact to the effective tax rate as it is
primarily offset by net operating losses that are subject to a full valuation allowance. As a result of the transition tax, we recorded a
deferred tax asset of approximately $45.1 million for foreign tax credits, which are also subject to a full valuation allowance.
We are subject to GILTI in fiscal 2019, primarily offset by current year operating losses, resulting in no impact to the
effective tax rate.
We anticipate that the U.S. Department of Treasury and other standard-setting bodies will continue to interpret or issue
guidance on how provisions of the Tax Act will be applied or otherwise administered. As future guidance is issued, we may make
adjustments to amounts that we have previously recorded that may materially impact our financial statements in the period in which
the adjustments are made.
A valuation allowance is recorded to reduce deferred tax assets when management cannot conclude that it is more likely than
not that the net deferred tax asset will be recovered. The valuation allowance is determined by assessing both positive and negative
evidence to determine whether it is more likely than not that deferred tax assets are recoverable; such assessment is required on a
jurisdiction-by-jurisdiction basis. Significant judgment is required in determining whether the valuation allowance should be
recorded against deferred tax assets. In assessing the need for a valuation allowance, we consider all available evidence including
past operating results and estimates of future taxable income. Beginning in the second quarter of fiscal 2016, we considered recent
cumulative losses in the U.S. arising from our business model transition as a significant source of negative evidence. Considering
this negative evidence and the absence of sufficient positive objective evidence that we would generate sufficient taxable income in
the U.S. to realize the deferred tax assets, we determined that it was more likely than not that we would not realize the U.S. federal
and state deferred tax assets and recorded a full valuation allowance. Furthermore, in the first quarter of fiscal 2018, our Singapore
operation, similar to the U.S. incurred cumulative losses and recorded a full valuation allowance against the net deferred tax asset.
As we continually strive to optimize our overall business model, tax planning strategies may become feasible whereby management
may determine that it is more likely than not that the federal and state deferred tax assets will be realized; as a result, we will
continue to evaluate the realizability of our net deferred tax assets each quarter, both in the U.S. and in foreign jurisdictions, based
on all available evidence, both positive and negative.
As of January 31, 2019, we had $209.0 million of gross unrecognized tax benefits, of which $190.6 million would reduce our
valuation allowance, if recognized. The remaining $18.4 million would impact the effective tax rate.  It is possible that the amount
of unrecognized tax benefits will change in the next twelve months; however, an estimate of the range of the possible change
cannot be made at this time.
Our future effective annual tax rate may be materially impacted by the amount of benefits and charges from tax amounts
associated with our foreign earnings that are taxed at rates different from the federal statutory rate, changes in valuation allowances,
level of profit before tax, accounting for uncertain tax positions, business combinations, closure of statute of limitations or
settlement of tax audits, and changes in tax laws including impacts of the Tax Act. A significant amount of our earnings is generated
by our Europe and Asia Pacific subsidiaries. Our future effective tax rates may be adversely affected to the extent earnings are
lower than anticipated in countries where we have lower statutory tax rates. 
At January 31, 2019, we had non-current foreign net deferred tax assets of $54.3 million that management believes are more
likely than not to be realized in future years.
For additional information regarding our income tax provision and reconciliation of our effective rate to the federal statutory
rate of 21%, see Part II, Item 8, Note 5, “Income Taxes,” in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
2019 Form 10-K 52
Table of Contents
OTHER FINANCIAL INFORMATION
In addition to our results determined under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (“GAAP”) discussed above, we
believe the following non-GAAP measures are useful to investors in evaluating our operating performance. For the fiscal years
ended January 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, our gross profit, gross margin, (loss) income from operations, operating margin, net (loss)
income, diluted net (loss) income per share and diluted shares used in per share calculation on a GAAP and non-GAAP basis were
as follows (in millions except for gross margin, operating margin, and per share data):
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2019 2018 2017
 (Unaudited)
Gross profit $ 2,283.9 $ 1,753.2 $ 1,689.1
Non-GAAP  gross profit $ 2,317.0 $ 1,785.5 $ 1,743.2
Gross mar gin 89 % 85 % 83 %
Non-GAAP  gross mar gin 90 % 87 % 86 %
Loss from operations $ (25.0 ) $ (509.1 ) $ (499.6 )
Non-GAAP  income (loss) from operations $ 316.0 $ (112.0) $ (125.5 )
Operating mar gin (1)% (25)% (25)%
Non-GAAP  operating mar gin 12 % (5)% (6)%
Net loss $ (80.8 ) $ (566.9 ) $ (582.1 )
Non-GAAP  net income (loss) $ 223.3 $ (106.3 ) $ (111.0)
Diluted net loss per share $ (0.37 ) $ (2.58 ) $ (2.61 )
Non-GAAP  diluted net income (loss) per share $ 1.01 $ (0.48 ) $ (0.50 )
GAAP  diluted weighted average shares used in per share calculation 218.9 219.5 222.7
Non-GAAP  diluted weighted average shares used in per share calculation 222.0 219.5 222.7
 
For our internal budgeting and resource allocation process and as a means to provide consistency in period-to-period
comparisons, we use non-GAAP measures to supplement our consolidated financial statements presented on a GAAP basis. These
non-GAAP measures do not include certain items that may have a material impact upon our reported financial results. We also use
non-GAAP measures in making operating decisions because we believe those measures provide meaningful supplemental
information regarding our earning potential and performance for management by excluding certain benefits, credits, expenses and
charges that may not be indicative of our core business operating results. For the reasons set forth below, we believe these non-
GAAP financial measures are useful to investors both because (1) they allow for greater transparency with respect to key metrics
used by management in its financial and operational decision-making and (2) they are used by our institutional investors and the
analyst community to help them analyze the health of our business. This allows investors and others to better understand and
evaluate our operating results and future prospects in the same manner as management, compare financial results across accounting
periods and to those of peer companies and to better understand the long-term performance of our core business. We also use some
of these measures for purposes of determining company-wide incentive compensation.
There are limitations in using non-GAAP financial measures because non-GAAP financial measures are not prepared in
accordance with GAAP and may be different from non-GAAP financial measures used by other companies. The non-GAAP
financial measures included above are limited in value because they exclude certain items that may have a material impact upon our
reported financial results. In addition, they are subject to inherent limitations as they reflect the exercise of judgments by
management about which charges are excluded from the non-GAAP financial measures. We compensate for these limitations by
analyzing current and future results on a GAAP basis as well as a non-GAAP basis and also by providing GAAP measures in our
public disclosures. The presentation of non-GAAP financial information is meant to be considered in addition to, not as a substitute
for or in isolation from, the directly comparable financial measures prepared in accordance with GAAP. We urge investors to
review the reconciliation of our non-GAAP financial measures to the comparable GAAP financial measures included below, and
not to rely on any single financial measure to evaluate our business.
2019 Form 10-K 53
Table of Contents
RECONCILATION OF GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES TO NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES
(In millions except for gross margin, operating margin, and per share data) (1):
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2019 2018 2017
(Unaudited)
Gross profit $ 2,283.9 $ 1,753.2 $ 1,689.1
Stock-based compensation expense 17.6 15.9 14.1
Amortization of developed technologies 15.5 16.4 40.0
Non-GAAP  gross profit $ 2,317.0 $ 1,785.5 $ 1,743.2
Gross mar gin 89 % 85 % 83 %
Stock-based compensation expense 1 % 1 % 1 %
Amortization of developed technologies 1 % 1 % 2 %
Non-GAAP  gross mar gin (1) 90 % 87 % 86 %
Loss from operations $ (25.0 ) $ (509.1 ) $ (499.6 )
Stock-based compensation expense 249.5 245.0 221.8
Amortization of developed technologies 15.5 16.4 40.0
Amortization of purchased intangibles 18.0 20.2 31.8
CEO transition costs (2) (0.1) 21.4 —
Acquisition related costs 16.2 — —
Restructuring and other exit costs, net 41.9 94.1 80.5
Non-GAAP  income (loss) from operations $ 316.0 $ (112.0) $ (125.5 )
Operating mar gin (1)% (25)% (25)%
Stock-based compensation expense 10 % 12 % 11 %
Amortization of developed technologies 1 % 1 % 2 %
Amortization of purchased intangibles 1 % 1 % 2 %
CEO transition costs (2) — % 1 % — %
Acquisition related costs 1 % — % — %
Restructuring and other exit costs, net 1 % 5 % 4 %
Non-GAAP  operating mar gin (1) 12 % (5)% (6)%
Net loss $ (80.8 ) $ (566.9 ) $ (582.1 )
Stock-based compensation expense 249.5 245.0 221.8
Amortization of developed technologies 15.5 16.4 40.0
Amortization of purchased intangibles 18.0 20.2 31.8
CEO transition costs (2) (0.1) 21.4 —
Acquisition related costs 16.2 — —
Restructuring and other exit costs, net 31.7 94.1 80.5
(Gain) loss on strategic investments (12.5 ) 16.5 (0.3)
Discrete tax provision items (31.4 ) (20.7 ) (2.7)
Income tax ef fect of non-GAAP  adjustments 17.2 67.7 100.0
Non-GAAP  net income (loss) $ 223.3 $ (106.3 ) $ (111.0)
2019 Form 10-K 54
Table of Contents
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2019 2018  2017
(Unaudited)
Diluted net (loss) income per share $ (0.37 )$ (2.58 ) $ (2.61 )
Stock-based compensation expense 1.12 1.11 1.00
Amortization of developed technologies 0.08 0.08  0.18
Amortization of purchased intangibles 0.08 0.09  0.14
CEO transition costs (2) — 0.09  —
Acquisition related costs 0.07 — —
Restructuring and other exit costs, net 0.14 0.43  0.35
(Gain) loss on strategic investments (0.05 ) 0.08  —
Discrete tax provision items (0.14 ) (0.09 ) (0.01 )
Income tax ef fect of non-GAAP  adjustments 0.08 0.31  0.45
Non-GAAP  diluted income (loss) per share $ 1.01 $ (0.48 ) $ (0.50 )
_______________
(1) Totals may not sum due to rounding.
(2) CEO transition costs include stock-based compensation of $16.4 million related to the acceleration of eligible stock awards in conjunction
with the Company's former CEOs' transition agreements for the fiscal year ended January 31, 2018.
Our non-GAAP financial measures may exclude the following:
Stock-based compensation expenses.  We exclude stock-based compensation expenses from non-GAAP measures primarily
because they are non-cash expenses and management finds it useful to exclude certain non-cash charges to assess the appropriate
level of various operating expenses to assist in budgeting, planning and forecasting future periods. Moreover, because of varying
available valuation methodologies, subjective assumptions and the variety of award types that companies can use under FASB ASC
Topic 718, we believe excluding stock-based compensation expenses allows investors to make meaningful comparisons between
our recurring core business operating results and those of other companies.
Amortization of developed technologies and purchased intangibles.  We incur amortization of acquisition-related developed
technology and purchased intangibles in connection with acquisitions of certain businesses and technologies. Amortization of
developed technologies and purchased intangibles is inconsistent in amount and frequency and is significantly affected by the
timing and size of our acquisitions. Management finds it useful to exclude these variable charges from our cost of revenues to assist
in budgeting, planning and forecasting future periods. Investors should note that the use of intangible assets contributed to our
revenues earned during the periods presented and will contribute to our future period revenues as well. Amortization of developed
technologies and purchased intangible assets will recur in future periods.
CEO transition costs. We exclude amounts paid to the Company's former CEOs upon departure under the terms of their
transition agreements, including severance payments, acceleration of restricted stock units, and continued vesting of performance
stock units, and legal fees incurred with the transition. Also excluded from our non-GAAP measures are recruiting costs related to
the search for a new CEO. These costs represent non-recurring expenses and are not indicative of our ongoing operating expenses.
We further believe that excluding the CEO transition costs from our non-GAAP results is useful to investors in that it allows for
period-over-period comparability.
Goodwill impairment.  This is a non-cash charge to write-down goodwill to fair value when there was an indication that the
asset was impaired. As explained above, management finds it useful to exclude certain non-cash charges to assess the appropriate
level of various operating expenses to assist in budgeting, planning and forecasting future periods.
Restructuring and other exit costs, net.  These expenses are associated with realigning our business strategies based on current
economic conditions. In connection with these restructuring actions or other exit actions, we recognize costs related to termination
benefits for former employees whose positions were eliminated, the closure of facilities and cancellation of certain contracts. We
exclude these charges because these expenses are not reflective of ongoing business and operating results. We believe it is useful
for investors to understand the effects of these items on our total operating expenses.
2019 Form 10-K 55
Table of Contents
Acquisition related costs. We exclude certain acquisition related costs, including due diligence costs, professional fees in
connection with an acquisition, certain financing costs, and certain integration related expenses.  These expenses are unpredictable,
and dependent on factors that may be outside of our control and unrelated to the continuing operations of the acquired business, or
our Company.  In addition, the size and complexity of an acquisition, which often drives the magnitude of acquisition related costs,
may not be indicative of such future costs.  We believe excluding acquisition related costs facilitates the comparison of our
financial results to the Company's historical operating results and to other companies in our industry.
(Gain) loss on strategic investments and dispositions. We exclude gains and losses related to our strategic investments and
dispositions from our non-GAAP measures primarily because management finds it useful to exclude these variable gains and losses
on these investments and dispositions in assessing our financial results. Included in these amounts are non-cash unrealized gains
and losses on the derivative components, dividends received, realized gains and losses on the sales or losses on the impairment of
these investments and dispositions. We believe excluding these items is useful to investors because these excluded items do not
correlate to the underlying performance of our business and these losses or gains were incurred in connection with strategic
investments and dispositions which do not occur regularly.
Discrete tax items. We exclude the GAAP tax provision, including discrete items, from the non-GAAP measure of net (loss)
income, and include a non-GAAP tax provision based upon the projected annual non-GAAP effective tax rate. Discrete tax items
include income tax expenses or benefits that do not relate to ordinary income from continuing operations in the current fiscal year,
unusual or infrequently occurring items, or the tax impact of certain stock-based compensation. Examples of discrete tax items
include, but are not limited to, certain changes in judgment and changes in estimates of tax matters related to prior fiscal years,
certain costs related to business combinations, certain changes in the realizability of deferred tax assets or changes in tax
law. Management believes this approach assists investors in understanding the tax provision and the effective tax rate related to
ongoing operations. We believe the exclusion of these discrete tax items provides investors with useful supplemental information
about our operational performance.
Establishment of a valuation allowance on certain net deferred tax assets.  This is a non-cash charge to record a valuation
allowance on certain deferred tax assets. As explained above, management finds it useful to exclude certain non-cash charges to
assess the appropriate level of various cash expenses to assist in budgeting, planning and forecasting future periods.
Income tax effects on the difference between GAAP and non-GAAP costs and expenses. The income tax effects that are
excluded from the non-GAAP measures relate to the tax impact on the difference between GAAP and non-GAAP expenses,
primarily due to stock-based compensation, amortization of purchased intangibles and restructuring charges and other exit costs
(benefits) for GAAP and non-GAAP measures.
LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
Our primary source of cash is from the sale of our software and related services. Our primary use of cash is payment of our
operating costs, which consist primarily of employee-related expenses, such as compensation and benefits, as well as general
operating expenses for marketing, facilities and overhead costs. In addition to operating expenses, we also use cash to fund our
stock repurchase program and invest in our growth initiatives, which include acquisitions of products, technology and businesses.
See further discussion of these items below.
At January 31, 2019, our principal sources of liquidity were cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities totaling $953.6
million and net accounts receivable of $474.3 million.
On December 17, 2018, Autodesk entered into a new Credit Agreement (the “Credit Agreement”) for an unsecured revolving
loan facility in the aggregate principal amount of $650.0 million, with an option to request increases in the amount of the credit
facility by up to an additional $350.0 million. The Credit Agreement replaced and terminated our $400.0 million Amended and
Restated Credit Agreement. The maturity date on the line of credit facility is December 2023. At January 31, 2019, Autodesk had
no outstanding borrowings on this line of credit. As of March 25, 2019, we have no amounts outstanding under the credit facility.
See Part II, Item 8, Note 8, "Borrowing Arrangements," in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements for further discussion on
our covenant requirements. If we are unable to remain in compliance with the covenants, we will not be able to draw on our credit
facility.
On December 17, 2018, we also entered into a Term Loan Agreement (the “Term Loan Agreement”) which provided for a
delayed draw term loan facility in the aggregate principal amount of $500.0 million. On December 19, 2018, we borrowed a $500.0
million term loan under the Term Loan Agreement in connection with the acquisition of PlanGrid. See Part II, Item 8,
2019 Form 10-K 56
Table of Contents
Note 8, "Borrowing Arrangements," in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements for further discussion on the Term Loan
Agreement terms and Part II, Item 8, Note 6, "Acquisitions" for further discussion on the PlanGrid acquisition.
In addition to the term loan, as of January 31, 2019, we have $1.6 billion aggregate principal amount of Notes outstanding.
See Part II, Item 8, Note 8, "Borrowing Arrangements," in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements for further discussion.
Our cash and cash equivalents are held by diversified financial institutions globally. Our primary commercial banking
relationship is with Citigroup and its global affiliates. In addition, Citibank N.A., an affiliate of Citigroup, is one of the lead lenders
and agent in the syndicate of our $650.0 million line of credit.
Long-term cash requirements for items other than normal operating expenses are anticipated for the following: repayment of
debt; common stock repurchases; the acquisition of businesses, software products, or technologies complementary to our business;
and capital expenditures, including the purchase and implementation of internal-use software applications.
Our cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities balances are concentrated in a few locations around the world, with
substantial amounts held outside of the United States. As of January 31, 2019, approximately 52% of our total cash or cash
equivalents and marketable securities are located in foreign jurisdictions and that percentage will fluctuate subject to business
needs. There are several factors that can impact our ability to utilize foreign cash balances, such as foreign exchange restrictions,
foreign regulatory restrictions or adverse tax costs. The Tax Act includes a mandatory one-time tax on accumulated earnings of
foreign subsidiaries and generally eliminates U.S. taxes on foreign subsidiary distributions in future periods. As a result, earnings in
foreign jurisdictions are generally available for distribution to the U.S. with little to no incremental U.S. taxes. We regularly review
our capital structure and consider a variety of potential financing alternatives and planning strategies to ensure we have the proper
liquidity available in the locations in which it is needed. We expect to meet our liquidity needs through a combination of current
cash balances, ongoing cash flows, and external borrowings.
Cash from operations could also be affected by various risks and uncertainties, including, but not limited to the risks detailed
in Part I, Item 1A titled “Risk Factors.” However, based on our current business plan and revenue prospects, we believe that our
existing balances, our anticipated cash flows from operations and our available credit facility will be sufficient to meet our working
capital and operating resource expenditure requirements for at least the next 12 months.
Our revenue, earnings, cash flows, receivables, and payables are subject to fluctuations due to changes in foreign currency
exchange rates, for which we have put in place foreign currency contracts as part of our risk management strategy. See Part II, Item
7A, “Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk” for further discussion.
 Fiscal year ended January 31,
(in millions) 2019 2018  2017
Net cash provided by operating activities $377.1 $ 0.9 $169.7
Net cash (used in) provided by investing activities (710.4 ) 506.4  272.0
Net cash provided by (used in) financing activities 151.9 (656.6 ) (578.3 )
Net cash provided by operating activities of $377.1 million for fiscal 2019 consisted of $371.8 million of non-cash expenses,
including stock-based compensation expense, restructuring charges, net, depreciation, amortization and accretion expense,
offsetting our net loss of $80.8 million, and included $86.1 million of cash flow provided by changes in operating assets and
liabilities.
The primary working capital source of cash was an increase in deferred revenue from $1,955.1 million as of January 31,
2018, to $2,091.4 million as of January 31, 2019. The primary working capital uses of cash were decreases in accounts payable and
other accrued liabilities.
Net cash used in investing activities was $710.4 million for fiscal 2019 and was primarily due to acquisitions, net of cash
acquired and purchases of marketable securities. These cash outflows were partially offset by sales and maturities of marketable
securities.
2019 Form 10-K 57
Table of Contents
At January 31, 2019, our short-term investment portfolio had an estimated fair value of $67.6 million and a cost basis of
$62.8 million. The portfolio fair value consisted of $60.3 million of trading securities that were invested in a defined set of mutual
funds as directed by the participants in our Deferred Compensation Plan (see Note 7, “Deferred Compensation,” in the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements for further discussion) and $7.3 million invested in other available-for-sale short-term securities.
Net cash provided by financing activities was $151.9 million in fiscal 2019 and was primarily due to proceeds from debt
issuance, net of discount and proceeds from issuance of stock. These cash inflows were partially offset by repurchases of our
common stock and taxes paid related to net share settlement of equity awards.
CONTRACTUAL OBLIGATIONS
The following table summarizes our significant financial contractual obligations at January 31, 2019, and the effect such
obligations are expected to have on our liquidity and cash flows in future periods.
Total  Fiscal year 2020 Fiscal years
2021-2022  Fiscal years
2023-2024 Thereafter
     (in millions)   
Notes $ 1,898.3  $ 57.3  $ 541.7  $ 422.3 $ 877.0
Term loan 533.8  18.0  515.8  — —
Operating lease obligations 409.8  75.4  115.3  92.1 127.0
Purchase obligations 82.7  47.8  17.0  11.7 6.2
Deferred compensation obligations 60.3  5.0 9.2 8.8 37.3
Pension obligations 25.5  2.4 4.6 4.6 13.9
Asset retirement obligations 10.4  6.7 1.1 1.2 1.4
Total (1) $ 3,020.8  $ 212.6 $ 1,204.7 $ 540.7 $ 1,062.8
____________________ 
(1) This table generally excludes amounts already recorded on the balance sheet as current liabilities, certain purchase obligations as discussed
below , long term deferred revenue, and amounts related to income tax liabilities for uncertain tax positions, since we cannot predict with
reasonable reliability the timing of cash settlements to the respective taxing authorities (see Part II, Item 8, Note 5, “Income Taxes” in the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements).
Notes consist of the Notes issued in December 2012, June 2015 and June 2017. See Part II, Item 8, Note 8, "Borrowing
Arrangements," in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements for further discussion..
Term loan consists of the Term Loan Agreement entered into on December 17, 2018 as described above.
Operating lease obligations consist primarily of obligations for facilities, net of sublease income, computer equipment and
other equipment leases.
Purchase obligations are contractual obligations for purchase of goods or services and are defined as agreements that are
enforceable and legally binding on Autodesk and that specify all significant terms, including: fixed or minimum quantities to be
purchased; fixed, minimum, or variable price provisions; and the approximate timing of the transaction. Purchase obligations relate
primarily to enterprise subscription agreements, IT infrastructure costs, and marketing costs.
Deferred compensation obligations relate to amounts held in a rabbi trust under our non-qualified deferred compensation
plan. See Part II, Item 8, Note 7, “Deferred Compensation,” in our Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements for further
information regarding this plan.
Pension obligations relate to our obligations for pension plans outside of the U.S. See Part II, Item 8, Note 15, “Retirement
Benefit Plans,” in our Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements for further information regarding these obligations.
Asset retirement obligations represent the estimated costs to bring certain office buildings that we lease back to their original
condition after the termination of the lease.
2019 Form 10-K 58
Table of Contents
Purchase orders or contracts for the purchase of supplies and other goods and services are not included in the table above. We
are not able to determine the aggregate amount of such purchase orders that represent contractual obligations, as purchase orders
may represent authorizations to purchase rather than binding agreements. Our purchase orders are based on our current
procurement or development needs and are fulfilled by our vendors within short time horizons. We do not have significant
agreements for the purchase of supplies or other goods specifying minimum quantities or set prices that exceed our expected
requirements for three months. In addition, we have certain software royalty commitments associated with the shipment and
licensing of certain products.
The expected timing of payment of the obligations discussed above is estimated based on current information. Timing of
payments and actual amounts paid may be different depending on the time of receipt of goods or services or changes to agreed-
upon amounts for some obligations.
We provide indemnifications of varying scopes and certain guarantees, including limited product warranties. Historically,
costs related to these warranties and indemnifications have not been significant, but because potential future costs are highly
variable, we are unable to estimate the maximum potential impact of these guarantees on our future results of operations.
ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
Autodesk's stock repurchase program provides Autodesk with the ability to offset the dilution from the issuance of stock
under our employee stock plans and reduce shares outstanding over time, and has the effect of returning excess cash generated from
our business to stockholders. Under the share repurchase program, Autodesk may repurchase shares from time to time in open
market transactions, privately-negotiated transactions, accelerated share repurchase programs, tender offers, or by other means. The
share repurchase program does not have an expiration date and the pace and timing of repurchases will depend on factors such as
cash generation from operations, available surplus, the volume of employee stock plan activity, remaining shares available in the
authorized pool, cash requirements for acquisitions, economic and market conditions, stock price and legal and regulatory
requirements.
During the three and twelve months ended January 31, 2019, we repurchased 0.2 million and 2.2 million shares of our
common stock, respectively. At January 31, 2019, 17.4 million shares remained available for repurchase under the repurchase
program approved by the Board of Directors. This program does not have a fixed expiration date. See Part II, Item 8, Note 10,
“Stockholders' (Deficit) Equity,” in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements for further discussion.
OFF-BALANCE SHEET ARRANGEMENTS
As of January 31, 2019, we did not have any significant off-balance sheet arrangements other than operating leases, as
defined in Item 303(a)(4)(ii) of Regulation S-K.
2019 Form 10-K 59
Table of Contents
ITEM 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
FOREIGN CURRENCY EXCHANGE RISK
Our revenue, earnings, cash flows, receivables, and payables are subject to fluctuations due to changes in foreign currency
exchange rates. Our risk management strategy utilizes foreign currency contracts to manage our exposure to foreign currency
volatility that exists as part of our ongoing business operations. We utilize cash flow hedge contracts to reduce the exchange rate
impact on a portion of the net revenue or operating expense of certain anticipated transactions. In addition, we use balance sheet
hedge contracts to reduce the exchange rate risk associated primarily with foreign currency denominated receivables and payables.
As of January 31, 2019, and 2018, we had open cash flow and balance sheet hedge contracts with future settlements within one to
twelve months. Contracts were primarily denominated in euros, Japanese yen, British pounds, Canadian dollars, Australian dollars,
Singapore dollars, Swiss francs, Swedish krona, and Czech krona. We do not enter into foreign exchange derivative instruments for
trading or speculative purposes. The notional amount of our option and forward contracts was $1,383.3 million and $949.5 million
at January 31, 2019, and 2018, respectively.
We use foreign currency contracts to reduce the exchange rate impact on the net revenue and operating expenses of certain
anticipated transactions. A sensitivity analysis performed on our hedging portfolio as of January 31, 2019, indicated that a
hypothetical 10% appreciation of the U.S. dollar from its value at January 31, 2019 and 2018 would increase the fair value of our
foreign currency contracts by $123.4 million and $57.9 million, respectively. A hypothetical 10% depreciation of the dollar from its
value at January 31, 2019, and 2018 would decrease the fair value of our foreign currency contracts by $98.3 million and $83.2
million, respectively.
INTEREST RATE RISK
Interest rate movements affect both the interest income we earn on our short-term investments and the market value of certain
longer term securities. At January 31, 2019, we had $443.7 million of cash equivalents and marketable securities, including $67.6
million classified as short-term marketable securities. If interest rates were to move up by 50 or 100 basis points over a twelve
month period, the market value change of our marketable securities would not have a meaningful unrealized gain or loss.
In December 2018, we entered into a $500.0 million term loan facility, all of which was outstanding as of January 31, 2019.
The term loan bears interest, at Autodesk's option, at either (i) a floating rate per annum equal to the base rate plus a margin
between 0.000% and 0.625%, depending on Autodesk's Public Debt Rating or (ii) a per annum rate equal to the rate at which dollar
deposits are offered in the London interbank market, plus a margin of between 0.875% and 1.625%, depending on Autodesk's
Public Debt Rating. Based on Autodesk's current credit ratings the term loan bears interest at a per annum rate equal to the rate at
which dollar deposits are offered in the London interbank market, plus a margin of 1.125% per annum. A hypothetical increase or
decrease of 50 or 100 basis points would not have a material impact on our results of operations. The term loan facility matures in
December 2020.
OTHER MARKET RISK
From time to time we make direct investments in privately held companies. Privately held company investments generally are
considered inherently risky. The technologies and products these companies have under development are typically in the early
stages and may never materialize, which could result in a loss of all or a substantial part of our initial investment in these
companies. The evaluation of privately held companies is based on information that we request from these companies, which is not
subject to the same disclosure regulations as U.S. publicly traded companies, and as such, the basis for these evaluations is subject
to the timing and accuracy of the data received from these companies. See Part II, Item 8, Note 3, "Financial Instruments" in the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements for further discussion regarding our privately held investments.
For information about exposure to counter-party credit-related losses, see Part II, Item 8, Note 1, “Business and Summary of
Significant Accounting Policies - Concentration of Credit Risk."
2019 Form 10-K 60
Table of Contents
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
AUTODESK, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
(In millions, except per share data)
 
 Fiscal year ended January 31,
2019  2018  2017
Net revenue:     
Subscription $ 1,802.3  $ 894.3  $ 443.1
Maintenance 635.1  989.6  1,103.1
Total subscription and maintenance revenue 2,437.4  1,883.9  1,546.2
Other (1) 132.4  172.7  484.8
Total net revenue 2,569.8  2,056.6  2,031.0
Cost of revenue:     
Cost of subscription and maintenance revenue 216.0  214.4  191.7
Cost of other revenue (2) 54.4  72.6  110.2
Amortization of developed technology 15.5  16.4  40.0
Total cost of revenue 285.9  303.4  341.9
Gross profit 2,283.9  1,753.2  1,689.1
Operating expenses:     
Marketing and sales 1,183.9  1,087.3  1,022.5
Research and development 725.0  755.5  766.1
General and administrative 340.1  305.2  287.8
Amortization of purchased intangibles 18.0  20.2  31.8
Restructuring and other exit costs, net 41.9  94.1  80.5
Total operating expenses 2,308.9  2,262.3  2,188.7
Loss from operations (25.0) (509.1 ) (499.6 )
Interest and other expense, net (17.7) (48.2) (24.2)
Loss before income taxes (42.7) (557.3 ) (523.8 )
Provision for income taxes (38.1) (9.6) (58.3)
Net loss $ (80.8) $ (566.9 ) $ (582.1 )
Basic net loss per share $ (0.37) $ (2.58) $ (2.61)
Diluted net loss per share $ (0.37) $ (2.58) $ (2.61)
Weighted average shares used in computing basic net loss per share 218.9  219.5  222.7
Weighted average shares used in computing diluted net loss per share 218.9  219.5  222.7
____________________
(1) Previously labeled as "License and other" in prior periods.
(2) Previously labeled as "Cost of license and other revenue" in prior periods.
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
2019 Form 10-K 61
Table of Contents
AUTODESK, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE LOSS
(In millions)
 Fiscal year ended January 31,
 2019 2018  2017
Net loss $ (80.8)$(566.9 ) $(582.1 )
Other comprehensive (loss) income, net of reclassifications:   
Net gain (loss) on derivative instruments (net of tax ef fect of ($1.1), $3.2, and ($1.1)) 31.6 (31.2) (1.1)
Change in net unrealized gain (loss) on available-for -sale securities (net of tax ef fect of $0.0, $0.1, and
($0.5)) 2.0 (0.2) 1.3
Change in defined benefit pension items (net of tax ef fect of ($2.0), ($0.7), and ($0.9)) 13.0 4.5 (5.5)
Net change in cumulative foreign currency translation (loss) gain (net of tax ef fect of $0.5, ($4.8), and
$0.2)) (57.8) 81.6  (52.1)
Total other comprehensive (loss) income (11.2) 54.7  (57.4)
Total comprehensive loss $ (92.0)$(512.2 ) $(639.5 )
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
2019 Form 10-K 62
Table of Contents
AUTODESK, INC.
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(In millions, except per share data)
 
January 31,
2019  January 31,
2018
ASSETS  
Current assets:  
Cash and cash equivalents $ 886.0  $ 1,078.0
Marketable securities 67.6  245.2
Accounts receivable, net 474.3  438.2
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 192.1  116.5
Total current assets 1,620.0  1,877.9
Marketable securities — 190.8
Computer equipment, software, furniture, and leasehold improvements, net 149.7  145.0
Developed technologies, net 105.6  27.1
Goodwill 2,450.8  1,620.2
Deferred income taxes, net 65.3  81.7
Other assets 337.8  170.9
Total assets $ 4,729.2  $ 4,113.6
LIABILITIES AND STOCKHOLDERS’ DEFICIT 
Current liabilities:  
Accounts payable $ 101.6  $ 94.7
Accrued compensation 280.8  250.9
Accrued income taxes 13.2  28.0
Deferred revenue 1,763.3  1,551.6
Other accrued liabilities 142.3  198.0
Total current liabilities 2,301.2  2,123.2
Long-term deferred revenue 328.1  403.5
Long-term income taxes payable 21.5  41.6
Long-term deferred income taxes 79.8  66.6
Long-term notes payable, net 2,087.7  1,586.0
Long-term other liabilities 121.8  148.7
Commitments and contingencies  
Stockholders’  deficit:  
Preferred stock, $0.01 par value; shares authorized 2.0; none issued or outstanding at January 31,
2019 and 2018 — —
Common stock and additional paid-in capital, $0.01 par value; shares authorized 750.0; 219.4
outstanding at January 31, 2019 and 218.3 outstanding at January 31, 2018 2,071.5  1,952.7
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (135.0 ) (123.8 )
Accumulated deficit (2,147.4 ) (2,084.9 )
Total stockholders’  deficit (210.9 ) (256.0 )
Total liabilities and stockholders' deficit $ 4,729.2  $ 4,113.6
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
2019 Form 10-K 63
Table of Contents
AUTODESK, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(In millions)
 
 Fiscal year ended January 31,
 2019 2018  2017
Operating activities     
Net loss $ (80.8)$ (566.9 ) $ (582.1 )
Adjustments to reconcile net loss to net cash provided by operating activities:     
Depreciation, amortization, and accretion 95.2 108.4  139.2
Stock-based compensation expense 249.5 261.4  221.8
Deferred income taxes (6.8) (39.1) (38.8)
Restructuring and other exit costs, net 31.7 94.1  80.5
     Other operating activities 2.2 7.3 (7.7)
Changes in operating assets and liabilities, net of business combinations:     
Accounts receivable (25.4) 13.3  201.5
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 7.5 (9.9) (13.5)
Accounts payable and accrued liabilities (58.5) (13.9) 2.7
Deferred revenue 197.0 168.3  267.0
Accrued income taxes (34.5) (22.1) (100.9 )
Net cash provided by operating activities 377.1 0.9 169.7
Investing activities     
Purchases of marketable securities (138.2 ) (514.0 ) (1,867.9 )
Sales of marketable securities 319.6 489.0  1,257.7
Maturities of marketable securities 211.4 594.3  1,057.2
Acquisitions, net of cash acquired (1,040.2 ) — (85.2)
Capital expenditures (67.0) (50.7) (76.0)
Other investing activities 4.0 (12.2) (13.8)
Net cash (used in) provided by investing activities (710.4 ) 506.4  272.0
Financing activities     
Proceeds from issuance of common stock 90.9 94.4  119.6
Taxes paid related to net share settlement of equity awards (143.4 ) (143.1 ) (76.2)
Repurchase and retirement of common shares (293.5 ) (699.0 ) (621.7 )
Proceeds from debt, net of discount 500.0 496.9  —
Repayments of debt — (400.0 ) —
Other financing activities (2.1) (5.8) —
Net cash provided by (used in) financing activities 151.9 (656.6 ) (578.3 )
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash and cash equivalents (10.6) 14.2  (3.3)
Net decrease in cash and cash equivalents (192.0 ) (135.1 ) (139.9 )
Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of fiscal year 1,078.0 1,213.1  1,353.0
Cash and cash equivalents at end of fiscal year $ 886.0 $ 1,078.0  $ 1,213.1
Supplemental cash flow information:     
Cash paid during the year for interest $ 59.0 $ 54.6  $ 47.6
Cash paid for income taxes, net of tax refunds $ 78.0 $ 84.5  $ 77.7
Non-cash investing and financing activities:     
Fair value of equity awards assumed (See Note 6) $ 10.3 $ — $ —
Fair value of common stock issued as consideration for business combination
(See Note 6) $ 44.8 $ — $ —
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
2019 Form 10-K 64
Table of Contents
AUTODESK, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF STOCKHOLDERS’ (DEFICIT) EQUITY
(In millions)
 Common stock and additional
paid-in capitalAccumulated
other
comprehensive
loss  Accumulated
deficitTotal
stockholders'
(deficit) equity Shares Amount
Balances, January 31, 2016 224.4 $ 1,821.5 $ (121.1 ) $ (80.8)$ 1,619.6
Common shares issued under stock plans 5.6 43.4 — — 43.4
Stock-based compensation expense — 221.8 — — 221.8
Tax benefits from employee stock plans — 6.9 — 113.0 119.9
Net loss — — — (582.1 ) (582.1 )
Other comprehensive loss — — (57.4) — (57.4)
Repurchase and retirement of common shares (9.7) (217.3 ) — (414.3 ) (631.6 )
Balances, January 31, 2017 220.3 1,876.3 (178.5 ) (964.2 ) 733.6
Common shares issued under stock plans 4.9 (48.7) — — (48.7)
Stock-based compensation expense — 261.4 — — 261.4
Net loss — — — (566.9 ) (566.9 )
Other comprehensive income — — 54.7  — 54.7
Repurchase and retirement of common shares (6.9) (136.3 ) — (553.8 ) (690.1 )
Balances, January 31, 2018 218.3 1,952.7 (123.8 ) (2,084.9 ) (256.0 )
Common shares issued under stock plans 3.0 (52.5) — — (52.5)
Stock-based compensation expense — 249.5 — — 249.5
Pre-combination expense related to equity awards
assumed — 10.3 — — 10.3
Cumulative ef fect of accounting changes — — — 177.5 177.5
Net loss — — — (80.8) (80.8)
Other comprehensive loss — — (11.2) — (11.2)
Shares issued as consideration for business combination 0.3 44.8 — — 44.8
Repurchase and retirement of common shares (2.2) (133.3 ) — (159.2 ) (292.5 )
Balances, January 31, 2019 219.4 $ 2,071.5 $ (135.0 ) $ (2,147.4 )$ (210.9 )
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
2019 Form 10-K 65
Table of Contents
AUTODESK, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
January 31, 2019
(Tables in millions of dollars, except per share data, unless otherwise indicated)
1.     Business and Summary of Significant Accounting Policies
Business
Autodesk, Inc. (“Autodesk” or the “Company”) is a world leading design software and services company, offering customers
productive business solutions through powerful technology products and services. The Company serves customers in the
architecture, engineering, and construction; manufacturing; and digital media, consumer, and entertainment industries. The
Company’s sophisticated software products, offered through a hybrid of desktop and cloud functionality, enable its customers to
experience their ideas before they are real by allowing them to imagine, design, and create their ideas and to visualize, simulate,
and analyze real-world performance early in the design process by creating digital prototypes. These capabilities allow Autodesk’s
customers to foster innovation, optimize and improve their designs, help save time and money, improve quality, and collaborate
with others. Autodesk software products are sold globally, both directly to customers and through a network of resellers and
distributors.
Principles of Consolidation
The accompanying consolidated financial statements include the accounts of Autodesk and its wholly-owned subsidiaries. All
intercompany accounts and transactions have been eliminated.
Use of Estimates
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP") requires
management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the amounts reported in Autodesk’s consolidated financial statements
and notes thereto. These estimates are based on information available as of the date of the consolidated financial statements. On a
regular basis, management evaluates these estimates and assumptions. Actual results may differ materially from these estimates.
Examples of significant estimates and assumptions made by management involve revenue recognition for our hybrid desktop
software and cloud service subscriptions, the determination of the fair value of acquired assets and liabilities, goodwill, financial
instruments including strategic investments, long-lived assets and other intangible assets, the realizability of deferred tax assets, and
the fair value of stock awards. The Company also makes assumptions, judgments, and estimates in determining the accruals for
uncertain tax positions, variable compensation, partner incentive programs, product returns reserves, allowances for doubtful
accounts, asset retirement obligations, and legal contingencies. 
Foreign Currency Translation and Transactions
The assets and liabilities of Autodesk’s foreign subsidiaries are translated from their respective functional currencies into U.S.
dollars at the rates in effect at the balance sheet date, and revenue and expense amounts are translated at exchange rates that
approximate those rates in effect during the period in which the underlying transactions occur. Foreign currency translation
adjustments are recorded as other comprehensive (loss) income.
Gains and losses realized from foreign currency transactions, those transactions denominated in currencies other than the
foreign subsidiary’s functional currency, are included in "Interest and other expense, net". Monetary assets and liabilities are
remeasured using foreign currency exchange rates at the end of the period, and non-monetary assets are remeasured based on
historical exchange rates.
Derivative Financial Instruments
Autodesk accounts for its derivative instruments as either assets or liabilities on the balance sheet and carries them at fair
value. Gains and losses resulting from changes in fair value are accounted for depending on the use of the derivative and whether it
is designated and qualifies for hedge accounting. Derivatives that do not qualify for hedge accounting are adjusted to fair value
through earnings. See Note 3, "Financial Instruments" for information regarding Autodesk's hedging activities.
2019 Form 10-K 66
Table of Contents
Cash and Cash Equivalents
Autodesk considers all highly liquid investments with insignificant interest rate risk and remaining maturities of three months
or less at the date of purchase to be cash equivalents. Cash equivalents are recorded at cost, which approximates fair value.
Marketable Securities and Privately Held Company Investments
Marketable securities are stated at fair value. Marketable securities maturing within one year that are not restricted are
classified as current assets. Substantially all marketable debt and equity investments held by Autodesk are classified as current
based on the nature of the investments and their availability for use in current operations.
Autodesk determines the appropriate classification of its marketable securities at the time of purchase and re-evaluates such
classification as of each balance sheet date. Autodesk carries all “available-for-sale securities” at fair value, with unrealized gains
and losses, net of tax, reported in stockholders’ equity (deficit) until disposition or maturity. Autodesk carries all “trading securities”
at fair value, with unrealized gains and losses, recorded in “Interest and other expense, net” in the Company’s Consolidated
Statements of Operations. The cost of securities sold is based on the specific-identification method.
Privately held debt and equity securities (Level 3) are valued using significant unobservable inputs or data in an inactive
market and the valuation requires the Company's judgment due to the absence of market prices and inherent lack of liquidity. These
assumptions are inherently subjective and involve significant management judgment. Whenever possible, we use observable market
data and rely on unobservable inputs only when observable market data is not available, when determining fair value.
The carrying value is not adjusted for the Company's privately held equity securities if there are no observable price changes
in a same or similar security from the same issuer or if there are no identified events or changes in circumstances that may indicate
impairment, as discussed below. In determining the estimated fair value of its strategic investments in privately held companies, the
Company utilizes the most recent data available to the Company. In addition, the determination of whether an orderly transaction is
for a same or similar investment requires significant management judgment including: the rights and obligations of the investments,
the extent to which those differences would affect the fair values of those investments, and the impact of any differences based on
the stage of operational development of the investee.
All of Autodesk’s marketable securities and privately held company investments are subject to a periodic impairment review.
For any marketable debt securities, declines in fair value judged to be other-than-temporary on securities available for sale are
included as a reduction to investment income. To determine whether a decline in value is other-than-temporary, the Company
evaluates, among other factors: the duration and extent to which the fair value has been less than the carrying value and its intent
and ability to retain the investment for a period of time sufficient to allow for any anticipated recovery in fair value. For the
purposes of computing realized and unrealized gains and losses, the cost of securities sold is based on the specific-identification
method. Interest on securities classified as available for sale is also included as a component of investment income.
For Autodesk's quarterly impairment assessment of privately held debt and equity securities strategic investment portfolio, the
analysis encompasses an assessment of the severity and duration of the impairment and qualitative and quantitative analysis of
other key factors including: the investee’s financial metrics, the investee’s products and technologies meeting or exceeding
predefined milestones, market acceptance of the product or technology, other competitive products or technology in the market,
general market conditions, management and governance structure of the investee, the investee’s liquidity, debt ratios and the rate at
which the investee is using its cash. If the investment is considered to be impaired, the Company will record the investment at fair
value by recognizing an impairment through the consolidated statement of operations and establishing a new carrying value for the
investment.
For additional information, see “Concentration of Credit Risk” within this Note 1 and Note 3, “Financial Instruments.”
    
2019 Form 10-K 67
Table of Contents
Accounts Receivable, Net
Accounts receivable, net, consisted of the following as of January 31:
2019 2018
Trade accounts receivable $ 526.6 $ 469.2
Less: Allowance for doubtful accounts (2.2) (2.3)
Product returns reserve (0.3) (0.2)
Partner programs and other obligations (49.8) (28.5)
Accounts receivable, net (1) $ 474.3 $ 438.2
_______________
(1) Autodesk adopted ASU No. 2014-09, “Revenue from Contracts with Customers" regarding Accounting Standards Codification (ASC Topic
606) during the first quarter of fiscal 2019. As such, current year balances are shown under ASC Topic 606 and prior year balances are
shown under ASC Topic 605. See Note 1, "Business and Summary of Significant Accounting Policies -Accounting Standards Adopted ", of
our consolidated financial statements for additional information.
Allowances for uncollectible trade receivables are based upon historical loss patterns, the number of days that billings are
past due, and an evaluation of the potential risk of loss associated with problem accounts.
As part of the indirect channel model, Autodesk has a partner incentive program that uses quarterly attainment of monetary
rewards to motivate distributors and resellers to achieve mutually agreed upon business goals in a specified time period. A portion
of these incentives reduce maintenance and other revenue in the current period. The remainder, which relates to incentives on our
Subscription Program, is recorded as a reduction to deferred revenue in the period the subscription transaction is billed and
subsequently recognized as a reduction to subscription revenue over the contract period. These incentive balances do not require
significant assumptions or judgments. Depending on how the payments are made, the reserves associated with the partner incentive
program are treated on the balance sheet as either contra accounts receivable or accounts payable.
Concentration of Credit Risk
Autodesk places its cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities in highly liquid instruments with, and in the custody of,
multiple diversified financial institutions globally with high credit ratings and limits the amounts invested with any one institution,
type of security, and issuer. Autodesk’s primary commercial banking relationship is with Citigroup Inc. and its global affiliates.
Citibank, N.A., an affiliate of Citigroup, is one of the lead lenders and an agent in the syndicate of Autodesk’s $650.0 million line
of credit facility.
The bank counterparties to the derivative contracts potentially expose Autodesk to credit-related losses in the event of their
nonperformance. However, to mitigate that risk, Autodesk only contracts with counterparties who meet the Company's minimum
requirements under its counterparty risk assessment process. Autodesk monitors counterparty risk on at least a quarterly basis and
will adjust its exposure to various counterparties as necessary. Autodesk generally enters into master netting arrangements, which
reduce credit risk by permitting net settlement of transactions with the same counterparty.  However, Autodesk does not have any
master netting arrangements in place with collateral features.
Autodesk’s accounts receivable are derived from sales to a large number of resellers, distributors, and direct customers in the
Americas, EMEA, and APAC geographies. Autodesk performs ongoing evaluations of these partners' and customers' financial
condition and limits the amount of credit extended when deemed necessary, but generally does not require collateral from such
parties. Total sales to the Company's largest distributor Tech Data Corporation, and its global affiliates (“Tech Data”), accounted for
35%, 31%, and 30% of Autodesk's net revenue for fiscal years ended January 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively. The majority
of the net revenue from sales to Tech Data is for sales made outside of the United States. In addition, Tech Data accounted for 29%
and 31% of trade accounts receivable as of January 31, 2019, and 2018, respectively. No other customer accounted for more than
10% of Autodesk's total net revenue or trade accounts receivable for each of the respective periods.
Computer Equipment, Software, Furniture, and Leasehold Improvements, Net
Computer equipment, software, and furniture are depreciated using the straight-line method over the estimated useful lives of
the assets, which range from three to five years. Leasehold improvements are amortized on a straight-line basis over the
2019 Form 10-K 68
Table of Contents
shorter of their estimated useful lives or the lease term. Depreciation expense was $59.2 million in fiscal 2019, $67.6 million in
fiscal 2018, and $73.1 million in fiscal 2017.
Computer equipment, software, furniture, leasehold improvements and the related accumulated depreciation at January 31
were as follows:
2019 2018
Computer hardware, at cost $ 190.2 $ 217.1
Computer software, at cost 66.7 72.6
Leasehold improvements, land and buildings, at cost 247.8 228.9
Furniture and equipment, at cost 67.2 63.4
Computer software, hardware, leasehold improvements, furniture, and equipment, at cost 571.9 582.0
Less: Accumulated depreciation (422.2 ) (437.0 )
Computer software, hardware, leasehold improvements, furniture, and equipment, net $ 149.7 $ 145.0
Costs incurred for computer software developed or obtained for internal use are capitalized for application development
activities, if material, and immediately expensed for preliminary project activities and post-implementation activities. These
capitalized costs are amortized over the software’s expected useful life, which is generally three years.
Software Development Costs
Software development costs incurred prior to the establishment of technological feasibility are included in research and
development expenses. Autodesk defines establishment of technological feasibility as the completion of a working model. Software
development costs incurred subsequent to the establishment of technological feasibility through the period of general market
availability of the products are capitalized and generally amortized over a three-year period, if material. Autodesk had no material
capitalized software development costs at January 31, 2019, and January 31, 2018.
Other Intangible Assets, Net
Other intangible assets include developed technologies, customer relationships, trade names, patents, user lists and the related
accumulated amortization. These assets are shown as “Developed technologies, net” and as part of “Other assets” in the
Consolidated Balance Sheet. The majority of Autodesk’s other intangible assets are amortized to expense over the estimated
economic life of the product, which ranges from two to ten years. Amortization expense for developed technologies, customer
relationships, trade names, patents, and user lists was $33.5 million in fiscal 2019, $36.6 million in fiscal 2018 and $72.2 million in
fiscal 2017.
Other intangible assets and related accumulated amortization at January 31 were as follows:
2019 2018
Developed technologies, at cost $ 670.2 $ 578.5
Customer relationships, trade names, patents, and user lists, at cost (1) 533.1 372.5
Other intangible assets, at cost (2) 1,203.3 951.0
Less: accumulated amortization (922.5 ) (895.8 )
Other intangible assets, net $ 280.8 $ 55.2
_______________ 
(1) Included in “Other assets” in the accompanying Consolidated Balance Sheets.
(2) Includes the ef fects of foreign currency translation.
2019 Form 10-K 69
Table of Contents
The weighted average amortization period for developed technologies, customer relationships, trade names, patents, and user
lists during fiscal 2019 was 5.4 years. Excluding in-process research and development, expected future amortization expense for
developed technologies, customer relationships, trade names, patents, and user lists for each of the fiscal years ended thereafter is
as follows:
 Fiscal Year ended
January 31,
2020 $ 73.6
2021 64.8
2022 49.1
2023 37.6
Thereafter 19.2
Total $ 244.3
Goodwill
Goodwill consists of the excess of the consideration transferred over the fair value of net assets acquired in business
combinations. Autodesk tests goodwill for impairment annually in its fourth fiscal quarter or more often if circumstances indicate a
potential impairment may exist, or if events have affected the composition of reporting units.
When goodwill is assessed for impairment, Autodesk has the option to perform an assessment of qualitative factors of
impairment (“optional assessment”) prior to necessitating a quantitative impairment test. Should the optional assessment be used
for any given fiscal year, qualitative factors to consider include cost factors; financial performance; legal, regulatory, contractual,
political, business, or other factors; entity specific factors; industry and market considerations, macroeconomic conditions, and
other relevant events and factors affecting the reporting unit. If, after assessing the totality of events or circumstances, it is more
likely than not that the fair value of the reporting unit is greater than its carrying value, then performing the quantitative impairment
test is unnecessary.
The quantitative impairment test is necessary when either Autodesk does not use the optional assessment or, as a result of the
optional assessment, it is not more likely than not that the fair value of the reporting unit is greater than its carrying value. In
situations in which an entity's reporting unit is publicly traded, the fair value of the Company may be approximated by its market
capitalization, in performing the quantitative impairment test.
Goodwill impairment exists when the estimated fair value of goodwill is less than its carrying value. If impairment exists, the
carrying value of the goodwill is reduced to fair value through an impairment charge recorded in the Company's statements of
operations. The process of evaluating the potential impairment of goodwill is subjective and requires significant judgment at many
points during the analysis. The value of Autodesk’s goodwill could also be impacted by future adverse changes such as: (i) declines
in Autodesk’s actual financial results, (ii) a sustained decline in Autodesk’s market capitalization, (iii) a significant slowdown in the
worldwide economy or the industries Autodesk serves, or (iv) changes in Autodesk’s business strategy.
For the annual impairment test, Autodesk's market capitalization was substantially in excess of the carrying value of the
Company as of January 31, 2019. Accordingly, Autodesk has determined there was no goodwill impairment during the fiscal year
ended January 31, 2019. In addition, Autodesk did not recognize any goodwill impairment losses in fiscal 2018 or 2017.
2019 Form 10-K 70
Table of Contents
The following table summarizes the changes in the carrying amount of goodwill during the fiscal years ended January 31,
2019 and 2018:
 January 31, 2019 January 31, 2018
Goodwill, beginning of the year $ 1,769.4 $ 1,710.3
Less: accumulated impairment losses, beginning of the year (149.2 ) (149.2 )
Additions arising from acquisitions during the year 866.9 —
Effect of foreign currency translation, measurement period adjustments, and other (1) (36.3) 59.1
Goodwill, end of the year $ 2,450.8 $ 1,620.2
_______________
(1) Purchase accounting adjustments reflect revisions made to the Company’ s preliminary determination of estimated fair value of assets and
liabilities assumed during fiscal 2019  and 2018.
Impairment of Long-Lived Assets
At least annually or more frequently as circumstances dictate, Autodesk reviews its long-lived assets for impairment
whenever impairment indicators exist.  Autodesk continually monitors events and changes in circumstances that could indicate the
carrying amounts of its long-lived assets may not be recoverable. When such events or changes in circumstances occur, Autodesk
assesses recoverability of these assets.  Recoverability is measured by comparison of the carrying amounts of the assets to the
future undiscounted cash flow the assets are expected to generate.  If the long-lived assets are considered to be impaired, the
impairment to be recognized is equal to the amount by which the carrying value of the assets exceeds its fair market
value. Autodesk did not recognize any material impairments of long-lived assets during the fiscal years ended January 31, 2019,
2018, and 2017, respectively.
In addition to the recoverability assessments, Autodesk routinely reviews the remaining estimated useful lives of its long-
lived assets. Any reduction in the useful life assumption will result in increased depreciation and amortization expense in the
quarter when such determinations are made, as well as in subsequent quarters.
Deferred Tax Assets
Deferred tax assets arise primarily from tax credits, net operating losses, and timing differences for reserves, accrued
liabilities, stock options, deferred revenue, purchased technologies, and capitalized intangibles, partially offset by U.S. deferred tax
liabilities on acquired intangibles, and valuation allowances against U.S. and foreign deferred tax assets. Autodesk performed a
quarterly assessment of the recoverability of these net deferred tax assets and believes it will generate sufficient future taxable
income in appropriate tax jurisdictions to realize the net deferred tax assets. They are measured using enacted tax rates expected to
apply to taxable income in the years in which those temporary differences are expected to reverse. Valuation allowances are
established when necessary to reduce gross deferred tax assets to the amount that is "more likely than not" to be realized.
Stock-based Compensation Expense
The following table summarizes stock-based compensation expense for fiscal 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively, as follows:
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2019 2018 2017
Cost of subscription and maintenance revenue $ 13.2 $ 11.9 $ 8.6
Cost of other revenue 4.3 4.0 5.5
Marketing and sales 109.4 107.3 94.1
Research and development 82.6 82.9 81.3
General and administrative 40.0 55.3 32.3
Stock-based compensation expense related to stock awards and Employee Qualified
Stock Purchase Plan ("ESPP") purchases 249.5 261.4 221.8
Tax benefit (2.6) (2.6) (2.6)
Stock-based compensation expense related to stock awards and ESPP  purchases, net $ 246.9 $ 258.8 $ 219.2
2019 Form 10-K 71
Table of Contents
    
Autodesk determines the grant date fair value of its share-based payment awards using a Black-Scholes Merton ("BSM")
option pricing model or the quoted stock price on the date of grant, unless the awards are subject to market conditions, in which
case Autodesk uses a binomial-lattice model (e.g., Monte Carlo simulation model). The Monte Carlo simulation model utilizes
multiple input variables to estimate the probability that market conditions will be achieved. Autodesk uses the following
assumptions to estimate the fair value of stock-based awards:
  Fiscal Year Ended Fiscal Year Ended Fiscal Year Ended
  January 31, 2019 January 31, 2018 January 31, 2017
  Stock Option
PlansPerformance
Stock Unit ESPPPerformance
Stock Unit ESPPPerformance
Stock Unit ESPP
Range of expected volatilities  37 - 42% 36%  33 - 38% 32%  31 - 34% 38 - 39% 30 - 40%
Range of expected lives
(in years)  0.5 - 3.8 N/A  0.5 - 2.0 N/A  0.5 - 2.0 N/A 0.5 - 2.0
Expected dividends  —% —%  —% —%  —% —% —%
Range of risk-free interest rates  2.3 - 2.7% 2.0%  1.9 - 2.8% 1.0 - 1.2%  0.9 - 1.4% 0.6 - 0.7% 0.5 - 0.9%
Autodesk estimates expected volatility for stock-based awards based on the average of the following two measures: (1) a
measure of historical volatility in the trading market for the Company’s common stock, and (2) the implied volatility of traded
forward call options to purchase shares of the Company’s common stock. The expected volatility for performance stock units
subject to market conditions includes the expected volatility of Autodesk's peer companies within the S&P Computer Software
Select Index or S&P North American Technology Software Index with a market capitalization over $2.00 billion, depending on the
award type.
Autodesk estimates the expected life of stock-based awards using both exercise behavior and post-vesting termination
behavior as well as consideration of outstanding options. The range of expected lives of ESPP awards are based upon the four, six-
month exercise periods within a 24-month offering period.
Autodesk did not pay cash dividends in fiscal 2019, 2018, or 2017 and does not anticipate paying any cash dividends in the
foreseeable future. Consequently, an expected dividend yield of zero is used in the BSM option pricing model and the Monte Carlo
simulation model.
The risk-free interest rate used in the BSM option pricing model and the Monte Carlo simulation model for stock-based
awards is the historical yield on U.S. Treasury securities with equivalent remaining lives.
Autodesk recognizes expense only for the stock-based awards that ultimately vest. Autodesk accounts for forfeitures of stock-
based awards as those forfeitures occur.
Advertising Expenses
Advertising costs are expensed as incurred. Total advertising expenses incurred were $37.5 million in fiscal 2019, $31.1
million in fiscal 2018, and $33.6 million in fiscal 2017.
Net Loss Per Share
Basic net loss per share is computed based on the weighted average number of shares of common stock outstanding for the
period, excluding stock options and restricted stock. Diluted net loss per share is computed based upon the weighted average shares
of common shares outstanding for the period and potentially dilutive common shares, including the effect of stock options and
restricted stock units under the treasury stock method.
Defined Benefit Pension Plans
The funded status of Autodesk's defined benefit pension plans is recognized in the Consolidated Balance Sheets. The funded
status is measured as the difference between the fair value of plan assets and the projected benefit obligation for the fiscal years
presented. The projected benefit obligation represents the actuarial present value of benefits expected to be paid upon retirement
based on employee services already rendered and estimated future compensation levels. The fair value of plan
2019 Form 10-K 72
Table of Contents
assets represents the current market value of Autodesk's cumulative company and participant contributions made to the various
plans in effect.
Net periodic benefit cost is recorded in the Consolidated Statements of Operations and includes service cost, interest cost,
expected return on plan assets, amortization of prior service costs, and gains or losses previously recognized as a component of
other comprehensive loss. Certain events, such as changes in the employee base, plan amendments, and changes in actuarial
assumptions may result in a change in the defined benefit obligation and the corresponding change to other comprehensive loss.
Gains and losses and prior service costs not recognized as a component of net periodic benefit cost in the Consolidated
Statements of Operations as they arise are recognized as a component of other comprehensive (loss) income in the Consolidated
Statements of Comprehensive Loss. Those gains and losses and prior service costs are subsequently amortized as a component of
net periodic benefit cost over the average remaining service lives of the plan participants using a corridor approach to determine the
portion of gain or loss subject to amortization.
The measurement of projected benefit obligations and net periodic benefit cost is based on estimates and assumptions that
reflect the terms of the plans and use participant-specific information such as compensation, age and years of services, as well as
certain assumptions, including estimates of discount rates, expected return of plan assets, rate of compensation increases, interest
rates, and mortality rates.
Accounting Standards in Fiscal 2019
With the exception of those discussed below, there have been no recent changes in accounting pronouncements issued by
FASB or adopted by the Company during the fiscal year ended January 31, 2019, that are applicable to the Company.
Accounting Standards Adopted
Effective in the third quarter of fiscal 2019, Autodesk early adopted ASU No. 2018-15, "Intangibles—Goodwill and Other—
Internal-Use Software (Subtopic 350-40): Customer’s Accounting for Implementation Costs Incurred in a Cloud Computing
Arrangement that is a Service Contract." The ASU allows implementation costs incurred by customers in cloud computing
arrangements to be deferred and recognized over the term of the arrangement. The ASU also requires amortization expense be
recognized in the same line item as the related fees associated with the arrangement and related capitalized implementation costs be
presented in the same line as the prepayment for the hosting fee. Changes to Autodesk's disclosures appear in this filing. The new
guidance was applied prospectively to eligible costs as of August 1, 2018, and did not have a material impact on our Consolidated
Financial Statements.
In August 2018, as part of FASB’s Disclosure Framework project, FASB issued ASU No. 2018-14, "Compensation—
Retirement Benefits—Defined Benefit Plans—General (Subtopic 715-20): Disclosure Framework—Changes to the Disclosure
Requirements for Defined Benefit Plans," and ASU No. 2018-13, "Fair Value Measurement (Topic 820): Disclosure Framework—
Changes to the Disclosure Requirements for Fair Value Measurement." FASB issued these ASUs to help improve the effectiveness
of disclosures in the notes to financial statements by facilitating clear communication of the information required by GAAP that is
most important to users of each entity’s financial statements. Effective in the third quarter of fiscal 2019, Autodesk early adopted
ASU No. 2018-14 and ASU No. 2018-13. Most changes required retrospective application with a few exceptions in ASU No. 2018-
13 that allowed for prospective adoption.
Effective in the first quarter of fiscal 2019, Autodesk adopted FASB Accounting Standards Update ("ASU") No. 2017-05,
"Other Income– Gains and Losses from the Derecognition of Nonfinancial Assets (Subtopic 610-20): Clarifying the Scope of Asset
Derecognition Guidance and Accounting for Partial Sales of Nonfinancial Assets." The ASU, among other things, clarifies the
scope of the derecognition of nonfinancial assets, provides the definition of in-substance financial assets, and impacts the
accounting for partial sales of nonfinancial assets by requiring full gain recognition upon the sale. The new guidance was adopted
prospectively as there was no impact on the Company's prior periods consolidated statements of financial position and results of
operations which would be reflected in either the full or modified retrospective transition approach. The future effect of the
adoption will depend upon the nature of the Company's future dispositions, if any.
Effective in the first quarter of fiscal 2019, Autodesk adopted FASB ASU No. 2017-01, "Business Combinations: Clarifying
the Definition of a Business" which provides a more robust framework to use in determining when a set of assets and activities is
considered a business. The new guidance was applied on a prospective basis and the adoption did not have any impact on
Autodesk's consolidated financial statements. Any future effect of the adoption will depend upon the nature of the Company's
future acquisitions, if any.
2019 Form 10-K 73
Table of Contents
Effective in the first quarter of fiscal 2019, Autodesk adopted FASB ASU No. 2016-16, “Income Taxes: Intra-Entity Transfers
of Assets Other than Inventory” which requires that entities recognize the income tax consequences of an intra-entity transfer of an
asset, other than inventory, when the transfer occurs. The new guidance was applied on a modified retrospective basis with a
cumulative increase of $1.9 million to the opening balance of "Accumulated deficit" at February 1, 2018. The ASU did not have
any other material impacts on Autodesk's Consolidated Financial Statements.
Effective in the first quarter of fiscal 2019, Autodesk adopted FASB ASU No. 2016-01 regarding Accounting Standards
Codification ("ASC") Topic 825-10, "Financial Instruments - Overall." The amendments address certain aspects of recognition,
measurement, presentation, and disclosure of financial instruments, and require equity securities to be measured at fair value,
unless the measurement alternative method has been elected for equity investments without readily determinable fair values ("non-
marketable equity securities"), with changes in fair value recognized through net income. The amendments also simplify the
impairment assessment of equity investments without readily determinable fair values by requiring a qualitative assessment for
impairment quarterly at each reporting period. Under the measurement alternative method, the non-marketable equity securities
will be measured at cost, less any impairment, plus or minus adjustments resulting from observable price changes in orderly
transactions for the identical or a similar investment of the same issuer, which will be recorded within the Consolidated Statement
of Operations. The determination of whether a transaction is for a similar investment will require significant management judgment
including consideration of the rights and obligations between the investments and the extent to which those differences would
affect the fair values of those investments with additional consideration for the stage of development of the investee company.
Autodesk prospectively adopted the amendments related to non-marketable equity securities existing as of the date of
adoption. The new standard may add volatility to the Company's statements of operations in future periods, due to changes in
market prices of the Company's investments in publicly held equity investments and the valuation and timing of observable price
changes and impairments of its investments in non-marketable securities. See Note 3, "Financial Instruments" for more
information.
Revenue from contracts with customers
Effective in the first quarter of fiscal 2019, Autodesk adopted ASU No. 2014-09, “Revenue from Contracts with Customers"
regarding Accounting Standards Codification (ASC Topic 606)” and the subsequent and related ASU No. 2015-14, ASU No. 2016-
08, ASU No. 2016-10, ASU No. 2016-12, and ASU No. 2016-20.
Under ASC Topic 606, the Company has concluded that the desktop software and related substantial cloud functionality that
are included in the majority of its product subscription offerings and enterprise arrangements are not distinct in the context of the
contract as they are considered highly interrelated and represent a single combined performance obligation that should be
recognized over time. Therefore, the adoption of ASC Topic 606 has not resulted in a material change in the timing and amount of
the recognition of revenue for the majority of the Company's product subscription offerings and enterprise arrangements.
One impact of the new standard relates to product subscriptions that do not incorporate substantial cloud functionality. A
limited number of Autodesk's product subscriptions do not incorporate substantial cloud functionality, and therefore are not
considered highly interrelated. Under ASU No. 2014-09, these limited number of product subscriptions are recognized as separate
and distinct license and service performance obligations. Under ASU No. 2009-13, "Revenue Recognition" regarding Accounting
Standards Codification (ASC Topic 605), licenses sold with undelivered elements without vendor-specific objective evidence
("VSOE") are recognized ratably over the term of the undelivered elements. Under ASC Topic 606, Autodesk is no longer required
to establish VSOE to recognize software license revenue separately from the other elements and recognizes software licenses once
the customer obtains control of the license, which is generally upon delivery of the license. Therefore, revenue allocated to the
licenses in these offerings under ASC Topic 606 is recognized at a point in time instead of over the contract term.
Autodesk adopted ASC Topic 606 using the modified retrospective method, with a cumulative decrease of $89.0 million to
the opening balance of "Accumulated deficit" at February 1, 2018. Autodesk applied the standard only to contracts that are not
completed as of the date of initial application. The comparative information has not been adjusted and continues to be reported
under ASC Topic 605. The details of the quantitative impact of the adoption on the fiscal year ended January 31, 2019, are shown
below. See the Note 2, "Revenue Recognition" for more details.
2019 Form 10-K 74
Table of Contents
Costs to acquire a contract from a customer
With the adoption of ASC Topic 606, Autodesk also adopted ASC Topic 340-40, "Other Assets and Deferred Costs—
Contracts with Customers." Prior to the adoption of ASC Topic 340-40, Autodesk previously recognized compensation paid to sales
employees and certain resellers related to obtaining customer contracts in marketing and sales expense in the Consolidated
Statements of Operations when incurred. Under ASC Topic 340-40, Autodesk capitalizes this sales compensation as contract costs
when they are incremental, directly incurred to obtain a contract with a customer and expected to be recoverable. The contract costs
are amortized based on the transfer of goods or services to which the contract costs relate.
Under the modified retrospective method, Autodesk booked a cumulative decrease of $90.4 million to the opening balance of
"Accumulated deficit" at February 1, 2018. The comparative information has not been adjusted and continues to be reported as
incurred. The details of the quantitative impact of the adoption on the fiscal year ended January 31, 2019, are shown below. See
Note 7, "Deferred Compensation" for disclosures under the new standard.
Quantitative effect of ASC Topics 606 and 340-40 adoption
Under the modified retrospective adoption, Autodesk calculated the impact of the adoption during fiscal 2019, as the first year
of adoption. The following table shows select line items that were materially impacted by the adoption of ASC Topics 606 and 340-
40 on Autodesk’s Consolidated Statements of Operations for the fiscal year ended January 31, 2019:
  For the Fiscal Year ended January 31, 2019
  As reportedImpact from the
adoption of
ASC 606 and
340-40  As adjusted
Net revenue (1)   
Subscription  $ 1,802.3 $ (16.6) $ 1,785.7
Maintenance  635.1 5.7 640.8
Other  132.4 (11.3) 121.1
Cost of revenue (1)   
Cost of subscription and maintenance revenue  216.0 (0.1) 215.9
Cost of other revenue  54.4 1.1 55.5
Operating expenses (1):   
Marketing and sales  1,183.9 (17.9) 1,166.0
Provision for income taxes  (38.1) (4.8) (42.9)
Net loss (2)  $ (80.8)$ (10.1) $ (90.9)
Basic net loss per share  $ (0.37)$ (0.05) $ (0.42)
Diluted net loss per share  $ (0.37)$ (0.05) $ (0.42)
____________________ 
(1) While not shown here, gross mar gin, loss from operations, and loss before income taxes have consequently been af fected as a result of the
net ef fect of the adjustments noted above.
(2) The impact on the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Loss is limited to the net ef fects of the impacts noted above on the
Consolidated Statements of Operations, specifically on the line item "Net loss."
2019 Form 10-K 75
Table of Contents
The following table shows select line items that were materially impacted by the adoption of ASC Topics 606 and 340-40 on
Autodesk’s Consolidated Balance Sheet as of January 31, 2019:
 As reportedImpact from
the adoption
of ASC 606
and 340-40 As adjusted
ASSETS   
Current assets:   
        Accounts receivable, net $ 474.3 $ 73.4  $ 547.7
        Prepaid expenses and other current assets (1) 192.1 (79.4) 112.7
Deferred income taxes, net 65.3 7.0 72.3
Other assets (1) 337.8 (17.9) 319.9
LIABILITIES AND ST OCKHOLDERS’  DEFICIT   
Current liabilities:   
        Deferred revenue 1,763.3 140.6  1,903.9
        Other accrued liabilities 142.3 1.7 144.0
Long-term deferred revenue 328.1 37.2  365.3
Long-term income taxes payable 21.5 (0.2) 21.3
Long-term deferred income taxes 79.8 (6.7) 73.1
Stockholders’  deficit:   
Accumulated deficit (2) $(2,147.4 )$ (189.5 ) $(2,336.9 )
____________________ 
(1) Short term and long term "contract assets" under ASC Topic 606 are included within "Prepaid expenses and other current assets" and "Other
assets", respectively , on the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
(2) Included in the "Accumulated deficit" adjustment is $179.4  million  for the cumulative ef fect adjustment of adopting ASC Topic 606 and
340-40 on the opening balance as of February 1, 2018.
Adoption of the standard had no impact to net cash provided by or (used in) operating, financing, or investing activities on the
Company’s Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows.
Recently Issued Accounting Standards But Not Yet Adopted
In February 2018, FASB issued ASU No. 2018-02, “Income Statement-Reporting Comprehensive Income (Topic 220):
Reclassification of Certain Tax Effects from Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income.”  The amendment allows entities to
reclassify stranded tax effects resulting from the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act from accumulated other comprehensive income to retained
earnings.  The amendment only impacts the income tax effect of the passage of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act but does not affect the
underlying guidance that requires that the effect of a change in tax laws or rates be included in income from continuing operations. 
The amendment is effective for Autodesk's fiscal year beginning February 1, 2019.  Autodesk currently expects the impact to
stockholders' deficit and other comprehensive loss to be approximately $1.3M.
In August 2017, FASB issued ASU No. 2017-12, "Derivatives and Hedging (Topic 815): Targeted Improvements to
Accounting for Hedging Activities." The amendment helps simplify certain aspects of hedge accounting and results in a more
accurate portrayal of the economics of an entity’s risk management activities in its financial statements. For cash flow and net
investment hedges as of the adoption date, the guidance requires a modified retrospective approach. The amended presentation and
disclosure guidance is required only prospectively. Autodesk will adopt the amendment for the fiscal year beginning February 1,
2019, the required adoption date. The transition impact, if any, is expected to be immaterial and no substantive changes are
expected to Autodesk’s current processes, accounting, or disclosures for cash flow hedges.
In June 2016, FASB issued ASU No. 2016-13 regarding ASC Topic 326, "Financial Instruments - Credit Losses," which
modifies the measurement of expected credit losses of certain financial instruments. Autodesk plans to adopt ASU No. 2016-13 as
of the effective date which represents Autodesk’s fiscal year beginning February 1, 2020. Autodesk does not believe the ASU will
have a material impact on its consolidated financial statements.
In February 2016, FASB issued ASU No. 2016-02, Leases (ASC Topic 842) to increase transparency and comparability
among organizations by recognizing lease assets and lease liabilities on the balance sheet and disclosing key information about
2019 Form 10-K 76
Table of Contents
leasing transactions. The new standard requires entities to reflect the net present value of all future fixed lease payments for both
operating and finance leases. It also requires entities to disclose fixed and variable lease payments separately and by lease type
(operating vs. finance leases). In addition, FASB issued ASU No. 2018-10 and 2018-11 in July 2018 and ASU No. 2018-20 in
December 2018 to help provide interpretive clarifications on various issues raised by stakeholders. ASU No. 2018-10 clarifies
ambiguous or potentially conflicting guidance in ASU No. 2016-02 but is not expected to have a material impact on Autodesk.
ASU No. 2018-11 provides an additional transition option to apply ASU No. 2016-02 upon adoption of the new standard. ASU No.
2018-20 allows lessors, as an accounting policy election, to treat sales taxes and other similar taxes as lessee costs only.  ASU No.
2018-20 also requires lessors to exclude certain lessor costs paid by lessees directly to third parties from its variable payments, and
therefore revenue, and requires lessors to allocate other variable payments to be allocated between lease and nonlease components. 
Autodesk will adopt ASU No. 2016-02 as of February 1, 2019 using the modified retrospective method permitted under ASC
No. 2018-11 for all existing leases. Under ASU No. 2016-02, Autodesk is required to recognize an asset and offsetting liability
upon adoption. The asset and liability are measured by taking the present value of all future fixed lease payments, discounted using
the Company’s incremental borrowing rate. Autodesk has elected to opt for the practical expedients to not reassess whether any
existing contracts are leases or contain a lease, not reassess the lease classification of existing leases, not reassess initial direct costs
for existing leases, and to combine lease and non-lease components for new leases post adoption.
In preparation for adoption of the standard, Autodesk is implementing key systems, processes and internal controls to enable
the preparation of financial information. ASC No. 2016-02 will have a material impact on the Company’s consolidated balance
sheet because of the capitalization of future fixed lease payments. ASU No. 2016-02 is not expected to have a material impact to
the Company’s consolidated statement of operations or net cash provided by operating activities.
2. Revenue Recognition
Revenue Recognition
Autodesk’s revenue is divided into three categories: subscription revenue, maintenance revenue, and other revenue. Revenue
is recognized when control for these offerings is transferred to our customers, in an amount that reflects the consideration we
expect to be entitled to in exchange for products and services.
Our contracts with customers may include promises to transfer multiple products and services to a customer. Determining
whether the products and services are considered distinct performance obligations that should be accounted for separately or as one
combined performance obligation may require significant judgment. Judgment is required to determine the level of integration and
interdependency between individual components of software and cloud functionality. This determination influences whether the
software is considered distinct and accounted for separately as a license performance obligation, or not distinct and accounted for
together with the cloud functionality as a single subscription performance obligation recognized over time.
For product subscriptions and enterprise business agreement ("EBA") subscriptions in which the desktop software and related
cloud functionality are highly interrelated, the combined performance obligation is recognized ratably over the contract term as the
obligation is delivered. For contracts involving distinct software licenses, the license performance obligation is satisfied at a point
in time when control is transferred to the customer. For standalone maintenance subscriptions, cloud subscriptions, and technical
support services, the performance obligation is satisfied ratably over the contract term as those services are delivered. For
consulting services, the performance obligation is satisfied over a period of time as those services are delivered.
When an arrangement includes multiple performance obligations which are concurrently delivered and have the same pattern
of transfer to the customer (the services transfer to the customer over the contract period), we account for those performance
obligations as a single performance obligation.
For contracts with more than one performance obligation, the transaction price is allocated among the performance
obligations in an amount that depicts the relative standalone selling price ("SSP") of each obligation. Judgment is required to
determine the SSP for each distinct performance obligation. We use a range of amounts to estimate SSP when we sell each of the
products and services separately and need to determine whether there is a discount that should be allocated based on the relative
SSP of the various products and services.
2019 Form 10-K 77
Table of Contents
In instances where SSP is not directly observable, such as when we do not sell the product or service separately, we determine
the SSP using information that includes market conditions and other observable inputs. We typically have more than one SSP for
individual products and services due to the stratification of those products and services by customer and circumstance. In these
instances, we use relevant information such as the sales channel and geographic region to determine the SSP.
Our indirect channel model includes both a two-tiered distribution structure, where Autodesk sells to distributors that
subsequently sell to resellers, and a one-tiered structure where Autodesk sells directly to resellers. For these arrangements, transfer
of control begins at the time access to our subscriptions is made available electronically to our customer, provided all other criteria
for revenue recognition are met. Judgment is required to determine whether our distributors and resellers have the ability to honor
their commitment to pay, regardless of whether they collect payment from their customers. If we were to change this assessment, it
could cause a material increase or decrease in the amount of revenue that we report in a particular period.
As part of the indirect channel model, we have a partner incentive program that uses quarterly attainment of monetary
rewards to motivate distributors and resellers to achieve mutually agreed upon business goals in a specified time period. Incentives
related to our subscription program are recorded as a reduction to deferred revenue in the period the subscription transaction is
billed, and are subsequently recognized as a reduction to subscription revenue over the contract period. A small portion of partner
incentives reduce other revenue in the current period. These incentive balances do not require significant assumptions or
judgments. Depending on how the payments are made, the reserves associated with the partner incentive program are recorded on
the balance sheet as either contra accounts receivable or accounts payable.
Revenue Disaggregation
Autodesk recognizes revenue from the sale of (1) product subscriptions, cloud service offerings, and flexible enterprise
business agreements ("EBAs"), (2) renewal fees for existing maintenance plan agreements that were initially purchased with a
perpetual software license, and (3) consulting, training and other goods and services. The three categories are presented as line
items on Autodesk's Consolidated Statements of Operations.
2019 Form 10-K 78
Table of Contents
Information regarding the components of Autodesk's net revenue from contracts with customers by geographic location,
product family, and sales channel is as follows:
 
 Fiscal Year ended January 31,
 2019 2018  2017
Net revenue by product family (1):   
Architecture, Engineering and Construction $1,021.6 $ 787.5  $ 810.4
Manufacturing 616.2 528.8  575.2
AutoCAD and AutoCAD L T 731.8 561.4  472.7
Media and Entertainment 182 152.1  138.8
Other 18.2 26.8  33.9
Total net revenue $2,569.8 $2,056.6  $2,031.0
   
Net revenue by geographic area:   
Americas   
U.S. $ 874.6 $ 740.4  $ 742.1
Other Americas 175.3 130.7  129.8
Total Americas 1,049.9 871.1  871.9
Europe, Middle East and Africa 1,034.3 815.4  800.4
Asia Pacific 485.6 370.1  358.7
Total net revenue $2,569.8 $2,056.6  $2,031.0
 
Net revenue by sales channel:   
Indirect $1,830.8 $1,443.8  $1,468.9
Direct 739.0 612.8  562.1
Total net revenue $2,569.8 $2,056.6  $2,031.0
____________________
(1) Due to changes in the go-to-market of ferings of our AutoCAD product subscription, prior period balances have been adjusted to conform to
current period presentation.
Payments for product subscriptions, industry collections, cloud subscriptions, and maintenance subscriptions are typically due
up front with payment terms of 30 to 45 days. Payments on EBAs are typically due in annual installments over the contract term,
with payment terms of 30 to 60 days. Autodesk does not have any material variable consideration, such as obligations for returns,
refunds, or warranties or amounts payable to customers for which significant estimation or judgment is required as of the reporting
date.
As of January 31, 2019, Autodesk had total billed and unbilled deferred revenue of $2.7 billion, which represents the total
contract price allocated to undelivered performance obligations, which are generally recognized over the next three years. We
expect to recognize $1.9 billion or 72% of this revenue during the next 12 months. We expect to recognize the remaining $0.8
billion or 28% of this revenue thereafter.
We expect that the amount of billed and unbilled deferred revenue will change from quarter to quarter for several reasons,
including the specific timing, duration and size of customer subscription and support agreements, varying billing cycles of such
agreements, the specific timing of customer renewals, and foreign currency fluctuations.
Contract Balances
We receive payments from customers based on a billing schedule as established in our contracts. Contract assets relate to
performance completed in advance of scheduled billings. Contract assets were not material as of January 31, 2019. Deferred
revenue relates to payments received in advance of performance under the contract. The primary changes in our contract assets and
deferred revenues are due to our performance under the contracts and billings.
2019 Form 10-K 79
Table of Contents
Revenue recognized during the fiscal year ended January 31, 2019, that was included in the deferred revenue balances at
January 31, 2018, was $1.5 billion. The satisfaction of performance obligations typically lags behind payments received under
revenue contracts from customers, which may lead to an increase in our deferred revenue balance over time.
    
3.     Financial Instruments
The following tables summarize the Company's financial instruments' amortized cost, gross unrealized gains, gross
unrealized losses, and fair value by significant investment category as of January 31, 2019 and 2018.
  January 31, 2019
  Amortized
CostGross
Unrealized
GainsGross
Unrealized
LossesFair
Value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3
Cash equivalents (1):        
 Certificates of deposit $ 1.0 $ — $ — $ 1.0 $ — $ 1.0 $ —
 Commercial paper 87.9 — — 87.9 — 87.9  —
 Corporate debt securities 5.0 — — 5.0 — 5.0 —
 Custody cash deposit 0.8 — — 0.8 0.8 — —
 Money market funds 281.4 — — 281.4 281.4  — —
Marketable securities:        
 Short-term available-for -sale        
  Other (2) 6.2 1.1 — 7.3 2.7 4.6 —
 Short-term trading securities        
  Mutual funds 56.6 3.7 — 60.3 60.3  — —
Convertible debt securities (3) 4.6 1.9 (2.1) 4.4 — — 4.4
Derivative contract assets (4) 1.7 8.6 (1.8) 8.5 — 7.7 0.8
Derivative contract liabilities (5) — — (7.4) (7.4) — (7.4) —
  Total $ 445.2 $ 15.3 $ (11.3)$449.2 $345.2  $98.8  $ 5.2
____________________ 
(1) Included in “Cash and cash equivalents” in the accompanying Consolidated Balance Sheets.
(2) Consists of corporate bonds, commercial paper , and common stock.
(3) Considered “available for sale” and included in “Other assets” in the accompanying Consolidated Balance Sheets.
(4) Included in “Prepaid expenses and other current assets,” “Other assets,” or “Other accrued liabilities” in the accompanying Consolidated
Balance Sheets.
(5) Included in “Other accrued liabilities” in the accompanying Consolidated Balance Sheets.
 
2019 Form 10-K 80
Table of Contents
  January 31, 2018
  Amortized
Cost  Gross
Unrealized
GainsGross
Unrealized
Losses  Fair
Value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3
Cash equivalents (1):         
 Agency bonds $ 5.0 $ — $ — $ 5.0 $ 5.0 $ — $ —
 Certificates of deposit 17.4  — — 17.4  17.4  — —
 Commercial paper 324.2  — — 324.2  — 324.2  —
 Corporate debt securities 5.0 — — 5.0 5.0 — —
 Custody cash deposit 5.2 — — 5.2 5.2 — —
 Money market funds 278.8  — — 278.8  — 278.8  —
 Municipal bonds 5.0 — — 5.0 5.0 — —
 Sovereign debt 2.0 — — 2.0 — 2.0 —
 U.S. government securities — — — — — — —
Marketable securities:         
 Short-term available-for -sale         
 Agency bonds — — — — — — —
 Asset backed securities 13.1  — — 13.1  — 13.1  —
 Certificates of deposit — — — — — — —
 Commercial paper 27.5  — — 27.5  — 27.5  —
 Corporate debt securities 99.4  — (0.1) 99.3  99.3  — —
 Municipal bonds — — — — — — —
 Sovereign debt 9.2 — — 9.2 7.7 1.5 —
 U.S. government securities 37.1  — — 37.1  37.1  — —
 Short-term trading securities         
 Mutual funds 50.1  8.9 — 59.0  59.0  — —
 Long-term available-for -sale         
 Agency bonds 13.7  — (0.1) 13.6  13.6  — —
 Asset backed securities 36.8  — (0.2) 36.6  — 36.6  —
 Corporate debt securities 100.2  0.1 (0.4) 99.9  99.9  — —
 Municipal bonds 12.7  — (0.1) 12.6  12.6  — —
 Sovereign debt 2.8 — — 2.8 — 2.8 —
 U.S. government securities 25.5  — (0.2) 25.3  25.3  — —
Convertible debt securities (2) 7.5 0.5 (0.2) 7.8 — — 7.8
Derivative contract assets (3) 2.0 7.5 (1.3) 8.2 — 7.2 1.0
Derivative contract liabilities (4) — — (26.6) (26.6) — (26.6) —
 Total $1,080.2  $ 17.0 $ (29.2) $1,068.0  $392.1  $667.1  $ 8.8
____________________ 
(1) Included in “Cash and cash equivalents” in the accompanying Consolidated Balance Sheets.
(2) Considered "available for sale" securities and included in "Other assets" in the accompanying Consolidated Balance Sheets.
(3) Included in “Prepaid expenses and other current assets,” "Other assets," or “Other accrued liabilities” in the accompanying Consolidated
Balance Sheets.
(4) Included in “Other accrued liabilities” in the accompanying Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Autodesk classifies its marketable securities as either short-term or long-term based on each instrument’s underlying
contractual maturity date. Generally marketable securities with remaining maturities of less than 12 months are classified as short-
term and marketable securities with remaining maturities greater than 12 months are classified as long-term. Autodesk may sell
certain of its marketable securities prior to their stated maturities for strategic purposes or in anticipation of credit deterioration.
2019 Form 10-K 81
Table of Contents
Autodesk applies fair value accounting for certain financial assets and liabilities, which consist of cash equivalents,
marketable securities, and other financial instruments, on a recurring basis. The Company defines fair value as the price that would
be received from selling an asset or paid to transfer a liability in an orderly transaction between market participants at the
measurement date. Fair value is estimated by applying the following hierarchy, which prioritizes the inputs used to measure fair
value into three levels and bases the categorization within the hierarchy upon the lowest level of input that is available and
significant to the fair value measurement: (Level 1) observable inputs such as quoted prices in active markets; (Level 2) inputs
other than quoted prices in active markets for identical assets and liabilities, quoted prices for identical or similar assets or liabilities
in inactive markets, or other inputs that are observable or can be corroborated by observable market data for substantially the full
term of the assets or liabilities; and (Level 3) unobservable inputs for which there is little or no market data, which require
Autodesk to develop its own assumptions. When determining fair value, Autodesk uses observable market data and relies on
unobservable inputs only when observable market data is not available. Autodesk reviews for any potential changes on a quarterly
basis, in conjunction with our fiscal quarter-end close.
Autodesk's cash equivalents, marketable securities, and financial instruments are primarily classified within Level 1 or Level
2 of the fair value hierarchy. Autodesk values its securities on pricing from pricing vendors, who may use quoted prices in active
markets for identical assets (Level 1) or inputs other than quoted prices that are observable either directly or indirectly in
determining fair value (Level 2). Autodesk's Level 2 securities are valued primarily using observable inputs other than quoted
prices in active markets for identical assets and liabilities. Autodesk's Level 3 securities consist of investments held in convertible
debt securities, and derivative contracts.
A reconciliation of the change in Autodesk’s Level 3 items for the fiscal year ended January 31, 2019 was as follows:
 Fair Value Measurements Using
Significant Unobservable Inputs
 (Level 3)
  Derivative
ContractsConvertible
Debt Securities Total
Balances, January 31, 2018  $ 1.0 $ 7.8 $ 8.8
Settlements  — (3.5) (3.5)
(Losses) Gains included in earnings (1)  (0.2) 0.5 0.3
Losses included in OCI  — (0.4) (0.4)
Balances, January 31, 2019  $ 0.8 $ 4.4 $ 5.2
____________________ 
(1) Included in “ Interest and other expense, net ” in the accompanying Consolidated Statements of Operations.
The following table summarizes the estimated fair value of Autodesk's “available-for-sale securities” classified by the
contractual maturity date of the security:
 January 31, 2019
 Cost  Fair Value
Due within 1 year $ 10.8  $ 11.7
Total $ 10.8  $ 11.7
As of January 31, 2019 and 2018, Autodesk had no securities, individually and in the aggregate, in a continuous unrealized
loss position for greater than twelve months.
The sales or redemptions of “available-for-sale securities” in fiscal 2019 and 2018 resulted in a loss of $1.3 million and $0.3
million, respectively, and a gain of $1.5 million in 2017. The loss and gains were recorded in "Interest and other expense, net" on
the Company's Consolidated Statements of Operations.
Proceeds from the sale and maturity of marketable securities for fiscal 2019 and fiscal 2018 were $531.0 million and $1.08
billion, respectively.
2019 Form 10-K 82
Table of Contents
Non-marketable equity securities
    
As of January 31, 2019 and 2018, Autodesk had $111.6 million and $112.3 million, respectively, in direct investments in
privately held companies. These non-marketable equity securities investments do not have readily determined fair value and with
the adoption of ASU No. 2016-01 during the first quarter of fiscal 2019, Autodesk elected to use the measurement alternative to
account for the adjustment of these investments in a given quarter. See "Note 1, "Business and Summary of Significant Accounting
Policies" for more details of the adoption.
Under the measurement alternative method, these investments are measured at cost, less any impairments, plus or minus
changes resulting from observable price changes in orderly transactions for the identical or similar investment of the same issuer in
the current period. To determine if a transaction is for a similar investment, Autodesk considers the rights and obligations between
the investments and the extent to which those differences would affect the fair values of those investments with additional
consideration for the stage of development of the investee company. The fair value would then be adjusted positively or negatively
based on available information such as pricing in recent rounds of financing. During the fiscal year ended January 31, 2019,
Autodesk recorded $6.2 million as a positive adjustment on certain of its privately held investments, reflected as a gain in "Interest
and other income (expense), net" on the Company's Consolidated Statement of Operations.
Non-marketable equity securities investments are periodically assessed for impairment based on available information such as
current cash positions, earnings and cash flow positions, earnings and cash flow forecasts, recent operational performance and any
other readily available market data. Autodesk does not intend to sell these investments and it is not more likely than not that
Autodesk will be required to sell the investment before recovery of the cost basis. If Autodesk determines that an impairment has
occurred, Autodesk writes down the investment to its fair value. During fiscal 2019, fiscal 2018 and fiscal 2017, Autodesk recorded
$4.8 million, $15.5 million and $1.3 million, respectively, in impairments on its privately held investments, reflected as a loss in
"Interest and other expense, net" on the Company's Consolidated Statements of Operations. Autodesk does not consider the
remaining investments to be impaired at January 31, 2019.
Derivative Financial Instruments
Under its risk management strategy, Autodesk uses derivative instruments to manage its short-term exposures to fluctuations
in foreign currency exchange rates which exist as part of ongoing business operations. Autodesk's general practice is to hedge a
portion of transaction exposures denominated in euros, Japanese yen, Swiss francs, British pounds, Canadian dollars, Australian
dollars, Singapore dollars, Swiss francs Swedish krona, and Czech krona. These instruments have maturities between one and
twelve months in the future. Autodesk does not enter into derivative instrument transactions for trading or speculative purposes.
The bank counterparties to the derivative contracts potentially expose Autodesk to credit-related losses in the event of their
nonperformance. However, to mitigate that risk, Autodesk only contracts with counterparties who meet the Company's minimum
requirements under its counterparty risk assessment process. Autodesk monitors counterparty risk on at least a quarterly basis and
will adjust its exposure to various counterparties as necessary. Autodesk generally enters into master netting arrangements, which
reduce credit risk by permitting net settlement of transactions with the same counterparty.  However, Autodesk does not have any
master netting arrangements in place with collateral features.
Foreign currency contracts designated as cash flow hedges
Autodesk uses foreign currency contracts to reduce the exchange rate impact on a portion of the net revenue or operating
expense of certain anticipated transactions. These contracts are designated and documented as cash flow hedges. The effectiveness
of the cash flow hedge contracts is assessed quarterly using regression analysis as well as other timing and probability criteria. To
receive cash flow hedge accounting treatment, all hedging relationships are formally documented at the inception of the hedge and
the hedges are expected to be highly effective in offsetting changes to future cash flows on hedged transactions. The gross gains
and losses on these hedges are included in “Accumulated other comprehensive loss” and are reclassified into earnings at the time
the forecasted revenue or expense is recognized. In the event the underlying forecasted transaction does not occur, or it becomes
probable that it will not occur, Autodesk reclassifies the gain or loss on the related cash flow hedge from “Accumulated other
comprehensive loss” to “Interest and other expense, net” in the Company's Consolidated Financial Statements at that time.
The notional amounts of these contracts are presented net settled and were $803.5 million at January 31, 2019, and $619.9
million at January 31, 2018. Outstanding contracts are recognized as either assets or liabilities on the balance sheet at
2019 Form 10-K 83
Table of Contents
fair value. The majority of the net gain of $15.0 million remaining in “Accumulated other comprehensive loss” as of January 31,
2019, is expected to be recognized into earnings within the next twelve months.
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments
Autodesk uses foreign currency contracts that are not designated as hedging instruments to reduce the exchange rate risk
associated primarily with foreign currency denominated receivables, payables, and cash. These forward contracts are marked-to-
market at the end of each month with gains and losses recognized as “Interest and other expense, net.” These derivative instruments
do not subject the Company to material balance sheet risk due to exchange rate movements because gains and losses on these
derivative instruments are intended to offset the gains or losses resulting from the revaluation and settlement of the underlying
foreign currency denominated receivables, payables, and cash. The notional amounts of these foreign currency contracts are
presented net settled and were $579.8 million at January 31, 2019, and $329.6 million at January 31, 2018.
In addition to these foreign currency contracts, Autodesk holds derivative instruments issued by privately held companies,
which are not designated as hedging instruments. These derivatives consist of certain conversion options on the convertible debt
securities held by Autodesk and an option to acquire a privately held company. These derivatives are recorded at fair value as of
each balance sheet date and are recorded in “Other assets.” Changes in the fair values of these instruments are recognized in
“Interest and other expense, net.”
Fair Value of Derivative Instruments:
The fair value of derivative instruments in Autodesk’s Consolidated Balance Sheets were as follows as of January 31, 2019,
and January 31, 2018:
 
Balance Sheet LocationFair Value at
 January 31, 2019 January 31, 2018
Derivative Assets   
Foreign currency contracts designated as cash flow hedgesPrepaid expenses and other
current assets $ 4.3 $ 6.2
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments Prepaid expenses and other
current assets and Other assets 4.2 2.0
Total derivative assets $ 8.5 $ 8.2
Derivative Liabilities   
Foreign currency contracts designated as cash flow hedges Other accrued liabilities $ 3.3 $ 18.7
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments Other accrued liabilities 4.1 7.9
Total derivative liabilities $ 7.4 $ 26.6
2019 Form 10-K 84
Table of Contents
The effects of derivatives designated as hedging instruments on Autodesk’s Consolidated Statements of Operations were as
follows for the fiscal years ended January 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively (amounts presented include any income tax
effects):
 Foreign Currency Contracts
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2019 2018  2017
Amount of gain (loss) r ecognized in accumulated other compr ehensive loss on derivatives
(effective portion) $ 19.6 $ (21.3) $ 6.3
Amount and location of (loss) gain r eclassified fr om accumulated other compr ehensive loss into
(loss) income (effective portion)    
Net revenue $ (8.5)$ 8.0 $ 9.2
Operating expenses (3.6) 1.9 (1.8)
Total $ (12.1)$ 9.9 $ 7.4
Amount and location of gain (loss) r ecognized in income (loss) on derivatives (ineffective portion
and amount excluded fr om effectiveness testing)    
Interest and other expense, net $ 0.2 $ (0.2) $ (0.3)
The effects of derivatives not designated as hedging instruments on Autodesk’s Consolidated Statements of Operations were
as follows for the fiscal years ended January 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively (amounts presented include any income tax
effects):
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2019  2018 2017
Amount and location of loss r ecognized in loss (income) on derivatives   
Interest and other expense, net $ 6.6 $ (19.1)$ (11.1)
4.     Employee and Director Stock Plans
Stock Plans
As of January 31, 2019, Autodesk maintained four active stock plans for the purpose of granting equity awards to employees
and to non-employee members of Autodesk’s Board of Directors: the 2012 Employee Stock Plan (as amended, the “2012 Employee
Plan”), which is available only to employees, the Autodesk 2012 Outside Directors’ Stock Plan (“2012 Directors' Plan”), which is
available only to non-employee directors, the PlanGrid 2012 Equity Incentive Plan ("PlanGrid 2012 Plan"), which is available to
employees who held outstanding unvested options and restricted stock units that were assumed as part of our acquisition of
PlanGrid, Inc. and the BuildingConnected, Inc. 2013 Stock Plan ("BuildingConnected 2013 Plan"), which is available to employees
who held outstanding unvested options that were assumed as part of our acquisition of BuildingConnected, Inc. Additionally, there
is one terminated plan with options outstanding.
The 2012 Employee Plan was approved by Autodesk's stockholders and became effective on January 6, 2012. Since the 2012
Stock Plan was adopted by stockholders in January 2012, Autodesk has received stockholder approval to increase the number of
shares subject to the plan by 36.1 million shares. The 2012 Employee Plan replaced the 2008 Employee Stock Plan, as amended
("2008 Plan"), and no further equity awards may be granted under the 2008 Plan. The 2012 Employee Plan reserves up to 57.3
million shares which includes 51.3 million shares reserved under the 2012 Employee Plan, as well as up to 6.0 million shares
forfeited under certain prior employee stock plans during the life of the 2012 Employee Plan. The 2012 Employee Plan permits the
grant of stock options, restricted stock units, and restricted stock awards. Each restricted stock unit or restricted stock award granted
will be counted against the shares authorized for issuance under the 2012 Employee Plan as 1.79 shares. If a granted option,
restricted stock unit, or restricted stock award expires or becomes unexercisable for any reason, the unpurchased or forfeited shares
that were granted may be returned to the 2012 Employee Plan and may become available for future grant under the 2012 Employee
Plan. As of January 31, 2019, 45.0 million shares subject to options or restricted stock awards have been granted under the 2012
Employee Plan. Options and restricted stock that were granted under the 2012 Employee Plan vest over periods ranging from
immediately upon grant to over a three year period and options expire 10 years from the date of grant. The 2012 Employee Plan
will expire on June 30, 2022. At January 31, 2019, 18.6 million shares were available for future issuance under the 2012 Employee
Plan.
2019 Form 10-K 85
Table of Contents
The 2012 Directors' Plan was approved by Autodesk's stockholders and became effective on January 6, 2012. The 2012
Directors' Plan replaced the 2010 Outside Directors' Stock Plan, as amended ("2010 Plan"). The 2012 Directors' Plan permits the
grant of stock options, restricted stock units, and restricted stock awards to non-employee members of Autodesk’s Board of
Directors. Each restricted stock unit or restricted stock award granted will be counted against the shares authorized for issuance
under the 2012 Directors' Plan as 2.11 shares. As of January 31, 2019, 0.9 million shares subject to restricted stock unit awards
have been granted under the 2012 Directors' Plan. Restricted stock units that were granted under the 2012 Outside Directors' Plan
vest over one to three years from the date of grant. On March 12, 2015, the Board reduced the number of shares reserved for
issuance under the 2012 Directors' Plan by 0.9 million shares, so that 1.7 million shares are now reserved for issuance under the
2012 Directors' Plan. The 2012 Directors' Plan will expire on June 30, 2022. At January 31, 2019, 0.8 million shares were available
for future issuance under the 2012 Director's Plan.
Pursuant to the PlanGrid acquisition on December 19, 2018, the Company assumed the unvested options and restricted stock
units under the PlanGrid 2012 Plan. No further equity awards will be granted under the PlanGrid 2012 Plan. As of January 31,
2019, 0.6 million shares subject to options remain outstanding under the PlanGrid 2012 Plan. Options that were granted under the
PlanGrid 2012 Plan vest over a four year period and expire 10 years from the date of grant. The PlanGrid 2012 Plan will expire on
June 18, 2022.
Pursuant to the BuildingConnected acquisition on January 23, 2019, the Company assumed the unvested options under the
BuildingConnected 2013 Plan. No further equity awards will be granted under the BuildingConnected 2013 Plan. As of January 31,
2019, 0.1 million shares subject to options remain outstanding under the BuildingConnected 2013 Plan. Options that were granted
under the BuildingConnected 2013 Plan vest over a four year period and expire 10 years from the date of grant. The
BuildingConnected 2013 Plan will expire on May 6, 2023.
The following sections summarize activity under Autodesk’s stock plans.
Stock Options:
A summary of stock option activity for the fiscal year ended January 31, 2019 is as follows:
 Number of
Shares
(in millions)Weighted average
exercise price per
shareWeighted average
remaining
contractual term (in
years)  Aggregate
Intrinsic Value
(1) (in millions)
Options outstanding at January 31, 2018 0.2 $ 40.49  
Assumed from acquisitions 0.7 20.82  
Granted — —  
Exercised (0.1) 37.64  
Canceled/Forfeited — —  
Options vested, exercisable and outstanding at January 31, 2019 0.8 $ 23.95 7.7 $ 100.7
Options vested and exercisable at January 31, 2019 0.2 $ 37.10 2.6 $ 17.2
Options vested and exercisable as of January 31, 2019 and expected to
vest thereafter 0.8 $ 23.95 7.7 $ 100.7
Shares available for grant at January 31, 2019 19.4   
_______________
(1) Represents the total pre-tax intrinsic value, based on Autodesk’ s closing stock price of $147.20  per share as of January 31, 2019 .
As of January 31, 2019, compensation cost of $66.5 million related to non-vested stock options is expected to be recognized
over a weighted average period of 2.8 years.
 
2019 Form 10-K 86
Table of Contents
The following table summarizes information about the pre-tax intrinsic value of options exercised and the weighted average
grant date fair value per share of options granted during the fiscal years ended January 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017:
 Fiscal year ended January 31,
 2019  2018  2017
Pre-tax intrinsic value of options exercised (1) $ 9.7 $ 22.8  $ 32.0
Weighted average grant date fair value per share of stock options assumed from
acquisition $ 110.40  $ — $ —
——————
(1) The intrinsic value of options exercised is calculated as the dif ference between the exercise price of the option and the market value of the
stock on the date of exercise.
The following table summarizes information about options vested and exercisable, and outstanding at January 31, 2019: 
 Options Vested and Exercisable Options Outstanding
 Number of
Shares (in
thousands)Weighted
average
contractual
life (in years)Weighted
average
exercise price
per shareAggregate
intrinsic value
(in millions)Number of
Shares (in
thousands)Weighted
average
contractual
life (in years)Weighted
average
exercise price
per share Aggregate
intrinsic value
(in millions)
Range of per -
share exercise
prices:       
$2.90 -
$16.12 2.6 $ 9.51  122.7  $ 14.62   
$19.32 -
$20.65 5.4 20.03  85.7  20.19   
$21.13 -
$21.13 2.8 21.13  292.9  21.13   
$21.32 -
$21.32 11.7 21.32  85.1  21.32   
$22.17 -
$31.88 8.5 25.58  105.3  27.50   
$32.58 -
$33.92 4.0 33.82  4.0  33.82   
$36.06 -
$36.06 2.5 36.06  2.5  36.06   
$36.44 -
$36.44 5.2 36.44  5.2  36.44   
$38.55 -
$38.55 1.4 38.55  1.4  38.55   
$41.62 -
$41.62 112.3 41.62  112.3  41.62   
 156.4 2.6 $ 37.10 $ 17.2 817.1 7.7 $ 23.95  $ 100.7
These options will expire if not exercised at specific dates ranging through October 2028.
Restricted Stock Units:
A summary of restricted stock activity for the fiscal year ended January 31, 2019 is as follows:
 Unreleased
Restricted Stock
Units
(in thousands)Weighted average
grant
date fair value per
share
Unvested restricted stock at January 31, 2018 5,670.7 $ 82.94
Granted 2,250.7 144.37
Vested (2,982.0 ) 76.30
Canceled/Forfeited (681.9 ) 94.70
Performance Adjustment (1) 29.9 101.74
Unvested restricted stock at January 31, 2019 4,287.4 $ 120.07
_______________
(1) Based on Autodesk's financial results and relative total stockholder return for the fiscal 2018 performance period. The performance stock
units were attained at rates ranging from 90.0% to 117.6% of the tar get award.
For the restricted stock granted during fiscal years ended January 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, the weighted average grant date
fair values were $144.37, $106.55, and $65.95, respectively. The fair values of the shares vested during fiscal years ended
January 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 were $425.4 million, $399.7 million, and $232.2 million, respectively.
2019 Form 10-K 87
Table of Contents
During the fiscal year ended January 31, 2019, Autodesk granted 2.1 million restricted stock units. Restricted stock units vest
over periods ranging from immediately upon grant to a pre-determined date that is typically within three years from the date of
grant. Restricted stock units are not considered outstanding stock at the time of grant, as the holders of these units are not entitled to
any of the rights of a stockholder, including voting rights. The fair value of the restricted stock units is expensed ratably over the
vesting period. Autodesk recorded stock-based compensation expense related to restricted stock units of $189.3 million, $202.1
million, and $173.0 million during fiscal years ended January 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively. As of January 31, 2019, total
compensation cost not yet recognized of $364.5 million related to non-vested awards is expected to be recognized over a weighted
average period of 1.76 years. At January 31, 2019, the number of restricted stock units granted but unvested was 3.9 million.
During the fiscal year ended January 31, 2019, Autodesk granted 0.2 million performance stock units for which the ultimate
number of shares earned is determined based on the achievement of performance criteria at the end of the stated service and
performance period. The performance criteria for the performance stock units are based on Annualized Recurring Revenue
("ARR") and free cash flow per share goals adopted by the Compensation and Human Resources Committee, as well as total
stockholder return compared against companies in the S&P Computer Software Select Index or the S&P North American
Technology Software Index ("Relative TSR"). These performance stock units vest over a three-year period and have the following
vesting schedule:
•Up to one third of the performance stock units may vest following year one, depending upon the achievement of the
performance criteria for fiscal 2019 as well as 1-year Relative TSR (covering year one).
•Up to one third of the performance stock units may vest following year two, depending upon the achievement of the
performance criteria for year two as well as 2-year Relative TSR (covering years one and two).
•Up to one third of the performance stock units may vest following year three, depending upon the achievement of the
performance criteria for year three as well as 3-year Relative TSR (covering years one, two and three).
Performance stock units are not considered outstanding stock at the time of grant, as the holders of these units are not entitled
to any of the rights of a stockholder, including voting rights. Autodesk has determined the grant-date fair value for these awards
using the stock price on the date of grant or if the awards are subject to a market condition, a Monte Carlo simulation model. The
fair value of the performance stock units is expensed using the accelerated attribution over the vesting period. Autodesk recorded
stock-based compensation expense related to performance stock units of $28.6 million, $33.7 million, and $22.9 million during
fiscal years ended January 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 respectively. As of January 31, 2019, total compensation cost not yet
recognized of $5.6 million related to unvested performance stock units, is expected to be recognized over a weighted average
period of 0.81 years. At January 31, 2019, the number of performance stock units granted but unvested was 0.4 million.
1998 Employee Qualified Stock Purchase Plan (“ESPP”)
Under Autodesk’s ESPP, which was approved by stockholders in 1998, eligible employees may purchase shares of
Autodesk’s common stock at their discretion using up to 15% of their eligible compensation, subject to certain limitations, at 85%
of the lower of Autodesk's closing price (fair market value) on the offering date or the exercise date. The offering period for ESPP
awards consists of four, six-month exercise periods within a 24-month offering period.
At January 31, 2019, a total of 8.1 million shares were available for future issuance. Under the ESPP, the Company issues
shares on the first trading day following March 31 and September 30 of each fiscal year. The ESPP does not have an expiration
date.
A summary of the ESPP activity for the fiscal years ended January 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 is as follows:
 Fiscal year ended January 31,
 2019 2018  2017
Issued shares 1.0 2.0 2.3
Average price of issued shares $ 90.25 $ 39.03  $ 36.99
Weighted average grant date fair value of awards granted under the ESPP $ 42.75 $ 32.41  $ 19.20
2019 Form 10-K 88
Table of Contents
Autodesk recorded $27.2 million, $25.7 million, and $25.9 million of compensation expense associated with the ESPP in
fiscal 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively.
Equity Compensation Plan Information
The following table summarizes the number of outstanding options and awards granted to employees and directors, as well as
the number of securities remaining available for future issuance under these plans as of January 31, 2019:
 (a)  (b) (c)
Plan categoryNumber of securities to
be issued upon exercise
or vesting of outstanding
options and awards (in
millions)  Weighted-average
exercise price of
outstanding optionsNumber of securities remaining
available for future issuance
under equity compensation plans
(excluding securities reflected in
column (a)) (in millions)  
Equity compensation plans approved by security
holders 5.1 $ 23.95 27.6 (1)
Total 5.1 $ 23.95 27.6   
____________________ 
(1) Included in this amount are 8.1 million  securities available for future issuance under Autodesk’ s ESPP .
5.     Income Taxes
The provision for income taxes consists of the following:
 Fiscal year ended January 31,
2019 2018  2017
Federal:    
Current $ (13.3)$ (0.8) $ 1.6
Deferred (6.7) (19.3) 8.4
State:    
Current (1.8) (0.3) (1.9)
Deferred 0.1 2.2 1.3
Foreign:    
Current 65.3 50.9  93.9
Deferred (5.5) (23.1) (45.0)
$ 38.1 $ 9.6 $ 58.3
Foreign pretax (loss) income was $181.4 million in fiscal 2019, $(76.2) million in fiscal 2018, and $(27.6) million in fiscal
2017.
2019 Form 10-K 89
Table of Contents
The differences between the U.S. statutory rate and the aggregate income tax provision are as follows:
 Fiscal year ended January 31,
2019 2018 2017
Income tax provision (benefit) at U.S. Federal statutory rate $ (9.0)$ (188.4 )$ (177.0 )
State income tax benefit, net of the U.S. Federal benefit (11.4) (21.9) (17.3)
Foreign income taxed at rates dif ferent from the U.S. statutory rate 117.8 (53.3) 22.3
U.S. valuation allowance 18.8 (82.5) 233.0
Transition tax (16.0) 408.4 —
Increase in attributes due to ASU 2016-9 adoption — — (119.4)
Change in valuation allowance from ASU 2016-9 adoption — — 119.4
Tax ef fect of non-deductible stock-based compensation 7.6 20.7 18.8
Stock compensation windfall / shortfall (39.4) (67.7) (23.0)
Research and development tax credit benefit (23.5) (11.3) (10.3)
Closure of income tax audits and changes in uncertain tax positions (12.7) 1.2 8.2
Tax ef fect of of ficer compensation in excess of $1.0 million 5.0 2.2 2.2
Non-deductible expenses 1.5 2.1 2.0
Other (0.6) 0.1 (0.6)
$ 38.1 $ 9.6 $ 58.3
Significant components of Autodesk’s deferred tax assets and liabilities are as follows:
 January 31,
2019 2018
Stock-based compensation $ 25.9 $ 26.7
Research and development tax credit carryforwards 238.7 170.3
Foreign tax credit carryforwards 198.6 162.2
Accrued compensation and benefits 6.5 25.9
Other accruals not currently deductible for tax 19.0 22.9
Purchased technology and capitalized software 32.6 43.4
Fixed assets 15.0 16.5
Tax loss carryforwards 237.2 85.7
Deferred revenue 49.0 120.3
Other 28.4 32.4
Total deferred tax assets 850.9 706.3
Less: valuation allowance (797.8 ) (634.2 )
Net deferred tax assets 53.1 72.1
Indefinite lived intangibles (67.6) (57.0)
Total deferred tax liabilities (67.6) (57.0)
Net deferred tax assets (liabilities) $ (14.5)$ 15.1
Autodesk’s tax expense is primarily driven by tax expense in foreign locations, withholding taxes on payments made to the
U.S. from foreign sources, and tax amortization on indefinite-lived intangibles offset by a tax benefit resulting from release of
uncertain tax positions upon finalization of IRS examination and release of valuation allowance from acquired deferred tax
liabilities.
Autodesk regularly assesses the need for a valuation allowance against its deferred tax assets. In making that assessment,
Autodesk considers both positive and negative evidence, whether it is more likely than not that some or all of the deferred tax
assets will not be realized. In evaluating the need for a valuation allowance, Autodesk considered cumulative losses arising from
the Company's business model transition as a significant piece of negative evidence. Consequently, Autodesk determined
2019 Form 10-K 90
Table of Contents
that a valuation allowance was required on the accumulated U.S., Canada and Singapore tax attributes. In the current year, the U.S.
created incremental deferred tax assets, primarily operating losses, foreign tax and R&D credits, Singapore generated operating
losses and Canada generated R&D credits. These U.S. and Singapore deferred tax attributes have been offset by a full valuation
allowance. The valuation allowance increased by $163.6 million in fiscal 2019 primarily due to the generation of deferred tax
attributes. The valuation allowance decreased by $113.8 million, and increased $352.4 million in fiscal 2018, and 2017,
respectively, primarily related to U.S. Tax Act reduction in rate in fiscal 2018 and U.S. and Canadian deferred tax attributes
generated in fiscal 2017. As Autodesk continually strives to optimize the overall business model, tax planning strategies may
become feasible and prudent allowing the Company to realize many of the deferred tax assets that are offset by a valuation
allowance; therefore, Autodesk will continue to evaluate the ability to utilize the net deferred tax assets each quarter, both in the
U.S. and in foreign jurisdictions, based on all available evidence, both positive and negative.
The Tax Act was signed into law on December 22, 2017 and provided broad and significant changes to the U.S. corporate
income tax regime. In light of our fiscal year-end, the Tax Act reduced the statutory federal corporate rate from 35% to 33.81% for
fiscal 2018 and to 21% for fiscal 2019 and forward. The Tax Act also, among many other provisions, imposed a one-time
mandatory tax on accumulated earnings of foreign subsidiaries (commonly referred to as the "transition tax"), subjected the deemed
intangible income of our foreign subsidiaries to current U.S. taxation (commonly referred to as "GILTI"), provided for a full
dividends received deduction upon repatriation of untaxed earnings of our foreign subsidiaries, imposed a minimum taxation
(without most tax credits) on modified taxable income, which is generally taxable income without deductions for payments to
related foreign companies (commonly referred to as “BEAT”), modified the accelerated depreciation deduction rules, and made
updates to the deductibility of certain expenses. We have completed our determination of the accounting implications of the Tax Act
on our tax accruals.
We recorded a tax benefit of the Tax Act in our financial statements as of January 31, 2018 of approximately $32.3 million
mainly driven by the corporate rate remeasurement of the indefinite-lived intangible deferred tax liability.
As of January 31, 2018, we estimated taxable income associated with offshore earnings of $831.5 million, and as of January
31, 2019, we adjusted the taxable income to $819.6 million to reflect the impact of Treasury Regulations issued in the fourth
quarter of fiscal 2019. Transition tax related to adjustments in the offshore earnings resulted in no impact to the effective tax rate as
it is primarily offset by net operating losses that are subject to a full valuation allowance. As a result of the transition tax, we
recorded a deferred tax asset of approximately $45.1 million for foreign tax credits, which are also subject to a full valuation
allowance.
We are subject to GILTI in fiscal 2019, primarily offset by current year operating losses, resulting in no impact to the effective
tax rate.
We anticipate that the U.S. Department of Treasury and other standard-setting bodies will continue to interpret or issue
guidance on how provisions of the Tax Act will be applied or otherwise administered. As future guidance is issued, we may make
adjustments to amounts that we have previously recorded that may materially impact our financial statements in the period in which
the adjustments are made.
Realization of foreign non-current net deferred tax assets of $54.3 million is dependent upon the Company's ability to
generate future taxable income in appropriate tax jurisdictions to obtain benefit from the reversal of temporary differences, net
operating loss carryforwards and tax credits. The amount of deferred tax assets considered realizable is subject to adjustment in
future periods if estimates of future taxable income are reduced and Autodesk then determines that it is not more likely than not to
realize such deferred tax assets.
As of January 31, 2019, Autodesk had $531.4 million of cumulative federal tax loss carryforwards and $1,465.7 million of
cumulative state tax loss carryforwards, which may be available to reduce future income tax liabilities in federal and state
jurisdictions. In addition to U.S. federal and state tax loss carryforwards, Ireland, Netherlands, and Singapore jurisdictions incurred
federal tax losses totaling $521.8 million, which may be available to reduce future income tax liabilities indefinitely. As discussed
above, with the exception of our Irish losses, of $238.8 million, these cumulative assets have full valuation allowance against them
on our balance sheet as the Company has determined it is more likely than not that these losses will not be utilized. The pre-fiscal
2019 federal tax loss carryforward will expire beginning fiscal 2021 through fiscal 2038. Federal losses generated in fiscal 2019 do
not have an expiration pursuant to the Tax Act and are carried forward indefinitely. The state tax loss carryforward will expire
beginning fiscal 2020 through fiscal 2040.
As of January 31, 2019, Autodesk had $164.9 million of cumulative federal research tax credit carryforwards, $68.8 million
of cumulative California state research tax credit carryforwards, and $59.0 million of cumulative Canadian federal tax
2019 Form 10-K 91
Table of Contents
credit carryforwards, which may be available to reduce future income tax liabilities in the respective jurisdictions. The federal tax
credit carryforwards will expire beginning fiscal 2021 through fiscal 2040, the state credit carryforwards may reduce future
California income tax liabilities indefinitely, and the Canadian tax credit carryforwards will expire beginning fiscal 2027 through
fiscal 2040. Autodesk also has $242.4 million of cumulative foreign tax credit carryforwards, which may be available to reduce
future U. S. tax liabilities. The foreign tax credit will expire beginning fiscal 2020 through fiscal 2030. As discussed above, these
cumulative assets have full valuation allowance against them on our balance sheet as the Company has determined it is more likely
than not that these losses will not be utilized.
Utilization of net operating losses and tax credits may be subject to an annual limitation due to ownership change limitations
provided in the Internal Revenue Code and similar state provisions. This annual limitation may result in the expiration of net
operating losses and credits before utilization. No ownership change has occurred through the balance sheet date that would limit a
material amount of U.S. federal and state tax attributes.
As of January 31, 2019, the Company had $209.0 million of gross unrecognized tax benefits, of which $190.6 million would
reduce our valuation allowance, if recognized. The remaining $18.4 million would impact the effective tax rate.
It is possible that the amount of unrecognized tax benefits will change in the next twelve months; however, an estimate of the
range of the possible change cannot be made at this time.
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending amount of the gross unrecognized tax benefits is as follows:
Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
2019 2018 2017
Gross unrecognized tax benefits at the beginning of the fiscal year $ 337.6 $ 261.4 $ 254.3
Increases for tax positions of prior years 7.9 22.8 11.9
Decreases for tax positions of prior years (146.3 ) (22.5) (4.1)
Increases for tax positions related to the current year 10.3 78.4 11.1
Decreases relating to settlements with taxing authorities — (0.8) (10.8)
Reductions as a result of lapse of the statute of limitations (0.5) (1.7) (1.0)
Gross unrecognized tax benefits at the end of the fiscal year $ 209.0 $ 337.6 $ 261.4
It is the Company's continuing practice to recognize interest and/or penalties related to income tax matters in income tax
expense. Autodesk had $3.1 million, $2.8 million, and $2.5 million, net of tax benefit, accrued for interest and penalties related to
unrecognized tax benefits as of January 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively. There was $0.3 million, $0.3 million, and $1.5
million of net expense for interest and penalties related to tax matters recorded through the consolidated statements of operations
for the years ended January 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively.
Autodesk's U.S. and state income tax returns for fiscal year 2003 through fiscal year 2019 remain open to examination due to
either net operating loss or credit carryforward. The Internal Revenue Service has examined the Company's U.S. consolidated
federal income tax returns for fiscal years 2014 and 2015.  This audit was finalized on January 31, 2019 and impacts from the
finalization of the audit were recorded in the January 31, 2019 financial statements. While it is possible that the Company's tax
positions may be challenged, the Company believes its positions are consistent with the tax law, and the balance sheet reflects
appropriate liabilities for uncertain federal tax positions for the years being examined.
Autodesk files tax returns in multiple foreign taxing jurisdictions with open tax years ranging from fiscal year 2005 to 2019.
As a result of certain business and employment actions and capital investments undertaken by Autodesk, income earned in
certain Europe and Asia Pacific countries is subject to reduced tax rates through fiscal 2019. In fiscal 2019, the Company incurred
$11.4 million net benefit ($0.05 basic net income per share) from the tax status of these business arrangements, compared to zero
benefit in fiscal 2018, and $27.1 million ($0.12 basic net income per share) in fiscal 2017.
2019 Form 10-K 92
Table of Contents
6.     Acquisitions
During the fiscal years ended January 31, 2019, and January 31, 2018, Autodesk completed the business combinations
described below. The results of operations for the following acquisitions are included in the accompanying Consolidated Statements
of Operations since their respective acquisition dates. Pro forma results of operations have been presented for acquisitions that were
material to Autodesk's Consolidated Financial Statements. The adoption of ASU No. 2017-01 in the first quarter of fiscal 2019 did
not impact the accounting for these acquisitions.
Fiscal 2019 Acquisitions
BuildingConnected, Inc.
On January 23, 2019, Autodesk acquired BuildingConnected, Inc. ("BuildingConnected"). BuildingConnected is a leading
provider of construction bid-management software and this acquisition is expected to enable Autodesk to offer a more
comprehensive construction workflow.
The acquisition-date fair value of the consideration transferred totaled $253.2 million, which consisted of $248.1 million of
cash, and $5.1 million attributable to the fair value of equity awards related to pre-combination services. Under the terms of the
merger agreement, Autodesk was obligated to replace BuilidingConnected's unvested options with 116,279 Autodesk options.
PlanGrid, Inc.
On December 19, 2018, Autodesk acquired PlanGrid, Inc. ("PlanGrid"). PlanGrid is a leading provider of construction
productivity software and this acquisition is expected to enable Autodesk to offer a more comprehensive, cloud-based construction
platform.
The acquisition-date fair value of the consideration transferred totaled $777.6 million, which consisted of $772.4 million of
cash and $5.2 million attributed to the fair value of assumed PlanGrid equity awards for pre-combination services. Under the terms
of the merger agreement, Autodesk was obligated to replace PlanGrid's unvested options and restricted stock awards with 602,051
Autodesk options and 41,069 Autodesk RSUs. Autodesk entered in to a term loan agreement in the aggregate principal amount of
$500.0 million to fund a portion of the purchase. See Note 8, "Borrowing Arrangements" for more information.
Assemble Systems, Inc.
On July 3, 2018, Autodesk acquired Assemble Systems, Inc. ("Assemble Systems"). Assemble Systems is a provider of
software solutions that enable construction professionals to influence, query and connect BIM data to key workflows across bid
management, estimating, scheduling, site management and finance. Over time, Assemble Systems' software solution will be
integrated with Autodesk's BIM 360 project management platform.
The acquisition-date fair value of the consideration transferred totaled $93.6 million, which consisted of $38.2 million of
cash, $44.8 million of Autodesk common stock (340,769 shares) and ascribed a value of $10.6 million to Autodesk's existing equity
interest in Assemble Systems.
Prior to the acquisition date, Autodesk accounted for its approximate 14% equity interest in Assemble Systems as a cost-
method investment. The acquisition-date fair value of Autodesk's existing equity interest was $10.6 million and is included in the
measurement of the consideration transferred. Autodesk recognized a gain of $4.6 million as a result of remeasuring its prior equity
interest in Assemble Systems held before the business combination using a control premium to calculate a discount for lack of
control. The gain is included in “Interest and other expense, net” in the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
Preliminary Purchase Price Allocation
For the Assemble Systems, PlanGrid, and BuildingConnected acquisitions that were accounted for as business combinations,
Autodesk recorded the tangible and intangible assets acquired and liabilities assumed based on their estimated fair values at the
date of acquisition. The fair values assigned to the identifiable intangible assets acquired were based on estimates and assumptions
determined by management. Autodesk recorded the excess of consideration transferred over the aggregate fair values as goodwill.
The goodwill recorded is primarily attributable to synergies expected to arise after the acquisition. There is no amount of goodwill
that is deductible for U.S. income tax purposes.
2019 Form 10-K 93
Table of Contents
The following table summarizes the fair value of the assets acquired and liabilities assumed by major class for the business
combinations that were completed during the fiscal year ended January 31, 2019:
 Assemble Systems (1) PlanGrid  BuildingConnected Total
Developed technologies $ 4.4 $ 78.0  $ 12.5 $ 94.9
Customer relationships and other non-current
intangible assets 12.0 98.0  26.9 136.9
Trade name 2.8 20.0  6.8 29.6
Goodwill 72.0 588.7  206.3 867.0
Deferred revenue (current and non-current) (1.7) (25.5) (2.8) (30.0)
Net tangible assets 4.1 18.4  3.5 26.0
Total $ 93.6 $ 777.6  $ 253.2 $ 1,124.4
_______________
(1) During Q4 of fiscal 2019, Autodesk recorded a measurement period adjustment related to the valuation of the deferred tax liability
associated with the Assemble Systems acquisition. This adjustment increased goodwill and reduced net tangible assets by $0.1 million .
For the three business combinations in fiscal 2019, the determination of estimated fair values of certain assets and liabilities is
derived from estimated fair value assessments and assumptions by Autodesk. For PlanGrid and BuildingConnected, Autodesk's
estimates and assumptions are subject to change within the measurement period (up to one year from the acquisition date). For the
three business combinations in fiscal 2019, the tax impact of the acquisition is also subject to change within the measurement
period. Different estimates and assumptions could result in different valuations assigned to the individual assets acquired and
liabilities assumed, and the resulting amount of goodwill.
Unaudited Pro Forma Results of Acquirees
Autodesk has included the financial results of each of the acquirees in the consolidated financial statements from the
respective dates of acquisition; the revenues and the results of each of the acquirees, except for PlanGrid, have not been material
both individually or in the aggregate to Autodesk's fiscal 2019 and 2018 results.
The following unaudited pro forma financial information summarizes the combined results of operations for Autodesk and
PlanGrid, as though the companies were combined as of the beginning of Autodesk's fiscal year 2018. The unaudited pro forma
financial information was as follows (in millions):
 Fiscal Year ended January 31,
 2019  2018
Total revenues $ 2,632.6  $ 2,099.2
Pretax loss (157.5 ) (724.9 )
Net loss (200.1 ) (734.5 )
The pro forma financial information for all periods presented includes the business combination accounting effects from the
acquisition of PlanGrid including amortization expense from acquired intangible assets, compensation expense, and the interest
expense and debt issuance costs related to the term loan agreement. The historical financial information has been adjusted to give
effect to pro forma events that are directly attributable to the business combinations and factually supportable. The pro forma
financial information is for informational purposes only and is not indicative of the results of operations that would have been
achieved if the acquisition had taken place at the beginning of the Company’s fiscal 2018.
The pro forma financial information for fiscal 2019 and 2018 combines the historical results of the Company, the adjusted
historical results of PlanGrid for fiscal 2019 and 2018 considering the date the Company acquired PlanGrid and the effects of the
pro forma adjustments described above.
2019 Form 10-K 94
Table of Contents
Fiscal 2018 Acquisitions
During the fiscal year ended January 31, 2018, Autodesk did not complete any business combinations or technology
acquisitions.
7.     Deferred Compensation
At January 31, 2019, Autodesk had marketable securities totaling $67.6 million, of which $60.3 million related to
investments in debt and equity securities that are held in a rabbi trust under non-qualified deferred compensation plans. Of the
$60.3 million related to the deferred compensation liability at January 31, 2019, $5.0 million was classified as current and $55.3
million was classified as non-current liabilities. Of the $59.0 million related to the deferred compensation liability at January 31,
2018, $3.4 million was classified as current and $55.6 million was classified as non-current liabilities. The securities are recorded
in the Consolidated Balance Sheets under the current portion of "Marketable securities." The current and non-current portions of
the liability are recorded in the Consolidated Balance Sheets under “Accrued compensation” and “Long-Term Other liabilities,”
respectively.
Costs to obtain a contract with a customer
Sales commissions earned by our internal sales personnel and our reseller partners are considered incremental and recoverable
costs of obtaining a contract with a customer. The commission costs are capitalized and included in "Prepaid expenses and other
current assets" and "Other assets" on our Consolidated Balance Sheets. The deferred costs are then amortized over the period of
benefit. Autodesk determined that sales commissions earned by internal sales personnel that are related to contract renewals are
commensurate with sales commissions earned on the initial contracts, and we determined the period of benefit to be the term of the
respective customer contract. Commissions paid to our reseller partners that are related to contract renewals are not commensurate
with commissions earned on the initial contract, and we determined the estimated period of benefit by taking into consideration
customer retention data, customer contracts, our technology and other factors. Deferred costs are periodically reviewed for
impairment. Amortization expense is included in sales and marketing expenses in the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
The ending balance of assets recognized from costs to obtain a contract with a customer was $93.0 million as of January 31,
2019. Amortization expense related to assets recognized from costs to obtain a contract with a customer was $108.8 million during
the fiscal year ended January 31, 2019. Autodesk did not recognize any contract cost impairment losses during the fiscal year ended
January 31, 2019.
8.     Borrowing Arrangements
On December 17, 2018, Autodesk entered into a credit agreement by and among Autodesk, the lenders from time to time
party therto and Citibank, N.A., as agent, which provides for an unsecured revolving loan facility in the aggregate principal amount
of $650.0 million with an option, subject to customary conditions, to request an increase in the amount of the credit facility by up to
an additional $350.0 million, and is available for working capital or other business needs. The credit agreement replaced and
terminated Autodesk’s prior $400.0 million revolving credit facility. The credit agreement contains customary covenants that could,
among other things, restrict the imposition of liens on Autodesk's assets, and restrict Autodesk's ability to incur additional
indebtedness or make dispositions of assets if Autodesk fails to maintain compliance with the financial covenants. The credit
agreement financial covenants consist of (1) a minimum interest coverage ratio of 2.50:1.0 starting with the fiscal quarter ending
January 31, 2019 and increasing to 3.00:1.0 starting with the fiscal quarter ending April 30, 2019, and (2) a maximum leverage ratio
of 3.50:1.0 starting with the fiscal quarter ending July 31, 2019 and dropping to 3.00:1.0 in the fiscal quarter ending January 31,
2020. At January 31, 2019, Autodesk was in compliance with the credit agreement covenants. Revolving loans under the credit
agreement bear interest, at Autodesk's option, at either (i) a floating rate per annum equal to the base rate plus a margin of between
0.000% and 0.500%, depending on Autodesk’s Public Debt Rating (as defined in the credit agreement) or (ii) a per annum rate
equal to the rate at which dollar deposits are offered in the London interbank market, plus a margin of between 0.900% and
1.500%, depending on Autodesk’s Public Debt Rating. The maturity date on the credit agreement is December 2023. At January 31,
2019, Autodesk had no outstanding borrowings under the credit agreement.
On December 17, 2018, Autodesk also entered into a term loan agreement by and among Autodesk, the lenders from time to
time party thereto and Citibank, N.A., as agent, which provides for a delayed draw term loan facility in the aggregate principal
amount of $500.0 million and was borrowed in full to consummate the PlanGrid acquisition in Note 6, "Acquisitions." The term
loan bears interest, at Autodesk's option, at either (i) a floating rate per annum equal to the base rate plus a margin between 0.000%
and 0.625%, depending on Autodesk's Public Debt Rating or (ii) a per annum rate equal to the
2019 Form 10-K 95
Table of Contents
rate at which dollar deposits are offered in the London interbank market, plus a margin of between 0.875% and 1.625%, depending
on Autodesk's Public Debt Rating. Based on Autodesk's current credit ratings the term loan bears interest at a per annum rate equal
to the rate at which dollar deposits are offered in the London interbank market, plus a margin of 1.125% per annum. Interest under
the term loan was 3.628% at January 31, 2019. The term loan agreement contains customary covenants that could, among other
things, restrict the imposition of liens on Autodesk's assets, and restrict Autodesk’s ability to incur additional indebtedness or make
dispositions of assets if Autodesk fails to maintain the financial covenants. The term loan agreement has the same financial
covenants as those included in the credit agreement governing its revolving loan facility described above. The term loan will
mature on December 2020 and will not be subject to amortization prior to the maturity date.
In June 2017, Autodesk issued $500.0 million aggregate principal amount of 3.5% notes due June 15, 2027 (collectively, the
“2017 Notes”). Net of a discount of $3.1 million and issuance costs of $4.9 million, Autodesk received net proceeds of $492.0
million from issuance of the 2017 Notes. Both the discount and issuance costs are being amortized to interest expense over the term
of the 2017 Notes using the effective interest method. The proceeds of the 2017 Notes have been used for the repayment of $400.0
million of debt originally due December 15, 2017 and the remainder is available for general corporate purposes. Autodesk may
redeem the 2017 Notes at any time, subject to a make whole premium. In addition, upon the occurrence of certain change of control
triggering events, Autodesk may be required to repurchase the 2017 Notes at a price equal to 101.0% of their principal amount, plus
accrued and unpaid interest to the date of repurchase. The 2017 Notes contain restrictive covenants that limit Autodesk's ability to
create certain liens, to enter into certain sale and leaseback transactions and to consolidate or merge with, or convey, transfer or
lease all or substantially all of its assets, subject to important qualifications and exceptions. Based on quoted market prices, the fair
value of the 2017 Notes was approximately $474.3 million as of January 31, 2019.
In June 2015, Autodesk issued $450.0 million aggregate principal amount of 3.125% senior notes due June 15, 2020 and
$300.0 million aggregate principal amount of 4.375% senior notes due June 15, 2025 (collectively, the “2015 Notes”). Net of a
discount of $1.7 million and issuance costs of $6.3 million, Autodesk received net proceeds of $742.0 million from issuance of the
2015 Senior Notes. Both the discount and issuance costs are being amortized to interest expense over the respective terms of the
2015 Notes using the effective interest method. The proceeds of the 2015 Notes are available for general corporate purposes.
Autodesk may redeem the 2015 Notes at any time, subject to a make whole premium. In addition, upon the occurrence of certain
change of control triggering events, Autodesk may be required to repurchase the 2015 Notes, at a price equal to 101% of their
principal amount, plus accrued and unpaid interest to the date of repurchase. The 2015 Notes contain restrictive covenants that limit
Autodesk's ability to create certain liens, to enter into certain sale and leaseback transactions and to consolidate or merge with, or
convey, transfer or lease all or substantially all of its assets, subject to significant qualifications and exceptions. Based on quoted
market prices, the fair value of the 2015 Notes was approximately $754.2 million as of January 31, 2019.
In December 2012, Autodesk issued $400.0 million aggregate principal amount of 1.95% senior notes due December 15,
2017 ("$400.0 million 2012 Notes") and $350.0 million aggregate principal amount of 3.6% senior notes due December 15, 2022
("$350.0 million 2012 Notes" and collectively with the $400.0 million 2012 Notes, the "2012 Notes"). Autodesk received net
proceeds of $739.3 million from issuance of the 2012 Notes, net of a discount of $4.5 million and issuance costs of $6.1 million.
Both the discount and issuance costs are being amortized to interest expense over the respective terms of the 2012 Notes using the
effective interest method. The proceeds of the 2012 Notes are available for general corporate purposes. On July 27, 2017, Autodesk
redeemed in full the $400.0 million 2012 Notes. The redemption was completed pursuant to the optional redemption provisions of
the first supplemental indenture dated December 13, 2012. To redeem the notes, Autodesk used the proceeds of the 2017 Notes to
pay a redemption price of approximately $400.9 million, plus accrued and unpaid interest. Total cash repayment was $401.8
million. Autodesk did not incur any additional early termination penalties in connection with such redemption. Based on the quoted
market price, the fair value of the $350.0 million 2012 Notes was approximately $349.6 million as of January 31, 2019.
2019 Form 10-K 96
Table of Contents
9.     Commitments and Contingencies
Lease commitments
Autodesk leases office space and computer equipment under non-cancellable operating lease agreements that expire at
various dates through 2090. The leases generally provide that Autodesk pay taxes, insurance, and maintenance expenses related to
the leased assets. Certain of these lease arrangements contain escalation clauses whereby monthly rent increases over time.
At January 31, 2019, the aggregate future minimum lease payments required were as follows:
 
2020 $ 76.2
2021 61.7
2022 53.6
2023 50.7
2024 41.4
Thereafter 127.0
410.6
Less: Sublease income 0.8
$ 409.8
Rent expense related to these operating leases recognized on a straight-line basis over the lease period, was as follows:
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2019  2018 2017
Rent expense $ 60.7  $ 55.9 $ 65.3
Purchase commitments
In the normal course of business, Autodesk enters into various purchase commitments for goods or services. Total non-
cancellable purchase commitments as of January 31, 2019, were approximately $82.7 million for periods through fiscal 2028.
These purchase commitments primarily result from contracts entered into for the acquisition of IT infrastructure, marketing, and
software development services, as well as commitments related to our investment agreements with limited liability partnership
funds.
Autodesk has certain royalty commitments associated with the sale and licensing of certain products. Royalty expense is
generally based on a dollar amount per unit sold or a percentage of the underlying revenue. Royalty expense, which was recorded
under cost of maintenance and subscription revenue and cost of license and other revenue on Autodesk’s Consolidated Statements
of Operations, was $6.4 million in fiscal 2019, $15.3 million in fiscal 2018, and $16.2 million in fiscal 2017.
Guarantees and Indemnifications
In the normal course of business, Autodesk provides indemnifications of varying scopes, including limited product warranties
and indemnification of customers against claims of intellectual property infringement made by third parties arising from the use of
its products or services. Autodesk accrues for known indemnification issues if a loss is probable and can be reasonably estimated.
Historically, costs related to these indemnifications have not been significant, and because potential future costs are highly variable,
Autodesk is unable to estimate the maximum potential impact of these indemnifications on its future results of operations.
In connection with the purchase, sale, or license of assets or businesses with third parties, Autodesk has entered into or
assumed customary indemnification agreements related to the assets or businesses purchased, sold or licensed. Historically, costs
related to these indemnifications have not been significant, and because potential future costs are highly variable, Autodesk is
unable to estimate the maximum potential impact of these indemnifications on its future results of operations.
2019 Form 10-K 97
Table of Contents
As permitted under Delaware law, Autodesk has agreements whereby it indemnifies its officers and directors for certain
events or occurrences while the officer or director is, or was, serving at Autodesk’s request in such capacity. The maximum
potential amount of future payments Autodesk could be required to make under these indemnification agreements is unlimited;
however, Autodesk has directors’ and officers’ liability insurance coverage that is intended to reduce its financial exposure and may
enable Autodesk to recover a portion of any future amounts paid. Autodesk believes the estimated fair value of these
indemnification agreements in excess of applicable insurance coverage is minimal.
Legal Proceedings
Autodesk is involved in a variety of claims, suits, inquiries, investigations, and proceedings in the normal course of business
including claims of alleged infringement of intellectual property rights, commercial, employment, tax, piracy prosecution, business
practices, and other matters. Autodesk routinely reviews the status of each significant matter and assesses its potential financial
exposure. If the potential loss from any matter is considered probable and the amount can be reasonably estimated, Autodesk
records a liability for the estimated loss. Because of inherent uncertainties related to these legal matters, Autodesk bases its loss
accruals on the best information available at the time. As additional information becomes available, Autodesk reassesses its
potential liability and may revise its estimates. In the Company's opinion, resolution of pending matters is not expected to have a
material adverse impact on its consolidated results of operations, cash flows, or its financial position. Given the unpredictable
nature of legal proceedings, there is a reasonable possibility that an unfavorable resolution of one or more such proceedings could
in the future materially affect the Company's results of operations, cash flows, or financial position in a particular period, however,
based on the information known by the Company as of the date of this filing and the rules and regulations applicable to the
preparation of the Company's financial statements, any such amount is either immaterial or it is not possible to provide an estimated
amount of any such potential loss.
10.     Stockholders' (Deficit) Equity
Preferred Stock
Under Autodesk’s Certificate of Incorporation, 2.0 million shares of preferred stock are authorized. At January 31, 2019,
there were no preferred shares issued or outstanding. The Board of Directors has the authority to issue the preferred stock in one or
more series and to fix rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions, including dividends and the number of shares constituting any
series or the designation of such series, without any further vote or action by the stockholders.
Common Stock Repurchase Program
Autodesk has a stock repurchase program that is used to offset dilution from the issuance of stock under the Company’s
employee stock plans and for such other purposes as may be in the interests of Autodesk and its stockholders, which has the effect
of returning excess cash generated from the Company’s business to stockholders. Autodesk repurchased and retired approximately
2.2 million shares in fiscal 2019 at an average repurchase price of $130.15 per share, 6.9 million shares in fiscal 2018 at an average
repurchase price of $100.45 per share, and 9.7 million shares in fiscal 2017 at an average repurchase price of $64.73.
At January 31, 2019, 17.4 million shares remained available for repurchase under the repurchase program approved by the
Board of Directors. The share repurchase program does not have an expiration date and the pace and timing of repurchases will
depend on factors such as cash generation from operations, available surplus, the volume of employee stock plan activity, cash
requirements for acquisitions, economic and market conditions, stock price and legal and regulatory requirements.
2019 Form 10-K 98
Table of Contents
11.    Interest and Other Expense, net
Interest and other expense, net, consists of the following:
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2019  2018 2017
Interest and investment expense, net $ (52.1) $ (34.5)$ (29.7)
Gain (loss) on foreign currency 5.1 (3.3) (3.3)
Gain (loss) on strategic investments 12.5  (16.4) 0.3
Other income 16.8  6.0 8.5
Interest and other expense, net $ (17.7) $ (48.2)$ (24.2)
12.     Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss
Accumulated other comprehensive loss, net of taxes, consisted of the following:
 Net Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
on Derivative
InstrumentsNet Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
on Available
for Sale
Securities Defined
Benefit
Pension
Components Foreign
Currency
Translation
Adjustments Total
Balances, January 31, 2017 $ 14.6 $ 1.5  $ (33.8) $ (160.8 )$ (178.5 )
Other comprehensive (loss) income before reclassifications (24.5) (0.6) 4.3  86.3 65.5
Pre-tax losses (gains) reclassified from accumulated other
comprehensive income (9.9) 0.3  0.9  0.1 (8.6)
Tax ef fects 3.2 0.1  (0.7) (4.8) (2.2)
Net current period other comprehensive (loss) income (31.2) (0.2) 4.5  81.6 54.7
Balances, January 31, 2018 (16.6) 1.3  (29.3) (79.2) (123.8 )
Other comprehensive income (loss) before reclassifications 20.6 0.7  14.7  (58.3) (22.3)
Pre-tax gains reclassified from accumulated other
comprehensive income 12.1 1.3  0.3  — 13.7
Tax ef fects (1.1) — (2.0) 0.5 (2.6)
Net current period other comprehensive income (loss) 31.6 2.0  13.0  (57.8) (11.2)
Balances, January 31, 2019 $ 15.0 $ 3.3  $ (16.3) $ (137.0 )$ (135.0 )
Reclassifications related to gains and losses on available-for-sale debt securities are included in "Interest and other expense,
net". Refer to Note 3, "Financial Instruments" for the amount and location of reclassifications related to derivative instruments.
Reclassifications of the defined benefit pension components of net periodic benefit cost are included in "Interest and other expense,
net". Refer to Note 15, "Retirement Benefit Plans."
2019 Form 10-K 99
Table of Contents
13.     Net Loss Per Share
Basic net loss per share is computed using the weighted average number of shares of common stock outstanding for the
period, excluding stock options and restricted stock units. Diluted net loss per share is based upon the weighted average number of
shares of common stock outstanding for the period and potentially dilutive common shares, including the effect of stock options
and restricted stock units under the treasury stock method. The following table sets forth the computation of the numerators and
denominators used in the basic and diluted net loss per share amounts:
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2019 2018 2017
Numerator:   
Net loss $ (80.8)$ (566.9 )$ (582.1 )
Denominator:   
Denominator for basic net loss per share—weighted average shares 218.9 219.5 222.7
Effect of dilutive securities (1) — — —
Denominator for dilutive net loss per share 218.9 219.5 222.7
Basic net loss per share $ (0.37)$ (2.58)$ (2.61)
Diluted net loss per share $ (0.37)$ (2.58)$ (2.61)
____________________ 
(1) The ef fect of dilutive securities of 3.1 million , 4.5 million , and 4.6 million  shares for the fiscal years ended January 31, 2019 , 2018 , and
2017 , respectively , have been excluded from the calculation of diluted net loss per share as those shares would have been anti-dilutive due
to the net loss incurred during those fiscal years.
The computation of diluted net loss per share does not include shares that are anti-dilutive under the treasury stock method
because their exercise prices are higher than the average market value of Autodesk’s stock during the fiscal year. The effect of 0.5
million, 0.5 million, and 0.1 million potentially anti-dilutive shares were excluded from the computation of net loss per share for
the fiscal years ended January 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively.
14.     Segments
Autodesk reports segment information based on the “management” approach. The management approach designates the
internal reporting used by management for making decisions, allocating resources and assessing performance as the source of the
Company’s reportable segments. The Company's chief operating decision maker ("CODM") allocates resources and assesses the
operating performance of the Company as a whole. As such, Autodesk has one segment manager (the CODM), and one operating
segment.
15.     Retirement Benefit Plans
Pretax Savings Plan
Autodesk has a 401(k) plan that covers nearly all U.S. employees. Eligible employees may contribute up to 75% of their
pretax salary, subject to limitations mandated by the Internal Revenue Service. Autodesk makes voluntary cash contributions and
matches a portion of employee contributions in cash. Autodesk’s contributions were $17.1 million in fiscal 2019, $17.3 million in
fiscal 2018, and $16.4 million in fiscal 2017. Autodesk does not allow participants to invest in Autodesk common stock through the
401(k) plan.
Defined Benefit Pension Plans
Autodesk maintains certain defined benefit pension plans to employees primarily located in countries outside of the U.S,
particularly the United Kingdom, Switzerland, and Japan. The Company deposits funds for specific plans, consistent with the
requirements of local law, with insurance companies, third-party trustees, or into government-managed accounts, and accrues for
the unfunded portion of the obligation, where material. Depending on the design of the plan, local customs, and market
circumstances, the liabilities of a plan may exceed qualified plan assets.
2019 Form 10-K 100
Table of Contents
Benefit Obligation and Plan Assets
The changes in the projected benefit obligations and plan assets for the plans described above were as follows:
 Fiscal year ended January 31,
 2019  2018
Beginning projected benefit obligation $ 158.1  $ 146.4
Service cost 4.1 5.2
Interest cost 2.3 2.7
Actuarial (gain) loss (4.3) (2.8)
Benefits paid (2.6) (3.3)
Foreign currency exchange rate changes (10.0) 13.9
Curtailments and settlements (61.0) (8.2)
Contributions by plan participants 5.0 4.0
Plan amendment — 0.2
Ending projected benefit obligation $ 91.6  $ 158.1
   
Beginning fair value of plan assets $ 121.1  $ 107.4
Actual return on plan assets 1.4 3.8
Contributions paid by employer 5.9 6.5
Contributions paid by plan participants 5.0 4.0
Benefit payments (2.6) (3.3)
Curtailments and settlements (42.3) (8.0)
Foreign currency exchange rate changes (7.7) 10.7
Ending fair value of plan assets $ 80.8  $ 121.1
Funded status $ (10.8) $ (37.0)
The amounts recognized on the consolidated balance sheets at the end of each period were as follows:
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2019  2018
Other long-term liabilities $ 10.8  $ 37.0
Accumulated other comprehensive loss, before tax 16.3  31.7
Net amount recognized $ 27.1  $ 68.7
On a worldwide basis, the Company's defined benefit pension plans were 88% funded as of January 31, 2019.
As of January 31, 2019, the aggregate accumulated benefit obligation was $85.1 million for the defined benefit pension plans
compared to $139.5 million as of January 31, 2018. Included in the aggregate data in the following tables are the amounts
applicable to the Company's defined benefit pension plans, with accumulated benefit obligations in excess of plan assets, as well as
plans with projected benefit obligations in excess of plan assets. Amounts related to such plans at the end of each period were as
follows:
  Fiscal Year Ended
January 31,
  2019  2018
Plans with accumulated benefit obligations in excess of plan assets:    
Accumulated benefit obligations  $ 75.6  $130.7
Plan assets  70.0  112.1
Plans with projected benefit obligations in excess of plan assets:    
Projected benefit obligations  $ 91.6  $158.1
Plan assets  80.8  121.1
2019 Form 10-K 101
Table of Contents
Defined Benefit Pension Plan Assets
The investments of the plans are managed by insurance companies or third-party investment managers selected by Autodesk's
Trustees, consistent with regulations or market practice of the country where the assets are invested. Investments managed by
qualified insurance companies or third-party investment managers under standard contracts follow local regulations, and Autodesk
is not actively involved in their investment strategies.
Defined benefit pension plan assets measured at fair value on a recurring basis consisted of the following investment
categories at the end of each period as follows:
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2019 2018
 Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total Total
Insurance contracts $ — $ 28.0 $ — $ 28.0 $ 53.0
Other investments — 14.5 — 14.5 17.0
Total assets measured at fair value $ — $ 42.5 $ — 42.5 70.0
Cash    4.3 0.2
Investment Fund valued using net asset value    34.0 50.9
Total pension plan assets at fair value $ 80.8 $ 121.1
The insurance contracts in the preceding table represent the immediate cash surrender value of assets managed by qualified
insurance companies. Autodesk does not have control over the target allocation or visibility of the investment strategies of those
investments. Insurance contracts and investments held by insurance companies made up 35% and 44% of total plan assets as of
January 31, 2019 and January 31, 2018, respectively.
The assets held in the investment fund in the preceding table are invested in a diversified growth fund actively managed by
Russell Investments in association with Aon Hewitt. The objective of the fund is to generate capital appreciation on a long-term
basis through a diversified portfolio of investments. The fund aims to deliver equity-like returns in the medium to long term with
around two-thirds the volatility of equity markets. The fair value of the assets held in the investment fund are priced monthly at net
asset value without restrictions on redemption.
Estimated Future Benefit Payments
Estimated benefit payments over the next 10 fiscal years are as follows:
 Pension Benefits
2020 $ 2.4
2021 2.3
2022 2.3
2023 2.3
2024 2.3
2025-2029 13.9
Total $ 25.5
Funding Expectations
Our expected required funding for the plans during fiscal 2020 is approximately $4.6 million.
2019 Form 10-K 102
Table of Contents
Net Periodic Benefit Cost
The components of net periodic pension cost for the defined benefit pension plans for fiscal 2019, 2018, and 2017 are as
follows:
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2019  2018 2017
Service cost for benefits earned during the period $ 4.1 $ 5.2 $ 5.6
Interest cost on projected benefit obligation (1) 2.3 2.7 3.0
Expected return on plan assets (1) (3.2) (3.9) (4.2)
Amortization of prior service credit (1) (0.2) (0.3) (0.3)
Amortization of loss (1) 0.5 1.2 1.5
Settlement loss (1) 4.3 1.9 1.2
Curtailment gain (1) (10.9) (0.1) —
Net periodic (benefit) cost $ (3.1) $ 6.7 $ 6.8
____________________
(1) Included in Interest and other expense, net  in Autodesk's fiscal 2019  Consolidated Statements of Operations as a result of the adoption of
ASU No. 2017-07 in the first quarter of fiscal 2019.
Amounts Recorded in OCI
The components of other comprehensive income (loss) for the defined benefit pension plans before taxes for fiscal 2019,
2018, and 2017 are as follows:
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2019  2018 2017
Prior service credit for period $ (0.1) $ 0.2 $ —
Net (gain) loss for period (2.4) (2.5) 7.2
Effect of settlement (4.3) (1.9) (1.2)
Effect of curtailment (7.9) (0.2) —
Amortization of prior service credit 0.2 0.3 0.3
Amortization of net loss (0.5) (1.2) (1.5)
Other comprehensive (income) loss $ (15.0) $ (5.3)$ 4.8
Amounts Recorded in Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss
The amounts recorded in accumulated other comprehensive loss before taxes at the end of each period were as follows:
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2019  2018
Net prior service credit $ (1.4) $ (3.1)
Net actuarial loss 17.7  34.8
Accumulated other comprehensive loss, before tax $ 16.3  $ 31.7
Assumptions
Weighted average actuarial assumptions used to determine costs for the plans for each period were as follows:
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2019 2018  2017
Discount rate 2.5% 2.4% 3.2%
Expected long-term rate of return on plan assets 3.3% 3.3% 4.3%
Rate of compensation increase 2.3% 2.3% 2.2%
The weighted-average expected long-term rate of return for the plan assets is 3.3%. The weighted-average expected long-term
rate of return on plan assets is based on the interest rates guaranteed under the insurance contracts, and the expected rate of
2019 Form 10-K 103
Table of Contents
return appropriate for each category of assets weighted for the distribution within the diversified investment fund. The assumptions
used for the plans are based upon customary rates and practices for the location of the plans. Factors such as asset class allocations,
long-term rates of return (actual and expected), and results of periodic asset liability modeling studies are considered when
constructing the long-term rate of return assumption for our defined benefit pension plans.
Weighted average actuarial assumptions used to determine benefit obligations for the plans at the end of each period were as
follows:
 Fiscal Year Ended January 31,
 2019 2018  2017
Discount rate 2.0% 1.8% 1.7%
Rate of compensation increase 2.7% 2.6% 2.6%
In selecting the appropriate discount rate for the plans, the Company uses country-specific information, adjusted to reflect the
duration of the particular plan. The discount rate was based on highly rated long-term bond indexes and yield curves that match the
duration of the plan’s benefit obligations.
Defined Contribution Plans
Autodesk also provides defined contribution plans in certain foreign countries where required by statute. Autodesk’s funding
policy for foreign defined contribution plans is consistent with the local requirements in each country. Autodesk’s contributions to
these plans were $29.6 million in fiscal 2019, $27.2 million in fiscal 2018, and $26.6 million in fiscal 2017.
Cash Balance Plans
Autodesk provides a cash balance plan that insures the risks of disability, death, and longevity, in which the vested pension
capital is reinvested and provides a 100% capital and interest guarantee. The weighted-average guaranteed interest crediting rate for
cash balance plans was 1.0%, 1.0%, and 1.3% for mandatory retirement savings and 0.3%, 0.3%, and 0.8% for supplementary
retirement savings for fiscal 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively.
Other Plans
In addition, Autodesk offers a non-qualified deferred compensation plan to certain key employees whereby they may defer a
portion (or all) of their annual compensation until retirement or a different date specified by the employee in accordance with terms
of the plan. See Note 7, “Deferred Compensation,” for further discussion.
16.     Restructuring and other exit costs, net
During the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2018, the Board of Directors approved a world-wide restructuring plan (“Fiscal 2018
Plan”) to support the Company's strategic priorities of completing the subscription transition, digitizing the Company, and re-
imagining manufacturing, construction, and production. Through the restructuring, Autodesk seeks to reduce its investments in
areas not aligned with its strategic priorities, including in areas related to research and development and go-to-market activities. At
the same time, Autodesk plans to further invest in strategic priority areas related to digital infrastructure, customer success, and
construction. By re-balancing resources to better align with the Company’s strategic priorities, Autodesk is positioning itself to
meet its long-term goals. This world-wide restructuring plan included a reduction in force of approximately 11% of the Company’s
workforce, or 1,027 employees, and the consolidation of certain leased facilities. By January 31, 2019, the personnel and facilities
related actions included in this restructuring plan were substantially complete.
 
During Fiscal 2019, restructuring charges under the Fiscal 2018 Plan included $39.2 million in employee termination benefits
and $3.2 million in lease termination and other exit costs.
2019 Form 10-K 104
Table of Contents
The following tables set forth the restructuring charges and other facility exit costs, net during the fiscal years ended
January 31, 2019 and 2018:
Balances,
January 31, 2018 Additions  Payments  Adjustments (1)Balances,
January 31, 2019
Fiscal 2018 Plan     
Employee terminations costs $ 53.0 $ 39.2  $ (89.7) $ (0.5)$ 2.0
Facility terminations and other exit costs 2.5 3.2 (5.7) 0.1 0.1
Total $ 55.5 $ 42.4  $ (95.4) $ (0.4)$ 2.1
Current portion (2) $ 55.5     $ 2.1
Total $ 55.5     $ 2.1
____________________
(1) Adjustments primarily relate to the impact of foreign exchange rate changes, settlement of lease contracts, and certain write of fs related to
fixed assets.
(2) The current portions of the reserve are recorded in the Consolidated Balance Sheets under “Other accrued liabilities.” There was no non-
current portion as of January 31, 2019 .
 Balances,
January 31, 2017 Additions  Payments  Adjustments (1)Balances,
January 31, 2018
Fiscal 2018 Plan      
Employee terminations costs $ — $ 87.3  $ (35.1) $ 0.8 $ 53.0
Facility terminations and other exit costs — 6.3 (1.3) (2.5) 2.5
Fiscal 2017 Plan      
Employee termination costs 1.1 0.1 (1.5) 0.3 —
Facility terminations and other exit costs 1.9 0.1 (1.5) (0.3) 0.2
Other facility termination costs      
Facility termination costs 4.5 0.3 (3.0) (0.3) 1.5
Total $ 7.5 $ 94.1  $ (42.4) $ (2.0)$ 57.2
Current portion (2) $ 5.9    $ 57.2
Non-current portion (2) 1.6    —
Total $ 7.5    $ 57.2
_______________
(1) Adjustments primarily relate to the accelerated depreciation of fixed assets and the impact of foreign exchange rate changes.
(2) The current and non-current portions of the reserve are recorded in the Consolidated Balance Sheets under “Other accrued liabilities” and
“Other liabilities,” respectively .
2019 Form 10-K 105
Table of Contents
17.     Selected Quarterly Financial Information (Unaudited)
Summarized quarterly financial information for fiscal year 2019 and 2018 is as follows:
2019 1st quarter  2nd quarter  3rd quarter  4th quarter Fiscal year
Net revenue (1) $ 559.9  $ 611.7 $ 660.9  $ 737.3 $ 2,569.8
Gross profit (1) 493.1  541.9  588.6  660.3 2,283.9
(Loss) Income from operations (1) (55.3) (24.7) 14.7  40.3 (25.0)
Provision for income taxes (18.6) (16.0) (35.2) 31.7 (38.1)
Net (loss) income (1) (82.4) (39.4) (23.7) 64.7 (80.8)
Basic net (loss) income per share (1) (2) $ (0.38) $ (0.18) $ (0.11) $ 0.30 $ (0.37)
Diluted net (loss) income per share (1) (2) $ (0.38) $ (0.18) $ (0.11) $ 0.29 $ (0.37)
(Loss) Income fr om operations includes
the following items:       
Stock-based compensation expense $ 54.4  $ 56.9  $ 64.2  $ 74.0 $ 249.5
Amortization of acquisition related
intangibles 7.4 7.2 7.8 11.1 33.5
CEO transition costs — (0.1) — — (0.1)
Acquisition related costs — 2.5 1.8 11.9 16.2
Restructuring and other exit costs, net $ 22.5  $ 13.8  $ 3.7 $ 1.9 $ 41.9
      
2018 1st quarter  2nd quarter  3rd quarter  4th quarter Fiscal year
Net revenue $ 485.7  $ 501.8  $ 515.3  $ 553.8 $ 2,056.6
Gross profit 407.5  427.2  437.8  480.7 1,753.2
Loss from operations (119.6) (107.6 ) (100.0 ) (181.9 ) (509.1 )
(Provision) Benefit for income taxes (8.2) (17.6) (8.6) 24.8 (9.6)
Net loss (129.6 ) (144.0 ) (119.8) (173.5 ) (566.9 )
Basic net loss per share (2) $ (0.59) $ (0.66) $ (0.55) $ (0.79)$ (2.58)
Diluted net loss per share (2) $ (0.59) $ (0.66) $ (0.55) $ (0.79)$ (2.58)
Loss fr om operations includes the
following items:       
Stock-based compensation expense $ 59.0  $ 58.8  $ 65.1  $ 62.1 $ 245.0
Amortization of acquisition related
intangibles 10.4  8.9 8.7 8.6 36.6
CEO transition costs 11.0 10.6  — (0.2) 21.4
Restructuring and other exit costs, net $ (0.3) $ 0.5 $ — $ 93.9 $ 94.1
____________________
(1) Reflects the impact of the adoption of new accounting standards in fiscal year 2019  related to revenue recognition. See Note 1, "Business
and Summary of Significant Accounting Policies , Accounting Standards Adopted ", of our consolidated financial statements for additional
information.
(2) Net (loss) income per share were computed independently for each of the periods presented; therefore the sum of the net (loss) income per
share amount for the quarters may not equal the total for the fiscal year .
18.     Subsequent Events
In February 2019 and March 2019, Autodesk repaid $75.0 million and $50.0 million, respectively for a total payment of
$125.0 million on the $500.0 million Term Loan Agreement entered into in December 2018 in connection with the consummation
of the PlanGrid acquisition described in Note 6, "Acquisitions." See Note 8,"Borrowing Arrangements" for more details on the
Term Loan Agreement. Autodesk did not incur any early termination penalties in connection with such repayment.
2019 Form 10-K 106
Table of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Stockholders and Board of Directors of Autodesk, Inc.
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Autodesk, Inc. (the Company) as of January 31, 2019, and
2018, the related consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive loss, stockholders’ (deficit) equity, and cash flows for each
of the three years in the period ended January 31, 2019, and the related notes and the financial statement schedule listed in the
Index at Item 15(a)(2) (collectively referred to as the "consolidated financial statements"). In our opinion, the consolidated financial
statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company at January 31, 2019, and 2018, and the
results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended January 31, 2019, in conformity with U.S.
generally accepted accounting principles.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of January 31, 2019, based on criteria established in Internal
Control-Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013
framework) and our report dated March 25, 2019 expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Adoption of New Accounting Standard
As discussed in Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements, the Company changed its method of accounting for
recognizing revenue from contracts with customers and recognizing costs related to obtaining a customer contract in the year ended
January 31, 2019 due to the adoption of ASU No. 2014‑09, Revenue from Contracts with Customers.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on
the Company’s financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are
required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules
and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform
the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to
error or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements,
whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test
basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the
accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the
financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
/s/ ERNST & YOUNG LLP
We have served as the Company's auditor since 1983.
San Francisco, California
March 25, 2019
 
2019 Form 10-K 107
Table of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Stockholders and Board of Directors of Autodesk, Inc.
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited Autodesk, Inc.’s internal control over financial reporting as of January 31, 2019, based on criteria established
in Internal Control-Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission
(2013 framework) (the COSO criteria). In our opinion, Autodesk, Inc. (the Company) maintained, in all material respects, effective
internal control over financial reporting as of January 31, 2019, based on the COSO criteria.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of the Company as of January 31, 2019, and 2018, the related
consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive loss, stockholders’ (deficit) equity, and cash flows for each of the three years
in the period ended January 31, 2019, and the related notes and the financial statement schedule listed in the Index at Item 15(a)(2)
and our report dated March 25, 2019 expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its
assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting included in the accompanying Management’s Report on
Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s internal control over
financial reporting based on our audit. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be
independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform
the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all
material respects.
Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material
weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk, and
performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable
basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the
reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that
(1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of
the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of
financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the
company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide
reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s
assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/ ERNST & YOUNG LLP
San Francisco, California
March 25, 2019
2019 Form 10-K 108
Table of Contents
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND
FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE
None.
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
EVALUATION OF DISCLOSURE CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
We maintain "disclosure controls and procedures," as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) under the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"). Our disclosure controls and procedures are designed to ensure that information
required to be disclosed in our Exchange Act reports is (i) recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods
specified in the rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"), and (ii) accumulated and communicated to Autodesk
management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, to allow timely decisions regarding required
disclosure. We conducted an evaluation, under the supervision and with the participation of our Chief Executive Officer and Chief
Financial Officer, of the effectiveness of the design and operation of our disclosure controls and procedures as of the end of the
period covered by this Annual Report on Form 10-K. Based upon this evaluation, our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial
Officer have concluded that our disclosure controls and procedures are effective as of January 31, 2019.
MANAGEMENT'S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
Our management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting (as defined
in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended). Our management assessed the effectiveness of our
internal control over financial reporting as of January 31, 2019. In making this assessment, our management used the criteria set
forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (“COSO”) in the 2013 Internal Control—
Integrated Framework. Our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, does not expect that
our disclosure controls and procedures or our internal control over financial reporting will necessarily prevent all errors and all
fraud. A control system, no matter how well conceived and operated, can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance that the
objectives of the control system are met. Further, the design of a control system must reflect the fact that there are resource
constraints, and the benefits of controls must be considered relative to their costs. Because of the inherent limitations in all control
systems, no evaluation of controls can provide absolute assurance that all control issues and instances of fraud, if any, within
Autodesk have been detected.
Our management has concluded that, as of January 31, 2019, our internal control over financial reporting was effective to
provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external
purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. Our independent registered public accounting firm, Ernst &
Young LLP, has issued an audit report on our internal control over financial reporting, which is included in Item 8 herein.
CHANGES IN INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
There were no changes in our internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-
15(f) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934) during the three months ended January 31, 2019, that have materially affected, or
are reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting.
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION
None.
2019 Form 10-K 109
Table of Contents
PART III
Certain information required by Part III is omitted from this Annual Report because we intend to file a definitive proxy
statement pursuant to Regulation 14A for our Annual Meeting of Stockholders not later than 120 days after the end of the fiscal
year covered by this Annual Report (the “Proxy Statement”) and certain information included therein is incorporated herein by
reference. Only those sections of the Proxy Statement that specifically address the items set forth herein are incorporated by
reference.
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
The information required by this Item is incorporated herein by reference to the sections entitled “Proposal One—Election of
Directors,” “Section 16(a) Beneficial Ownership Reporting Compliance,” and “Corporate Governance” in our Proxy Statement.
EXECUTIVE OFFICERS OF THE REGISTRANT
The following sets forth certain information as of March 25, 2019, regarding our executive officers.
Name Age Position
Andrew Anagnost 54 President and Chief Executive Of ficer
R. Scott Herren 57 SVP and Chief Financial Of ficer
Steve M. Blum 54 SVP, Worldwide Field Operations
Pascal W. Di Fronzo 54 SVP, Corporate Affairs, Chief Legal Of ficer & Secretary
Carmel Galvin 50 SVP, People and Places and Chief Human Resources Of ficer
Andrew Anagnost joined Autodesk in September 1997 and has served as President and Chief Executive Officer since June
2017. Dr. Anagnost served as Co-CEO from February 2017 to June 2017, Chief Marketing Officer from December 2016 to June
2017 and as the Company’s Senior Vice President, Business Strategy & Marketing, from March 2012 to June 2017. From
December 2009 to March 2012, Dr. Anagnost was Vice President, Product Suites and Web Services of the Company. Prior to this
position, Dr. Anagnost served as Vice President of CAD/CAE products for the manufacturing division of the Company from March
2007 to December 2009. Previously, Dr. Anagnost held other senior management positions at the Company. Prior to joining the
Company, Dr. Anagnost held various engineering, sales, marketing and product management positions at Lockheed Aeronautical
Systems Company and EXA Corporation. He also served as an NRC post-doctoral fellow at NASA Ames Research Center.
R. Scott Herren joined Autodesk in November 2014 and serves as Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. Prior to
joining Autodesk, Mr. Herren was the Senior Vice President of Finance for Citrix Systems, Inc. from September 2011 to October
2014 where he led the company’s finance, accounting, tax, treasury, investor relations, real estate, and facilities teams. From March
2000 to September 2011, Mr. Herren held a variety of leadership positions at Citrix including Vice President and Managing
Director for EMEA and Vice President and General Manager of the Virtualization Systems Group. Prior to Citrix, Mr. Herren
served at FedEx Corporation as Vice President, Financial Planning. Prior to FedEx, he spent 13 years at International Business
Machines Corporation in senior financial positions.
Steven M. Blum joined Autodesk in January 2003 and has served as Senior Vice President, Worldwide Field Operations since
September 2017. Mr. Blum served as Senior Vice President, Worldwide Sales and Services from February 2011 to September 2017.
From January 2003 to February 2011, he served as Senior Vice President of Americas Sales. Prior to this position, Blum was
Executive Vice President of Sales and Account Management for Parago, Inc. Blum also held positions at Mentor Graphics, most
recently serving as Vice President of America's sales. Before joining Mentor Graphics, he held engineering and sales positions at
NCR Corporation and Advanced Micro Devices.
Pascal W. Di Fronzo joined Autodesk in June 1998 and has served as Senior Vice President, Corporate Affairs, Chief Legal
Officer & Secretary since December 2016. Mr. Di Fronzo served as Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary from
March 2007 to December 2016. From March 2006 to March 2007, Mr. Di Fronzo served as Vice President, General Counsel and
Secretary, and served as Vice President, Assistant General Counsel and Assistant Secretary from March 2005 through March 2006.
Previously, Mr. Di Fronzo served in other business and legal capacities in our Legal Department.
2019 Form 10-K 110
Table of Contents
Prior to joining Autodesk, he advised high technology and emerging growth companies on business and intellectual property
transactions and litigation while in private practice.
Carmel Galvin joined Autodesk in March 2018 and serves as Senior Vice President, People and Places and Chief Human
Resources Officer (“CHRO”). Prior to joining Autodesk, from April 2016 to February 2018, Ms. Galvin was the Senior Vice
President, CHRO for Glassdoor, Inc. where she led all people functions of the company, including human resources planning,
learning and development, talent acquisition, employee relations and engagement. From October 2014 to April 2016, Ms. Galvin
served as Senior Vice President and CHRO at Advent Software, Inc., where she oversaw the company’s global people strategies
and programs. Prior to Advent, she served as Vice President of Talent & Culture Development for Deloitte’s new-venture
accelerator, advising a growing portfolio of innovative companies on how to scale and adjust their culture and talent programs.
Prior to Deloitte, Ms. Galvin gained 20 years of human resources experience at global companies including Moody’s KMV, Barra
Inc., Visa International and IBM (Ireland) Ltd.
There is no family relationship among any of our directors or executive officers.
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
The information required by this Item is incorporated herein by reference to the sections entitled "Corporate Governance" and
“Executive Compensation” in our Proxy Statement.
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND
RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
The information required by this Item is incorporated herein by reference to the sections entitled “Security Ownership of
Certain Beneficial Owners and Management” and “Executive Compensation—Equity Compensation Plan Information” in our
Proxy Statement.
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE
The information required by this Item is incorporated herein by reference to the sections entitled “Certain Relationships and
Related Party Transactions” and “Corporate Governance—Independence of the Board of Directors” in our Proxy Statement.
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTING FEES AND SERVICES
The information required by this Item is incorporated herein by reference to the sections entitled “Proposal Two—
Ratification of the Appointment of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm” in our Proxy Statement.
2019 Form 10-K 111
Table of Contents
PART IV
 
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
(a)     The following documents are filed as part of this Report:
1.Financial Statements: The information concerning Autodesk’s financial statements, and the Report of Ernst & Young
LLP, Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm required by this Item is incorporated by reference herein to the
section of this Report in Item 8, entitled “Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.”
2.Financial Statement Schedule:    The following financial statement schedule of Autodesk, Inc., for the fiscal years
ended January 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, is filed as part of this Report and should be read in conjunction with the
Consolidated Financial Statements of Autodesk, Inc.:
Schedule II    Valuation and Qualifying Accounts
Schedules not listed above have been omitted because they are not applicable or are not required or the information
required to be set forth therein is included in the Consolidated Financial Statements or Notes thereto.
3.Exhibits:  See Item 15(b) below. We have filed, or incorporated into this Report by reference, the exhibits listed on the
accompanying Index to Exhibits immediately following the signature page of this Form 10-K.
(b)     Exhibits:
We have filed, or incorporated into this Report by reference, the exhibits listed on the accompanying Index to Exhibits
immediately following the signature page of this Form 10-K.
(c)     Financial Statement Schedules: See Item 15(a), above.
 
ITEM 15(A)(2)FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULE II
 
DescriptionBalance at
Beginning
of Fiscal YearAdditions
Charged to
Costs and
Expenses or
Revenues  Deductions
and
Write-OffsBalance at
End of Fiscal Year
 (in millions)
Fiscal Year Ended January 31, 2019     
Partner Program reserves (1) 36.5 294.7  279.5 51.7
Restructuring and other facility exit costs 57.2 41.9  97.0 2.1
Fiscal Year Ended January 31, 2018     
Partner Program reserves (1) 28.1 224.3  215.9 36.5
Restructuring and other facility exit costs 8.4 94.1  45.3 57.2
Fiscal Year Ended January 31, 2017     
Partner Program reserves (1) 45.2 240.3  257.4 28.1
Restructuring and other facility exit costs 1.3 77.8  70.7 8.4
 ____________________
(1) The partner program reserves balance impacts "Accounts receivable, net" and "Accounts payable" on the accompanying Consolidated
Balance Sheets.
ITEM 16 FORM 10-K SUMMARY
None.
2019 Form 10-K 112
Table of Contents
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly
caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
  AUTODESK, INC.
  By: /s/    ANDREW  ANAGNOST        
  Andr ew Anagnost
  President and Chief Executive Officer
Dated: March 25, 2019  
2019 Form 10-K 113
Table of Contents
POWER OF ATTORNEY
KNOW ALL PERSONS BY THESE PRESENTS, that each person whose signature appears below constitutes and
appoints Andrew Anagnost and R. Scott Herren each as his or her attorney-in-fact, each with the power of substitution, for him or
her in any and all capacities, to sign any amendments to this Report on Form 10-K, and to file the same, with exhibits thereto and
other documents in connection therewith, with the Securities and Exchange Commission, hereby ratifying and confirming all that
each of said attorneys-in-fact, or his substitute or substitutes, may do or cause to be done by virtue hereof.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this Report has been signed below by the
following persons on behalf of the Registrant and in the capacities as of March 25, 2019.
 
Signature   Title
/s/    ANDREW  ANAGNOST         President and Chief Executive Of ficer, Director
(Principal Executive Of ficer)
Andrew Anagnost   
/s/    R. SCOTT  HERREN          Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Of ficer
(Principal Financial Of ficer and Principal Accounting Of ficer)
R. Scott Herren   
/s/    ST ACY  J. SMITH         Director
(Non-executive Chairman of the Board)
Stacy J. Smith   
/s/    CRA WFORD W. BEVERIDGE          Director
Crawford W. Beveridge   
/s/    KAREN BLASING          Director
Karen Blasing   
/s/    REID FRENCH  Director
Reid French   
/s/    MAR Y T. MCDOWELL           Director
Mary T. McDowell   
  Director
Blake J. Irving   
/s/    STEPHEN D. MILLIGAN       Director
Stephen D. Milligan   
/s/    LORRIE M. NORRINGT ON          Director
Lorrie M. Norrington   
/s/    ELIZABETH RAF AEL       Director
Elizabeth Rafael   
2019 Form 10-K 114
Table of Contents
Index to Exhibits
 
Exhibit No.   Description
3.1
  Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation of Registrant (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 filed with the
Registrant’ s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed on March 30, 2006)
3.2
  Amended and Restated Bylaws of Registrant (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 filed with the Registrant’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on June 15, 2018)
4.1 Indenture dated December 13, 2012, by and between the Registrant and U.S. Bank National Association (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.1 filed with the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 13, 2012)
4.2 First Supplemental Indenture (including Form of Notes) dated December 13, 2012, by and between the Registrant and U.S.
Bank National Association (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 filed with the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K
filed on December 13, 2012)
4.3 Second Supplemental Indenture (including Form of Notes) dated June 5, 2015, by and between the Registrant and U.S. Bank
National Association (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on June
8, 2015)
4.4 Third Supplemental Indenture (including Form of Notes) dated June 8, 2017, by and between the Registrant and U.S. Bank
National Association. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on June
8, 2017)
10.1*
  Description of Registrant's Performance Stock Unit Program (incorporated by reference to Item 5.02 of the Registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K filed on March 26, 2018)
10.2*
  Registrant’ s 1998 Employee Qualified Stock Purchase Plan, as amended and restated ef fective as of June 12, 2018
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 of the Registrant’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed on August 30, 2018)
10.3*
  Registrant’ s 1998 Employee Qualified Stock Purchase Plan Forms of Subscription Agreement, as amended and restated
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.5 filed with the Registrant’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed on August 30,
2016)
10.4*
  Registrant's 2012 Employee Stock Plan, as amended and restated ef fective as of June 12, 2018 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.2 filed with the Registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed on August 30, 2018)
10.5*
  Registrant's 2012 Employee Stock Plan Form of Restricted Stock Unit Agreement, as amended and restated (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 filed with the Registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed on August 30, 2016)
10.6*
  Registrant's 2012 Employee Stock Plan Form of Severance Restricted Stock Unit Agreement, as amended and restated
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 filed with the Registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed on August 30,
2016)
10.7*
  Registrant's 2012 Employee Stock Plan Form of Stock Option Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 filed
with the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on March 13, 2012)
10.8*
  Registrant's 2012 Employee Stock Plan Form of Stock Option Agreement (non-U.S. Employees) (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.4 filed with the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on March 13, 2012)
2019 Form 10-K 115
Table of Contents
Exhibit No.   Description
10.9* PlanGrid, Inc. 2012 Equity Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 99.1 filed with the Registrant's Registration
Statement on Form S-8 filed on December 21, 2018)
10.10* Amended and Restated BuildingConnected, Inc. 2013 Stock Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 99.1 filed with the
Registrant's Registration Statement on Form S-8 filed on January 24, 2019)
10.11* Registrant's 2012 Outside Directors' Stock Plan, as amended and restated (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.18 filed
with the Registrant’ s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed on March 21, 2017)
10.12* Registrant's 2012 Outside Directors' Stock Plan Form of Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.5 filed with the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on March 13, 2012)
10.13*
  Registrant’ s Executive Incentive Plan, as amended and restated (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.23 filed with the
Registrant’ s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed on March 23, 2016)
10.14*
  Registrant’ s 2005 Non-Qualified Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended and restated, ef fective as of January 1, 2010
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 filed with the Registrant’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed on December 8,
2009)
10.15*
  Participants, tar get awards and payout formulas for fiscal year 2019 under the Registrant's Executive Incentive Plan
(incorporated by reference to Item 5.02 of the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on March 26, 2018)
10.16*
  Executive Change in Control Program, as amended and restated (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 filed with the
Registrant’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 21, 2016)
10.17*   Sub-Plan of the Autodesk, Inc. 1998 Employee Qualified Stock Purchase Plan, as amended and restated (filed herewith)
10.18* Form of Indemnification Agreement executed by the Registrant and each of its of ficers and directors (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.8 filed with the Registrant’ s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed on March 31, 2005)
10.19* Employment Agreement, dated as of June 19, 2017, by and between the Registrant and Andrew Anagnost (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 filed with the Registrant’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on June 19, 2017)
10.20*
  Registrant’ s Severance Plan dated August 27, 2018 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 99.1 filed with the Registrant’ s
Current Report on Form 8-K filed on August 30, 2018)
10.21* Registrant's 2012 Employee Stock Plan Form of Retirement Restricted Stock Unit Agreement, as amended and restated (filed
herewith)
10.22
  Office Lease between Registrant and the J.H.S. Trust for 1 11 McInnis Parkway , San Rafael, CA, as amended (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.1 filed with the Registrant’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the fiscal quarter ended October
31, 2004)
10.23
  Fourth Amendment to Lease between Registrant and the J.H.S. Holdings L.P . for 1 11 McInnis Parkway , San Rafael, CA
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.30 filed with the Registrant’ s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed on March 19, 2010)
10.24
  Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated December 17, 2018, by and among the Registrant, the lenders from time to
time party thereto and Citibank, N.A. as agent (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 filed with the Registrant's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on December 20, 2018)
10.25
  Term Loan Agreement, dated December 17, 2018, by and among the Registrant, the lenders from time to time party thereto
and Citibank, N.A. as agent (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 filed with the Registrant's Current Report on Form 8-
K filed on December 20, 2018)
10.26
  Agreement and Plan of Mer ger, dated as of November 20, 2018, by and among the Registrant, Araujo Acquisition Corp.,
PlanGrid, Inc. and Shareholder Representative Services LLC (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 filed with the
Registrant’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on November 20, 2018)
2019 Form 10-K 116
Table of Contents
Exhibit No.   Description
21.1   List of Subsidiaries (filed herewith)
23.1   Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (Ernst & Young LLP) (filed herewith)
24.1   Power of Attorney (contained in the signature page to this Annual Report)
31.1   Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (filed herewith)
31.2 Certification of Chief Financial Of ficer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (filed herewith)
32.1†
  Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer and Chief Financial Of ficer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant
to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (filed herewith)
101.INS ††   XBRL  Instance Document
101.SCH ††   XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Schema
101.CAL  ††   XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase
101.DEF ††   XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase
101.LAB ††   XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase
101.PRE ††   XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase
 ____________________
* Denotes a management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement.
† The certifications attached as Exhibit 32.1 that accompany this Annual Report on Form 10-K are not deemed filed with the Securities and
Exchange Commission and are not to be incorporated by reference into any filing of Autodesk, Inc. under the Securities Act of 1933, as
amended, or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, whether made before or after the date of this Form 10-K, irrespective of any
general incorporation language contained in such filing.
†† The financial information contained in these XBRL  documents is unaudited.     
2019 Form 10-K 117
